Split-Sex Animals Are Unusual, Yes, but Not as Rare as You’d Think
['From butterflies to chickens to lobsters, mixed male-female bodies offer clues as to why certain diseases strike one gender more often than the other.', 'Top left, a male blue morpho butterfly; top middle, a female. The remainder are gynandromorphic, with both male and female characteristics.', 'All serious butterfly collectors remember their first gynandromorph: a butterfly with a color and pattern that are distinctly male on one wing and female on the other.', 'He was sure that the delicate black outlines between male and female regions appearing on one wing — but not the other — identified a key facet of animal development.', 'Gynandromorph butterflies and other half-male, half-female creatures, particularly birds, have fascinated both scientists and amateurs for centuries. The latest sensation was a half-red, half-taupe cardinal that became a regular visitor in the backyard of Shirley and Jeffrey Caldwell in Erie, Pa. Although the bird would have to be tested to confirm that it is a gynandromorph, its color division strongly suggests that it is, scientists say.', 'Mammals have X and Y chromosomes, birds and insects have Z and W, and some reptiles can change their sex depending on temperature, or a combination of temperature and sex chromosomes, she said.', 'A chicken with bilateral gynandromorphism.', 'How gynandromorphs are born at all still remains a mystery. For birds, the most likely explanation is that a female makes an unusual double-nucleus egg cell, one with a Z chromosome and one with a W chromosome, and each is fertilized by a Z sperm, making some cells ZZ and others ZW in the same individual, Dr. Arnold said.', 'It’s impossible to track an entire population to understand what percentage have unusual sex chromosomes, Dr. Patel said. In the lab, scientists have used radiation to create gynandromorph flies, he said, but it is difficult to sort out the potential causes — including environmental harm — in a wild population.', 'Why cells of opposite sex end up on opposite sides of these gynandromorphs remains unclear, Dr. Arnold said. “I don’t have a good explanation,” he said.', 'Animals can also develop as mosaics, with some cells genetically different from others. Some of Dr. Patel’s butterflies, for instance, show male coloration and patterns on parts of a wing, rather than the entire side.', 'From left, a male Pamela butterfly, a mosaic gynandromorph and a female.', 'Obesity, metabolic syndrome, autoimmune disease, Alzheimer’s, even aging differs by sex, Dr. Arnold noted. Twenty years ago, he said, scientists didn’t think that sex chromosomes played any role at all in causing sex differences in these diseases. “But now we know it makes a difference in mice, so we can say: Where does it make a difference in humans?” he said.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'Most people have 46 chromosomes, with 23 inherited from each parent. A few chromosomes can come with an extra copy, including chromosomes 13, 18 and 21 — which is commonly called Down syndrome. Losing any chromosome other than a second sex chromosome is always lethal to a fetus.', 'But the sex chromosome is the only one that people can survive with just one copy, Dr. Graves said. “Girls with a single X and no Y suffer few anomalies because the second X is largely inactive anyway. After all, males have only one X,” she said.', 'It is not clear what mechanisms the body has to ensure that most men get only one Y and most women get two X chromosomes, said Karissa Sanbonmatsu, a structural biologist and principal investigator at Los Alamos National Laboratory in New Mexico. In typical females, one X is usually — but not always — turned off, she said, and some research suggests that there is a mechanism that counts how many X chromosomes are present and generally turns off all but one of them.', 'People with androgen insensitivity syndrome, for instance, are born with XY chromosomes, but develop as female, because their cells cannot process male hormones. “So, it’s as if the testosterone doesn’t exist,” she said. They are infertile.', 'The more science learns about sex, “the more we find anomalies,” said Alice Dreger, a historian of sexuality.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Trilobites: The X-rays Revealed Something Unusual: Mummified Body Parts
['The remains were stopped at Cairo’s airport before they could be transported to Europe.', 'Body parts belonging to two different mummies were hidden inside a speaker intercepted by Egyptian authorities.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'Egyptian officials with the human contraband. The country enacted a law in 1983 strictly regulating artifacts, including mummies, with stiff penalties for smuggling.', 'Nicholas St. Fleur is a science reporter who writes about archaeology, paleontology, space and other topics. He joined The Times in 2015. Before that, he was an assistant editor at The Atlantic.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Have Dark Forces Been Messing With the Cosmos?
['Have Dark Forces Been Messing With the Cosmos?', 'Have Dark Forces Been Messing With the Cosmos?', 'Axions? Phantom energy? Astrophysicists scramble to patch a hole in the universe, rewriting cosmic history in the process.', 'There was, you might say, a disturbance in the Force.', 'Long, long ago, when the universe was only about 100,000 years old — a buzzing, expanding mass of particles and radiation — a strange new energy field switched on. That energy suffused space with a kind of cosmic antigravity, delivering a not-so-gentle boost to the expansion of the universe.', 'Then, after another 100,000 years or so, the new field simply winked off, leaving no trace other than a speeded-up universe.', 'The cosmos is expanding only about 9 percent more quickly than theory prescribes. But this slight-sounding discrepancy has intrigued astronomers, who think it might be revealing something new about the universe.', 'And so, for the last couple of years, they have been gathering in workshops and conferences to search for a mistake or loophole in their previous measurements and calculations, so far to no avail.', 'Now ideas are popping up. Some researchers say the problem could be solved by inferring the existence of previously unknown subatomic particles. Others, such as the Johns Hopkins group, are invoking new kinds of energy fields.', 'Thus far, there is no evidence for most of these ideas. If any turn out to be right, scientists may have to rewrite the story of the origin, history and, perhaps, fate of the universe.', 'Or it could all be a mistake. Astronomers have rigorous methods to estimate the effects of statistical noise and other random errors on their results; not so for the unexamined biases called systematic errors.', 'Edwin Hubble in 1949, two decades after he discovered that the universe is expanding.', 'Generations of great astronomers have come to grief trying to measure the universe. At issue is a number called the Hubble constant, named after Edwin Hubble, the Mount Wilson astronomer who in 1929 discovered that the universe is expanding.', 'As space expands, it carries galaxies away from each other like the raisins in a rising cake. The farther apart two galaxies are, the faster they will fly away from each other. The Hubble constant simply says by how much.', 'But to calibrate the Hubble constant, astronomers depend on so-called standard candles: objects, such as supernova explosions and certain variable stars, whose distances can be estimated by luminosity or some other feature. This is where the arguing begins.', 'Sign up for the Science Times newsletter.', 'The discrepancy — 9 percent — sounds fatal but may not be, astronomers contend, because Planck and human astronomers do very different kinds of observations.', 'Planck is considered the gold standard of cosmology. It spent four years studying the cosmic bath of microwaves left over from the end of the Big Bang, when the universe was just 380,000 years old. But it did not measure the Hubble constant directly. Rather, the Planck group derived the value of the constant, and other cosmic parameters, from a mathematical model largely based on those microwaves.', 'In short, Planck’s Hubble constant is based on a cosmic baby picture. In contrast, the classical astronomical value is derived from what cosmologists modestly call “local measurements,” a few billion light-years deep into a middle-aged universe.', 'What if that baby picture left out or obscured some important feature of the universe?', 'And so cosmologists are off to the game that Lloyd Knox, an astrophysicist from the University of California, Davis, called “cosmological Whac-a-Mole” at the recent Chicago meeting: attempting to fix the model of the early universe, to make it expand a little faster without breaking what the model already does well.', 'A more drastic approach, from the Johns Hopkins group, invokes fields of exotic anti-gravitational energy. The idea exploits an aspect of string theory, the putative but unproven “theory of everything” that posits that the elementary constituents of reality are very tiny, wriggling strings.', "Never miss an eclipse, a meteor shower, a rocket launch or any other astronomical and space event that's out of this world.", 'String theory suggests that space could be laced with exotic energy fields associated with lightweight particles or forces yet undiscovered. Those fields, collectively called quintessence, could act in opposition to gravity, and could change over time — popping up, decaying or altering their effect, switching from repulsive to attractive.', 'The jury is still out. Dr. Riess said that the idea seems to work, which is not to say that he agrees with it, or that it is right. Nature, manifest in future observations, will have the final say.', 'Dr. Knox called the Johns Hopkins paper “an existence proof” that the Hubble problem could be solved. “I think that’s new,” he said.', 'Dr. Randall, however, has taken issue with aspects of the Johns Hopkins calculations. She and a trio of Harvard postdocs are working on a similar idea that she says works as well and is mathematically consistent. “It’s novel and very cool,” Dr. Randall said.', 'The first episode occurred when the universe was less than a trillionth of a trillionth of a second old. At that moment, cosmologists surmise, a violent ballooning propelled the Big Bang; in a fraction of a trillionth of a second, this event — named “inflation” by the cosmologist Alan Guth, of M.I.T. — smoothed and flattened the initial chaos into the more orderly universe observed today. Nobody knows what drove inflation.', 'The second episode is unfolding today: cosmic expansion is speeding up. But why? The issue came to light in 1998, when two competing teams of astronomers asked whether the collective gravity of the galaxies might be slowing the expansion enough to one day drag everything together into a Big Crunch.', 'Nobel Prize.', 'Under the influence of dark energy, the cosmos is now doubling in size every 10 billion years — to what end, nobody knows.', 'Workers with the European Planck spacecraft at the European Space Agency spaceport in Kourou, French Guiana, in 2009.', 'But if dark energy is temporary — if one day it switches off — cosmologists and metaphysicians can all go back to contemplating a sensible tomorrow.', 'But the future is still up for grabs.', 'This dire scenario emerges from the work of Guido Risaliti, of the University of Florence in Italy, and Elisabeta Lusso, of Durham University in England. For the last four years, they have plumbed the deep history of the universe, using violent, faraway cataclysms called quasars as distance markers.', 'Quasars arise from supermassive black holes at the centers of galaxies; they are the brightest objects in nature, and can be seen clear across the universe. As standard candles, quasars aren’t ideal because their masses vary widely. Nevertheless, the researchers identified some regularities in the emissions from quasars, allowing the history of the cosmos to be traced back nearly 12 billion years. The team found that the rate of cosmic expansion deviated from expectations over that time span.', 'One interpretation of the results is that dark energy is not constant after all, but is changing, growing denser and thus stronger over cosmic time. It so happens that this increase in dark energy also would be just enough to resolve the discrepancy in measurements of the Hubble constant.', 'As the universe expands, the push from phantom energy would grow without bounds, eventually overcoming gravity and tearing apart first Earth, then atoms.', 'The Hubble-constant community responded to the new report with caution. “If it holds up, this is a very interesting result,” said Dr. Freedman.', 'Astronomers have been trying to take the measure of this dark energy for two decades. Two space missions — the European Space Agency’s Euclid and NASA’s Wfirst — have been designed to study dark energy and hopefully deliver definitive answers in the coming decade. The fate of the universe is at stake.', 'In the meantime, everything, including phantom energy, is up for consideration, according to Dr. Riess.', 'Does the Universe Still Need Einstein?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Oscars Red Carpet 2019: Stars Arriving at the 91st Academy Awards
['Lady Gaga, nominated for best actress in a leading role for “A Star Is Born.” She is wearing Alexander McQueen.', 'All the looks from Hollywood’s biggest night.']


Scene City: Rami Malek, Lady Gaga, Mahershala Ali and Regina King Celebrate Their Oscars at the Governors Ball
['After the Oscars ceremony, the stars took escalators up to the Governors Ball for the official after-party. Rami Malek, who won best actor for his role in “Bohemian Rhapsody,” sprayed champagne in the engraving room. “You’re all going to get wet,” he yelled.', 'Newly minted Oscar winners get their trophies engraved at the official Oscars after-party.']


The Story of Best Actress Oscar Winner Olivia Colman’s Gown
['That Mary would be Mary Fellowes, a fellow Brit and a stylist who has worked for 11 Vogue titles and has dressed the actresses Tracee Ellis Ross, Liv Tyler and Amy Adams, among others, over the course of almost two decades.', 'When Prada agreed to make her Oscars gown, Ms. Colman knew she wanted a giant bow on the back.', 'The embroidery on the Prada gown took a dozen artisans more than 300 hours to complete.', 'Mary Fellowes, a creative director and stylist, at her home in London.', 'But initial calls to big-name luxury brands for ready-to-wear outfits in the early stages of their partnership “did not get what I felt to be a satisfying response,” Ms. Fellowes said as she sat at her kitchen table in London, immaculate in polished black leather and oversize cat’s-eye spectacles.', 'New friends are made.', 'Suddenly, the balance of power had shifted, and the two women found themselves able to pick and choose. So they raised the stakes. They decided that if Ms. Colman was going to endorse a brand by wearing it on the red carpet, it should have associations that mattered to her. It should ideally be, for example, family-owned; make efforts toward sustainability; and maybe involve another working mother (Ms. Colman has three children).', 'Emilia Wickstead gown worn by Ms. Colman when she won the best actress Bafta this month, and the caped black Stella McCartney dress (made with recycled bamboo) that Ms. Colman wore to scoop up the Golden Globe in the same category in January.', 'Mary Fellowes inspects the gown.', 'When it came to the Oscars ceremony dress, Ms. Fellowes said, there was one house in particular that she believed would check all their boxes: strong, intelligent voice; distinctive visual codes; and shared values. So what did she do when that brand called to say yes, it would make a bespoke gown for Ms. Colman for the Academy Awards?', 'The two women then drew pictures of dream dresses in the car on the way to the Palm Springs International Film Festival. Ms. Fellowes had brought along a file of Prada dresses, fabrics and embroidery from years gone by. Ms. Colman said she knew she wanted simple, with a big bow on the back. The Prada atelier set about making their shared vision a reality.', 'Many years ago — early in Ms. Colman’s career, during her bachelorette party in Paris — she and her friends stumbled into a Prada boutique. At the time, she remembered, she declared: “One day, when I have finally made it, I will wear a Prada dress.” By any measure, that day has come.', 'Elizabeth Paton is a reporter for the Styles section, covering the fashion and luxury sectors in Europe. Before joining The Times in 2015, she was a reporter at the Financial Times both in London and New York.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Lady Gaga’s Long Road to That Giant Diamond Necklace
['I miss the meat dress — but what a diamond on the Oscars red carpet!', 'When was it decided that to be taken seriously as an actress you need to dress in serious couture? I’m asking because I never got the memo, but clearly, Lady Gaga and her styling team did.', 'Plus, rumor has it that her Tiffany deal is the biggest red carpet jewelry deal ever signed.', 'At the 2010 MTV Video Music Awards, in her infamous meat dress.', 'At The Brit Awards in 2010.', 'Lady Gaga arriving inside an egg at the Grammy Awards in 2011.', 'It is, of course, entirely Gaga’s right to mutate every few years into a new persona, both artistically and stylistically. In fact, such mutation is part of her identity. This is, after all, the woman who once emerged from a giant egg, above, at the Grammys. She claimed to have been marinating inside it for approximately three days.', 'And to be fair, her fashionization has probably been coming for awhile. We should have seen it coming when she accepted the 2016 Golden Globe for best actress in a limited series for her role in “American Horror Story,” wearing Marilyn Monroe-esque black velvet Versace.', 'Tom Eerebout.', 'Lady Gaga attends the 2013 American Music Awards.', 'Maybe we should chalk it up to growing up. It’s not fair to demand our superstars remain rebels forever. It’s probably not even possible.', 'And yet. And yet. I find myself waxing nostalgic about those weird horn implants she had for awhile under her skin. I miss the crazy hoof-like shoes. I never thought I would say that, but there you go.', 'Once upon an Oscars we, the watching public, thought Bjork and her famous swan dress were as wild as it was going to get, but just imagine what early Gaga could have done with current Gaga’s red carpet moments.', 'The mind boggles.', 'Also, just imagine what Ryan Seacrest would have done with any of those particular fashion moments. They might actually have rendered him speechless. Which would have been a small step for one woman, and a big step for womankind.', 'Lady Gaga on the Oscars red carpet in 2015.', 'And on the Oscars red carpet in 2016.', 'Kate Hudson and Lady Gaga at the Met Gala in 2016.', 'At the 2017 Grammy Awards.', 'At an event in Los Angeles in October 2018.', 'At an event in Los Angeles in November 2018.', 'At the Venice Film Festival in August 2018.', 'At the Toronto International Film Festival in 2018.', 'At the premiere of “A Star Is Born” in Los Angeles in 2018.', 'At the Golden Globe Awards in 2019.', 'Gaga could have helped them break the yoke, which everyone says lies so heavy on their shoulders, of red carpet conformity. Forced us all to wrestle with our own preconceptions about what beauty and stardom really means. Helped fashion expand its own thinking. Challenged the status quo instead of pandering to it. Proved with a wink that her most recent incarnation was simply a character she had played to perfection (give her an award for that!).', 'Because the thing is, if she is to be believed, she wasn’t born this way.', 'At an event in New York in January 2019.', 'At the Critics’ Choice Awards in January.', 'At the Screen Actors Guild Awards in 2019.', 'At the 2019 Grammy Awards in February.', "Vanessa Friedman is The Times's fashion director and chief fashion critic. She was previously the fashion editor of the Financial Times.", 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Spike Lee’s Tribute to Prince at the Oscars
['Spike Lee’s Prince-symbol necklace is gold, framed in diamonds with an opal, and his gold Jordans were commissioned by Michael Jordan.', 'Mr. Lee won his first Academy Award, as his film "BlacKkKlansman" received the Oscar for best adapted screenplay.', 'The day that Prince died in April 2016, Spike Lee threw a celebration of his friend’s life. On a brick townhouse-lined street in Fort Greene, Brooklyn, hundreds of people gathered in the street, as Mr. Lee blasted song after song from the steps of his building. He played deep cuts and greatest hits, as neighbors wept and sang along into the night.', 'Mr. Lee on the red carpet.', 'Mr. Scognamiglio first met Mr. Lee about a year ago and the two have become friends; the director can often be seen sporting the artisan’s oversized jewelry.', 'The last time he saw his friend was after a performance of the musical “Hamilton,” Mr. Lee’s seventh time seeing it.', 'After the show, Mr. Lee said he went backstage and cast members told him that they were going to an after-party hosted by Prince.', 'The song was recovered by Troy Carter, a friend of Mr. Lee’s who is an adviser to the Prince estate (and who also used to manage Lady Gaga). Mr. Carter called Mr. Lee and told him that among the thousands of disorganized cassettes that the musician had left behind, one had been found that featured just Prince and a piano.', 'He does not think that finding the tape was a coincidence.', 'Jonah Bromwich is based in New York. He writes for the Style section.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Humpback Whale Washes Ashore in Amazon River, Baffling Scientists in Brazil
['A young humpback whale was found dead on Friday on an island near the mouth of the Amazon River in Brazil. Scientists are investigating how it died and why it was so far from where they migrate this time of the year.', 'Marine biologists in Brazil were stunned to discover a young humpback whale on Friday that had washed ashore on a remote, forested island in the Amazon River, at a time of the year when it should have already migrated thousands of miles to Antarctica.', 'Biologists examined the carcass over the weekend during low tide, looking for signs of how the whale might have died, and took samples for a necropsy, the group said. The whale, while about half the length of a full-grown humpback, was too large and in too remote an area to be entirely removed.', 'Ms. Emin told G1 that the group hypothesized that the young whale got detached from its mother before it died.', 'Humpbacks travel great distances every year, slowly migrating to and from the poles. Those in the Northern Hemisphere migrate this time of year to tropical waters before returning north in the summer. In the Southern Hemisphere, they migrate south during this time of year and return north during their winter, in the breeding season.', 'Ms. Emin said her group was examining the whale to try to determine its cause of death.', 'Ms. Emin did not respond to an email seeking comment.', 'Barbara Marcolini contributed reporting.', 'These Whales Are Serenaders of the Seas. It’s Quite a Racket.', 'New York’s Whales Love Bunker. So Do Fishing Boats. Conflict Ensues.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Matter: DNA Gets a New — and Bigger — Genetic Alphabet
['In 1985, the chemist Steven A. Benner sat down with some colleagues and a notebook and sketched out a way to expand the alphabet of DNA. He has been trying to make those sketches real ever since.', "Crafting the four new bases that don't exist in nature was a chemical tour-de-force. They fit neatly into DNA’s double helix, and enzymes can read them as easily as natural bases, in order to make molecules.", 'Hachimoji DNA could have many applications, including a far more durable way to store digital data that could last for centuries. “This could be huge that way,” said Dr. Nicholas V. Hud, a biochemist at Georgia Institute of Technology who was not involved in research.', 'It also raises a profound question about the nature of life elsewhere in the universe, offering the possibility that the four-base DNA we are familiar with may not be the only chemistry that could support life.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'The four natural bases of DNA are all anchored to molecular backbones. A pair of backbones can join into a double helix because their bases are attracted to each other. The bases form a bond with their hydrogen atoms.', 'But bases don’t stick together at random. C can only bond to G, and A can only bond to T. These strict rules help ensure that DNA strands don’t clump together into a jumble. No matter what sequence of bases are contained in natural DNA, it still keeps its shape.', 'But those four bases are not the only compounds that can attach to DNA’s backbone and link to another base — at least on paper. Dr. Benner and his colleagues thought up a dozen alternatives.', 'Working at the Swiss university ETH Zurich at the time, Dr. Benner tried to make some of those imaginary bases real.', 'Once Dr. Benner and his colleagues combined real atoms, according to his designs, the artificial bases didn’t work as he had hoped.', 'Reading about Dr. Benner’s early experiments, Dr. Romesberg decided to try to create his own bases.', 'In the years that followed, Dr. Romesberg and his colleagues fashioned enzymes that could copy DNA made from both natural bases and unnatural, oily ones.', 'In recent years, Dr. Romesberg’s team has begun making unnatural proteins from these unnatural genes. He founded a company, Synthorx, to develop some of these proteins as cancer drugs.', 'They then went on to create a second pair of new bases. Now with eight bases to play with, the researchers started building DNA molecules with a variety of different sequences. The researchers found that no matter which sequence they created, the molecules still formed the standard double helix.', 'Because Hachimoji DNA held onto this shape, it could act like regular DNA: it could store information, and that information could be read to make a molecule.', 'For a cell, the first step in making a molecule is to read a gene using special enzymes. They make a copy of the gene in a single-stranded version of DNA, called RNA.', 'Depending on the gene, the cell will then do one of two things with that RNA. In some cases, it will use the RNA as a guide to build a protein. But in other cases, the RNA molecule floats off to do a job of its own.', 'Dr. Benner and his colleagues created a Hachimoji gene for an RNA molecule. They predicted that the RNA molecule would be able to grab a molecule called a fluorophore. Cradled by the RNA molecule, the fluorophore would absorb light and release it as a green flash.', 'Andrew Ellington, an evolutionary engineer at the University of Texas, led the effort to find an enzyme that could read Hachimoji DNA. He and his colleagues found a promising one made by a virus, and they tinkered with it until the enzyme could easily read all eight bases.', 'They mixed the enzyme in test tubes with the Hachimoji gene. As they had hoped, their test tubes began glowing green.', 'In the future, Hachimoji DNA may store information of a radically different sort. It might someday encode a movie or a spreadsheet.', 'Today, movies, spreadsheets and other digital files are typically stored on silicon chips or magnetic tapes. But those kinds of storage have serious shortcomings. For one thing, they can deteriorate in just years.', 'DNA, by contrast, can remain intact for centuries.', 'With eight bases instead of four, Hachimoji DNA could potentially encode far more information. “DNA capable of twice as much storage? That’s pretty amazing in my view,” said Dr. Ellington.', 'Beyond our current need for storage, Hachimoji DNA also offers some clues about life itself. Scientists have long wondered if our DNA evolved only four bases because they’re the only ones that can work in genes. Could life have taken a different path?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


New Ultima Thule Photos Were Made in a Flash
['The images were recorded while the New Horizons spacecraft was moving at more than 32,000 miles per hour.', 'An animation made with 14 images of the object nicknamed Ultima Thule taken by the New Horizons spacecraft during its New Year’s Eve flyby.', 'When NASA’s New Horizons spacecraft flew by a small distant world on New Year’s Eve, it tried to use one of its cameras to capture the highest-resolution images that were possible. Pulling this off presented risks.', 'On Friday, mission scientists announced success.', 'A new, higher-resolution image of Ultima Thule captured by the New Horizons spacecraft.', 'Ultima Thule is a pristine leftover from the earliest days of the solar system.', 'The images have a resolution of about 33 meters, or 110 feet, per pixel. However, because of the rolling of the spacecraft needed to make proper use of the spacecraft’s lower resolution panoramic camera, in addition to the long exposures required by the dim light that far from sun, the images were blurred.', 'Still, even the subtle improvements will give better understanding of the pits and bright patterns on Ultima Thule’s surface. A clearer look at the rims of the pits might help tell whether they are small impact craters or they formed from erosion, for example. Counting craters could reveal the rate of collisions in this distant part of the solar system, while erosion would hold clues to what Ultima Thule is made of.', 'An earlier version of this article misstated the reason that images taken by the New Horizons spacecraft were somewhat blurred. It was the motion of the spacecraft needed for a lower resolution camera and the longer exposure times because of low light that caused blurring, not the speed of the spacecraft.', 'Kenneth Chang has been at The Times since 2000, writing about physics, geology, chemistry, and the planets. Before becoming a science writer, he was a graduate student whose research involved the control of chaos.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


‘Who will ensure security of nation, alliance or Modi?’
['Hailing the Narendra Modi government for the air strike on Balakot, BJP president Amit Shah on Tuesday said through the IAF operation and the surgical strike conducted earlier by the Army, the Prime Minister had sent “a message to the world” that Indian soldiers and the Modi government would “go to any extent” to safeguard the country.', 'Mr. Shah said the air force strike was carried out in “self-defence”.', 'Addressing a chaupal meeting in Ghazipur, east Uttar Pradesh, the BJP chief asked people to decide who would best secure the nation and tackle “terrorism,” the Opposition parties or Mr. Modi.', 'Mr. Shah said that in 2014, Mr. Modi had promised a “safe India”. Referring to the “surgical strike” by the Army in 2016, Mr. Shah that while the operation was carried out in response to the Uri attack, the “air strike in PoK” was conducted in “self-defence”.', 'After the Pulwama attack, Mr. Shah said there was a strong demand in the country that such a response should be given so that in future [they] will have to “think 10 times” before repeating anything like it.', 'He said that the air strike had brought a sense of peace to the people of the country.', 'Launching the BJP\'s Kamal Jyoti Sankalp campaign for the 2019 Lok Sabha elections, Mr. Shah while lauding and thanking the Air Force for the operation, also praised Mr. Modi for displaying the "political will power" to fight terrorism, which he said the PM was known the world over for.', 'Ghazipur is located on the eastern fringes of U.P. and is known to send a large number of its youth to the armed forces. Mr. Shah said he had decided to launch the campaign from Ghazipur as it was the land of Suheldev and Abdul Hamid.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Cong. to go it alone in West Bengal
['Miffed at the “adamant” attitude of the CPI(M)-led Left Front, the Congress is likely to go it alone in West Bengal in the Lok Sabha polls. The party will take a final call on the matter at a meeting of its election committee to be held on Wednesday, party leaders said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Court work hit in Berhampur
['Court work in Odisha’s Berhampur continues to be hindered on the last four days of every month as the Ganjam Bar Association members cease work on these days demanding establishment of permanent Bench of the Orissa High Court in the city for southern districts of the State.', 'The lawyers are also critical of the State government for not making public till now the report of the Justice C.R. Pal Commission.', 'The commission was set up by the State government in March 2008 to investigate and enquire into demands for permanent Benches of the Orissa HC in southern and western Odisha.', 'A permanent High Court Bench is a long standing demand of the GBA.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Sharp words exchanged during budget debate in Haryana
['BJP accuses Cong. of ‘burning Haryana’; charges baseless, says Cong.', 'Exchange of sharp words on various issues between the Treasury benches and the Congress members in the Haryana Assembly marred the budget debate on Tuesday.', 'BJP MLA Aseem Goel started the debate and accused the Congress members of being responsible for “burning Haryana” during the violence which broke out during the Jat quota agitation in February 2016.', 'During the argument, Congress MLAs, including Bhupinder Singh Hooda, Geeta Bhukkal, Raghubir Singh Kadian, Anand Singh Dangi, Karan Singh Dalal and Shakuntala Khatak, accused the BJP MLAs of levelling baseless charges.', 'The Congress and Indian National Lok Dal members also raised objections over the CAG report not being tabled in the House before the budget debate opened.', 'Mr. Kaidan said that as per the precedent, the CAG reports are tabled before the budget debate starts. “However, this year it has not been done,” he said.', 'Parliamentary Affairs Minister Ram Bilas Sharma pointed out that the Opposition members had not checked their bags, which were given to them after the budget speech, to which Mr. Hooda replied athat they had checked the bag but the CAG report was not there.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Three killed on suspicion of witchcraft
['Three persons — a couple and 77-year-old woman — were allegedly killed on suspicion of witchcraft in the Gunupur police station area of Odisha’s Rayagada district.', 'All the three — Gopal Sabar, his wife Laxmi Sabar and Jakili Sabar — residents of Ukumbaguda village, had been missing since February 23.', 'The couple’s daughter, Sabita Sabar, had filed an FIR with the police saying that her parents and the aged woman were murdered by some villagers who accused them to be practitioners of witchcraft.', 'On receiving the information, a police team led by Gunupur Sub-Divisional Police Officer Rajkishor Dash reached the spot along with a scientific team and a sniffer dog. The police have detained four persons in connection with the incident.', 'Mr Dash said initial probe hints that the three were beaten to death and their bodies burnt on February 23 night. Their charred remains were thrown in a pond.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


‘Forged alliance with BSP to ensure Netaji’s win in LS polls’
['SP patriarch Mulayam Singh with party president Akhilesh Yadav in Lucknow.', 'Samajwadi Party president Akhilesh Yadav has said that he forged an alliance with the BSP so that his father Mulayam Singh can win with “record votes” from whichever seat in Uttar Pradesh he chooses to fight the Lok Sabha polls.', 'His comment came days after SP patriarch Mulayam Yadav — popularly known as Netaji — expressed “displeasure” over his son’s decision to enter into a tie-up with the Mayawati-led Bahujan Samaj Party.', 'Ms. Mayawati and Mr. Yadav had jointly announced the alliance in January, saying the BSP and the SP will contest 38 parliamentary seats each out of the 80 in Uttar Pradesh. However, when the parties released the list of seats shared between them, the SP got 37 seats and the BSP 38.', 'When asked about reports of some SP members being disgruntled over not being considered for ticket, he said the party has been making preparations for the past one year on all seats and its leaders were asked to work on the ground in their respective areas and support whoever is given a ticket. “We all are united and contest with full force,” the SP president said.', 'Several times, decisions in politics are taken keeping in mind equations.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Virgin Galactic Sends a Rocket Plane to Space Again, in Its Highest Flight Yet
['This was Virgin Galactic’s fifth supersonic-powered test flight. The venture marked another step forward in a new kind of space race.', 'After its first spaceflight in December, Virgin Galactic sent the same vessel past the edge of the atmosphere for a second time on Friday. This time, the rocket plane went higher and faster than before — and it had three crew members on board instead of two.', 'The flight marked another step forward in a new kind of space race — one that aims to allow private citizens (who can afford the ticket) an opportunity to exit our atmosphere.', 'It was the company’s fifth supersonic-powered test flight, and it reached an altitude of nearly 56 miles before returning safely to the Mojave Desert runway in California where it took off. Beth Moses, an astronaut trainer and microgravity research expert, was in the cabin as the company’s first test passenger in space.', 'Unity reached Mach 3 — three times the speed of sound — before the rocket motor was switched off shortly before 9 a.m. Then the vessel coasted to its highest altitude of 55.87 miles above sea level. Two tail booms rotated into a “feathered” position to create drag, allowing the vessel to fall gently back into the atmosphere and, ultimately, glide toward the runway.', 'The Virgin Galactic spaceship VSS Unity, with the chief pilot Dave Mackay, the co-pilot Michael Masucci and Beth Moses, an astronaut trainer and microgravity research expert, as it flew to space on Friday.', 'George T. Whitesides, the chief executive of Virgin Galactic, said the research conducted on the flight focused not only on the vessel’s trajectory, but also on the passenger experience.', 'Ms. Moses’ job was to evaluate how passengers might experience a trip in the cabin. She observed the light, the temperature and the feeling of moving around in zero gravity. In an interview after the flight, she said it felt comfortable, and the view was beautiful.', 'According to Virgin Galactic, the vehicle made its second successful space flight, with three crew members aboard. Powered by a hybrid rocket motor, VSS Unity reached Mach 3 and a high altitude of nearly 56 miles above Earth.', 'Ventures like these are more useful for testing the limits of tourism than for advancing scientific research, said Jonathan McDowell, an astrophysicist at the Harvard-Smithsonian Center for Astrophysics. He said the Virgin flights could be used to conduct microgravity tests or equipment checks.', 'And the three people on board — two pilots, David Mackay and Michael Masucci, and Ms. Moses — got the vantage point of a lifetime.', "Never miss an eclipse, a meteor shower, a rocket launch or any other astronomical and space event that's out of this world.", 'In an interview after the flight, Mr. Mackay commented on how quickly the sky turned black once the atmosphere faded, and Mr. Masucci said he was astonished by the sight of a very bright moon. They said the flight was amazing, but not frightening.', 'Virgin Galactic is expected to keep doing test flights and making improvements in terms of safety, altitude and weight capacity. It is still unclear when private citizens — including the more than 600 who have already bought tickets — will be allowed to take a ride.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Japan’s Hayabusa2 Spacecraft Lands on Ryugu Asteroid
['The probe ascended from the space rock after firing a bullet to help with the gathering of samples that will eventually be returned to Earth.', 'The shadow of Japan’s Hayabusa2 spacecraft cast over the asteroid Ryugu last year.', 'Tonight, a Japanese spacecraft completed a touchdown on the surface of an asteroid, where it fired a projectile at the rock’s surface rock. A successful mission could help advance understanding of how our planet formed in the early solar system.', 'What did Hayabusa2 do when it landed?', 'Hayabusa2 tried to collect material from the rugged surface of the asteroid with a device called a sampler horn.', 'Scientists fired a metal projectile into a gravel to simulate conditions on the asteroid Ryugu.', 'The spacecraft is carrying multiple projectiles so it can make more than one attempt at a touchdown. In March or April, Hayabusa2 is also expected to send an explosive package called a Small Carry-on Impactor to Ryugu’s surface to make an artificial crater. Hayabusa2 might collect another sample of the material exposed in the crater.', 'Why are they studying this asteroid?', 'Asteroids are bits and pieces leftover from the disc of gas and dust that formed around the young sun and never quite coalesced into a planet. They contain some almost pristine compounds that help tell what the early solar system was like 4.5 billion years ago.', 'Ryugu, as dark as coal, is a C-type, or carbonaceous, asteroid, meaning it is full of carbon molecules known as organics including possibly amino acids, the building blocks of proteins. Such molecules are not always associated with biology and can form from chemical reactions in deep space, but asteroids could have seeded Earth with the organic matter that led to life.', 'About three-quarters of asteroids in the solar system fall into the C-type.', 'Japan’s Hayabusa2 spacecraft is exploring Ryugu, an asteroid thought to contain material from the early solar system.', 'This space rock was discovered in 1999 and not given a name until 2015. Ryugu is named after Ryugu-jo, or dragon’s palace — a magical undersea palace in a Japanese folk tale.', 'Isn’t NASA doing something like this too?', 'Yes. The Osiris-Rex spacecraft is currently surveying another carbon-rich asteroid known as Bennu, and it too will collect samples and return them to Earth. Bennu is even smaller than Ryugu, about 500 yards wide. Osiris-rex will not return with its samples until 2023.', 'NASA and Japanese scientists plan to exchange samples of the two asteroids to compare the similarities and differences.', 'Has Japan done this before?', 'As the 2 in Hayabusa2 indicates, this is the second time that JAXA, the Japanese space agency, has sent a spacecraft to an asteroid.', 'Hayabusa2 is an improved version of Hayabusa, which visited a stony asteroid, Itokawa, in 2005. Despite several technical problems at Itokawa, Hayabusa returned a capsule to Earth in 2010 containing 1,500 particles from the asteroid.', 'Michael Roston is the senior staff editor for science. He was previously a social media editor for The Times and a home page producer.', 'Kenneth Chang has been at The Times since 2000, writing about physics, geology, chemistry, and the planets. Before becoming a science writer, he was a graduate student whose research involved the control of chaos.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


How Israel’s Moon Lander Got to the Launchpad
["SpaceIL's Beresheet spacecraft, with technicians and the company's C.E.O., Ido Anteby, second left, in December.", 'The privately built spacecraft will take a long trip to the moon, landing on its surface in April.', 'The challenge turned out to be much harder and much more expensive.', 'Yariv Bash, a co-founder of SpaceIL, which from its outset had an educational mission to inspire Israeli students to take an interest in space and engineering.', 'SpaceIL had given itself a mission, to inspire students in Israel to take an interest in science and engineering.', 'Beresheet will not take the quick, direct path to the moon. That would require a fuel-guzzling firing of a large engine to break out of Earth orbit and then another to slow down at the moon. Instead, with several engine firings, the spacecraft will slowly adjust its orbit, stretching to the outermost point until the moon’s gravity pulls it into lunar orbit.', 'That is a long and winding, four million mile-long journey to reach a destination that is a quarter million miles away.', 'In April, it is to land at a lava plain named Mare Serenitatis, or the Sea of Serenity. An instrument built by the Weizmann Institute of Science will measure the moon’s magnetic fields as it approaches, and that data could help give clear hints about the moon’s iron core.', 'Within a few days of its landing, Beresheet is expected to succumb to the heat of lunar noon. Then, its mission will end.', 'The price tag to build and launch Beresheet ended up at $100 million, not $10 million, and the spacecraft bulked up to 1,300 pounds including fuel. The SpaceIL founders point out that this is still much cheaper and smaller than what a space agency like NASA would build.', "Opher Doron, right, Israel Aerospace Industries's space division general manager, during a final drill in the control room in Yehud before the launch.", 'Kfir Damari, a SpaceIL co-founder. “We didn’t imagine, I think, how much time and effort it would take,” he said.', 'Yonatan Winetraub, who, with Mr. Bash and Mr. Damari, scrounged for the $50,000 entry fee and entered the paperwork within two hours of the Lunar X Prize deadline.', 'Back in November 2010, it was a rush for the SpaceIL founders just to get to the starting line. The Google competition had been announced three years earlier. About 30 teams had already entered, and the deadline for submissions was the end of the year. From friends and family, Mr. Bash, Mr. Damari and Mr. Winetraub scrounged $50,000 for the entry fee, and on Dec. 31, they sent in the money and the paperwork with less than two hours to spare.', 'From the beginning, their pitch was geared to philanthropists, not venture capitalists.', 'As full-fledged development started, Mr. Kahn brought in Eran Privman, who had been an executive at his companies, to run the organization.', 'A few months later, Mr. Kahn returned, replacing Mr. Privman with Ido Anteby, a longtime manager at the Israel Atomic Energy Commission, to shepherd the final construction and testing of Beresheet.', 'Mr. Kahn agreed to provide any remaining money needed.', "Morris Kahn, the company's president.", 'And now SpaceIL is approaching its end in a few months. “A day after, all of us will need to look for a job,” said Eran Shmidt, deputy manager of SpaceIL.', 'Israel Aerospace Industries has signed an agreement with OHB System, a German satellite manufacturer, to compete for the European work, and Mr. Doron said the company is in discussion about collaborating with some of the NASA-selected companies.', 'The SpaceIL founders have largely moved on. Mr. Winetraub is now a graduate student at Stanford, pursuing a doctorate in cancer research. Mr. Bash is chief executive of Flytrex, a company developing drones to deliver consumer goods. Mr. Damari is chief product and strategy officer for Tabookey, a cybersecurity start-up.', 'When they started SpaceIL at the bar, they were all single. “We were in a really different place back then,” Mr. Damari said.', 'On Thursday, he was in Florida to watch the launch with his wife and two children. “I never imagined my big boy is five years old and actually the age he will remember,” Mr. Damari said.', "The mission control room in Yehud during a last drill before Thursday's launch.", 'If No One Owns the Moon, Can Anyone Make Money Up There?', "An earlier version of this article misstated the English name of Mare Serenitatis, the part of the moon where SpaceIL's Beresheet spacecraft will land. It is the Sea of Serenity, not the Sea of Tranquility.", 'Kenneth Chang has been at The Times since 2000, writing about physics, geology, chemistry, and the planets. Before becoming a science writer, he was a graduate student whose research involved the control of chaos.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


All the Pink Dresses on the Oscars Red Carpet in One Handy Place
['Julia Roberts, Gemma Chan and Helen Mirren were among many at the Academy Awards clad in pink. Let’s look!', 'Pink, a color famously associated with a generation of people who are no longer young, had a star turn at the Academy Awards tonight!', 'What follows are pictures of people (actors) wearing pink on the red carpet, along with some commentary from people (writers) on Twitter about the #trend.', 'Julia Roberts didn’t show up until the end — when she presented the award for Best Picture — but she wore the color of the night, with heels to match.', 'Helen Mirren, wearing a long-sleeve layered number with accordion pleats, gave us grown-up princess vibes.', "Helen Mirren, you're a dream!", 'We loved the mix of modern prairie-style and toxic Pepto-Bismol pink worn by the illustrious Gemma Chan.', 'Linda Cardellini, another person who heard the call of the fashion gods (who, thus, spake and said: “Wear pink”).', 'Linda Cardellini, wrapped up like a package.', 'Was it all a statement?', 'Marie Kondo, looking sparkly and tidy.', 'Here is more pink, courtesy of Angela Bassett. Bow down.', 'Angela Bassett, a queen in all shades, but especially fuschia.', 'Sarah Paulson’s hot pink cutout dress might ... have ... had ... pockets?', 'Sarah Paulson, glam.', 'Hey, even this couple wore pink!', 'Jason Momoa and Lisa Bonet in dusty pink tones.', 'And here’s Awkwafina with a sparkly pink suit. We love it!', 'Awkwafina, hiiii!', 'But wait there’s more.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


When Will the End of Gender Arrive on the Red Carpet?
['When Will the End of Gender Arrive on the Red Carpet?', 'When Will the End of Gender Arrive on the Red Carpet?', 'With Billy Porter, Elsie Fisher and a few others at the Oscars tonight, the red carpet is only barely starting to discover a fabulous third way to be.', 'The 2019 Oscars red carpets got off to an exciting start early with the arrival of the actor Billy Porter in a flowing Christian Siriano design.', 'Billy Porter, being adjusted on the red carpet.', 'The designer tweeted out video of the gown in action. Then Mr. Porter went off to commentate for ABC with a big sparkly cocktail ring on his finger.', 'Anddddd flip!!', 'Elsie Fisher, the 15-year-old star of the film “Eighth Grade,” showed up in a three-piece suit. This is a daring look — simply because vests are not generally a hot red carpet look. That’s what’s very bold here!', 'Elsie Fisher.', 'It was also something of a surprise that the fashion was so traditional considering Timothée Chalamet and Michael B. Jordan showed up on red carpets earlier this year in harnesses that some found gender-disruptive in a way that no one could quite put their finger on — and in a way that women in suits are not.', 'What is gender? We do not know. Apparently people can wear anything!', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Fashion Review: No Sex, No Politics, No Risk
['Ferragamo and Missoni paid homage to family values. Armani played a rhapsody in blue. Versace celebrated grunge. And then there was Marni.', 'MILAN — The awards red carpet is not the only fashion show that seems to have fallen relatively silent on the subject of #MeToo: the runways, which in recent seasons focused broadly on a redefinition of female empowerment, at least as far as it relates to image, have almost entirely dropped that theme.', 'Instead, they were dominated by — family values! Not of the far-right kind; of the most branded, uncontroversial, personal/company history kind.', 'You can understand it: The past is so much more predictable than the fuzzy danger of whatever is to come. But it doesn’t always make for the most compelling clothes, even if both men and women are walking the runway. Especially when viewed through a sepia-tinged lens.', 'Or one washed in electric aquamarine. See Missoni, where the whole room was bathed in a cerulean light meant to represent a “door that connects different moments in the history of a fashion house,” like a magical wormhole in space and time leading to a moment in the mid-1970s (according to the show notes) when women wore enveloping striped capes, chunky zigzag coats, thin swishy trousers and long metallic sheaths. Also arm warmers, big neck doilies and little rolled-brim beanie caps. And men sported a lot of chevrons.', 'Don’t like the abstracted tiger print in blue, brown and cream that Paul Surridge created at Roberto Cavalli (which might have looked like sine waves or topographic lines if you didn’t know the house’s history)? Here it is in black and white. Or in pastels. You can have it as a high/low dress or a suit or a long-sleeved turtleneck and pleated midi skirt. Or you can forget all about it and try on a python tailcoat. Or a white tux.', 'At least at his own dual gender show, Giorgio Armani went all-in for one idea. That the idea happened to be (drumroll, please) blue! somewhat lessened its impact, but give him credit for stick-to-it-ness.', 'There were neat black jackets, with a slim squiggle of blue running down the center, over jodhpur pants. Trapeze swings of black and blue with rosettes encrusted around the hem. Glossy black velvet and one-shouldered beaded tops. More jodhpurs. More variations on the theme in minutely detailed bows and swirls and swags. Assorted tuxes. It was all very 50 shades of classic Armani, the executive kind.', 'While at Versace, it was very grunge, the defanged kind.', 'Which is why it was something of a relief to discover that Stella Jean, the most convincing of all the New Gen designers in Milan, had the courage to take an old trope — Le Grand Tour — and break out of its Eurocentric mold. She reimagined it as an experience that included Africa and Polynesia, with establishment silks and stripes and Gauguin references; red leather giraffes roaming across a field of python-print jersey.', 'And that, at Marni, Francesco Risso had eschewed decade-hopping and heritage-referencing to actually dare to delve into the scary subject: eroticism.', 'Indecipherable? So, kind of, was the collection, which was full of contradictory impulses and a frenetic undone-ness: slithery red and white and black pajama silks and nightgowns, sliced-up suiting, pixelated prints; and connected in odd ways by rows of rings and chain link harnesses, twists and turns.', 'Sometimes the contortions were hard to follow. But at least he is trying for something new, trying to figure out where we go from here. Trying to give women (he has not combined his collections) a new, as opposed to old, way to express themselves.', 'That’s what has been missing from Milan most of the week: that kind of ambition, that kind of willingness to take risks. So you stumble. So what? That’s how we fall into the future. And when we do, we need something to wear.', "Vanessa Friedman is The Times's fashion director and chief fashion critic. She was previously the fashion editor of the Financial Times.", 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


The San Vicente Bungalows: Hollywood’s New Clubhouse
['Jeff Klein’s latest hotel project protects celebrities and power brokers with a ban on cameraphones.', 'Throwing shade: Privacy is the primary luxury of the space, a former druggie motel.', 'WEST HOLLYWOOD, Calif. — The problem with stardom, most any star will tell you, is you can’t turn it off anymore. Certain protocols used to apply when it came to sightings of famous folk in public. But that was in the bygone days of the Brown Derby or Chasen’s, about a billion “creepshots” ago.', 'Now, of course, it is next to impossible for people like Jennifer Aniston or Justin Timberlake to do the boringly normal stuff the rest of us take for granted. And that realization was at the core of an idea the hotelier Jeffrey Klein had for a personal second act.', 'After more than a decade operating the celebrity petting zoo that is Sunset Tower Hotel and its now-storied Tower Bar, Mr. Klein understood better than most that the one craving that famous people cannot satisfy is to get their anonymity back.', 'It has been 15 years since Mr. Klein and his partners paid $18 million for the Sunset Tower, a faded Art Deco relic on a stretch of Sunset Strip that, although now booming, had fallen into funky desuetude. Against most odds and all prevailing wisdom, he soon established it and its Tower Bar restaurant as essential landmarks of the new Hollywood.', 'The Tower Bar, in particular, quickly evolved into the preferred watering hole of studio moguls, literary agents, fashion designers, power brokers and A-list movie stars, who prized Mr. Klein’s ability to reconcile the paradox that the famous experience the same giddiness we all do when exposed to others of their kind. Unlike ordinary mortals, though, they also yearn to recapture the privacy whose loss is the price tag of modern celebrity.', 'Jeff Klein at the entrance of his new venture.', 'Instead Mr. Klein pursued a challenge equal to that first presented by the Sunset Tower. “I like dumps, and I like places with ghosts,” he said. Both, as it happened, were to be found under his nose at a druggie, clothing-optional motel complex blocks away from Sunset Tower in West Hollywood, a cluster of bungalows erected in the late 19th century as housing for workers laying railway lines to the coast.', 'Not everyone would have detected in this collection of listing frame structures the potential for a private club that would make getting into Tower Bar seem almost as easy as grabbing a booth at IHOP.', 'But Mr. Klein had long nurtured a dream of recreating in Los Angeles a members-only gathering place on the order of Annabel’s, a London nightclub founded in 1963 in what had been a coal cellar by the aristocratic British entrepreneur Mark Birley and distinguished by a clientele that, over the years, included royals and Frank Sinatra, Aristotle Onassis and Kate Moss.', 'Not coincidentally, this interest coincided with a growing trend in Los Angeles, as elsewhere, for people to come together in upscale public settings not unlike social versions of a gated community.', 'Clubs are far from new in Los Angeles, of course, their long history likely beginning with the “gentlemen-only” California Club, which opened over a livery stable in 1887, followed eight years later with establishment of the staid Jonathan Club, whose headquarters still occupy almost a block of prime real estate in the city’s downtown (with another outpost on an unrivaled stretch of beach in Santa Monica).', 'Dimitri Dimitrov, Mr. Klein’s right hand man, surrounded by staff at a pre-meal meeting in the main dining room of the San Vicente Bungalows.', 'But it was Soho House that jolted the social landscape of Los Angeles with its opening nearly 10 years ago in a glass-box building along Sunset Boulevard just shy of Beverly Hills.', 'That perspective shifted, Mr. Klein said, when membership in Soho House boomed and the agents, actors, producers, publicists and studio executives that had long patronized his restaurant and hotel began clamoring to get in. “It pricked up my ears to see how successful it was," Mr. Klein said.', 'Rather than a membership roster drawn from a relatively broad swath of the local population, however, Mr. Klein envisioned for the San Vicente Bungalows a more tightly edited group of those representing the ecosystem he knows best: one composed principally of apex predators.', 'It was a chilly afternoon and Mr. Klein, 48, was seated in the forecourt of his new nine-bungalow complex dressed in a tan Boglioli blazer, a Brunello Cucinelli button-down and a rumpled pair of Acne jeans. The San Vicente club was fresh from a six-year renovation estimated to have cost $50 million — nearly $2 million of it allocated for gardens in which transplanted, century-old California pepper trees now shade lattice walls of espaliered kumquats — and there were glitches.', 'Crisp uniforms at the "SVB," as it will perhaps be known.', 'The power was dead in three electrical sockets in the club’s cozy living room, where the screenwriter Robert Harling (“Steel Magnolias”) sat in a corner tapping on an iPad. Vintage glass candy jars of peanut M&Ms were arranged on a console, but not precisely to Mr. Klein’s liking. A waitress attired in an aproned uniform from Mercatores, a Milanese livery shop, had set a lunch table backward, knife to the left and fork on the right.', 'Though by his own admission a “control freak,” Mr. Klein’s public face is one of affability and disarming bonhomie; he is perhaps unique as a businessman in his deployment of “I love you” as an all-purpose term of greeting and farewell.', 'Aaaah! Sink into the aquamarine screening-room chairs.', 'The napkins recall the colors at the Beverly Hills hotel.', 'Glance around, though, and no street artists are to be found. There is, however, Mr. Dimitrov — who followed Mr. Klein here from the Tower Bar, his ostentatious hospitableness intact though his striped suits traded for knit Armani blazers and sneakers from Comme des Garçons — escorting Lorne Michaels to a table in the candlelit dining room.', 'In its design, the club’s interior courtyard allows for clear sightlines on almost every entrance and exit. And here, in fact, much like Tracy Lord skipping down the front steps of her Main Line mansion in “The Philadelphia Story” comes Hannah Bronfman, the D.J. heiress, descending from one of the club’s nine private bedrooms to duck beneath a bower of pink bougainvillea. And there, hunched with a script in a rattan cafe chair, sits Armie Hammer. And here is John Mayer, feet shod in Visvims and propped on a coffee table.', 'While elsewhere in town, van loads of tourists are being carted around to view houses once inhabited by movie stars gone and long forgotten, at San Vicente Bungalows the live ones disport themselves.', "No 'Gramming at the inn: A staffer applies a sticker to a cameraphone.", 'As if to underscore that notion, members and guests at the club sign a code-of-conduct contract upon entry and surrender their phones to desk attendants dressed in piped rowing blazers. The phones are returned to them, of course, but only after the camera lens has been covered with a sticker bearing the logo of the club.', 'In Mr. Klein’s world, the paparazzi that routinely bribe servers and slip weekly updated price lists to parking valets for celebrity tipoffs may be a necessary evil. Instagram is the enemy. “We live in this connected world where no one is really connected,” he said, adding that if his experience at Sunset Tower alerted him to anything it was a need to create a “safe zone” for those people whose faces beam out at us from the covers of the tabloids.', "What is never in short supply is the hypnotic pull those on the inside exert on the rest of us and the sense that life would far better if you could only join the club. And that is Mr. Klein's fundamental proposition at both the Tower Bar and his San Vicente Bungalows.", 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Goa CM discharged from hospital
['Ailing Goa Chief Minister Manohar Parrikar was on Tuesday evening discharged from Goa Medical College & Hospital (GMC), where he was being treated since Saturday for complications arising from advanced pancreatic cancer. Mr. Parrikar was admitted on Saturday following internal bleeding.', 'An official statement said, “Chief Minister has been discharged from GMC. His health parameters are stable. Will continue with his treatment at home.” He was taken to his private residence after his discharge.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Election Commission monitoring happenings on the border: Ashok Lavasa
['The Election Commission of India (ECI) on Tuesday said it is keeping an eye on developments along the India-Pakistan border, while being “constitutionally bound to perform its duties”.', 'The ECI team held meetings with political parties, police officials, senior bureaucrats, heads of nodal agencies, railways and postal officials to take stock of the situation.', 'Asked about the complaint of inclusion of 44 lakh bogus voters in the electoral list submitted by Maharashtra Pradesh Congress Committee, Mr. Lavasa said he will be replying to the complainant with ‘action taken’ within 15 days. As per the final publication of electoral rolls on January 31, 2019, the State has 8,73,30,484 voters, of whom 4,57,02,579 are male and 4,16,25,819 female. The State has 2,086 third-gender voters.', 'During the forthcoming elections, for the first time, accessibility observers will be appointed. At least one polling station managed by women will be in each Assembly segment in the State.', 'Maharashtra has 95,473 polling stations at 49,284 polling locations. The Income Tax Department will deploy quick-response teams throughout the State. In addition, 942 flying squads, 1,013 static surveillance teams, 705 video surveillance teams and 288 video viewing teams are being formed.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Probe ordered into Pune lathicharge
['Hearing and speech-impaired youths from across the State continue their protest on Tuesday in Pune.', 'The government on Tuesday announced a probe into the alleged police excesses on specially-abled students in Pune on Monday. At least 35 students were injured when the police resorted to lathi-charge nearly 11,000 protesters gathered outside the Collector’s office.', 'Earlier, proceedings in the Council were disrupted after sloganeering from Opposition, who demanded immediate suspension of police personnel involved in the incident. The Shiv Sena went a step further demanding a judicial probe from a retired justice to look into the police excesses. Raising the issue, Leader of the Opposition Dhananjay Munde said the students were demanding rights to quality education, and protesting against distribution of fraudulent certificates (disability) in the Government offices. “If their demands were met at the district level they would not have felt the need to stage a protest in the first place,” said Mr. Munde.', 'Mr. Patil assured members of the House that Minister for Social Justice Dilip Kamble would be deputed by the government to negotiate demands presented by students. “The demands are being considered and we are hopeful of a resolution at the earliest. Meanwhile, we assure action against those who are responsible for the lattice charge,” Mr. Patil said.', 'The Shiv Sena demanded the roll back of the transfer orders issued for the State Commissioner for Persons with Disabilities. Shiv Sena MLC Neelam Gorhe said the government will only suspend a few officers who will resume duty after challenging the order in an administrative tribunal. “The least State must do is to set up a judicial probe,” she said. Senior leaders of the Nationalist Congress Party (NCP) said Chief Minister must tender an unconditional apology to the students. “Why make police a scapegoat. It is the CM who must answer for this action since he is also the home minister,” said senior NCP legislator Vidya Chavan.', 'In the Assembly, Parliamentary Affairs Minister and Pune guardian minister Girish Bapat assured members that the incident would be probed and action taken against the guilty.', 'Mr. Bapat said that the state government has accepted the demands and the protesters will be given priority in jobs.', 'Social Justice Minister Rajkumar Badole said demands of the students have been discussed at the government level and meetings held with Chief Minister.', 'Leader of Opposition in the Assembly Radhakrishna Vikhe-Patil demanded strict action against police officials for ordering lathicharge. He demanded that officials concerned be suspended immediately.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Smaller parties tug at alliance partners’ coat-tails in Maharashtra
['Mumbai: The four major political parties, the ruling Shiv Sena, the Bharatiya Janata Party (BJP) and the Opposition Congress and Nationalist Congress Party (NCP) may have announced alliances for the forthcoming general elections, but are finding it tough to keep their smaller partners happy, with some even threatening to contest out of the alliances.', 'For the ruling partners Sena and BJP, Ramdas Athawale, Minister of State for Social Justice and Empowerment in the Union government and president of the Republican Party of India (RPI) is proving to be a headache. Mr. Athawale had announced he would contest from the Mumbai South-Central Lok Sabha seat, which Rahul Shewale of the Sena holds. But with the Sena and BJP sealing their alliance, Mr. Athawale is left with no seat to contest.', 'Another NDA constituent, Mahadev Jankar of the Rashtriya Samaj Party (RSP), has demanded five LS seats from Maharashtra. Party spokesperson Laxman Hake reiterated the demand in Pune on Monday. Mr. Jankar, who claims to enjoy the support of the Dhangar community, has organised a party rally in Mumbai on March 5 where he is likely to raise the demand again.', 'For the Opposition, the trouble continues in the form of Swabhimani Shetkari Sanghatana (SSS), led by Raju Shetty, MP. Apart from Hatkanangle, Mr. Shetty is demanding Buldhana and Wardha from the Congress-NCP alliance. The Samajwadi Party too is demanding a seat from the Congress.', 'While Prakash Ambedkar has formed an alliance with the AIMIM, the Congress continues to woo him in the opposition, without the AIMIM. “He has demanded the RSS be brought under the Constitution. Our president Rahul Gandhi is fighting a case against the RSS in the court. What can be greater proof of our commitment to fight the RSS? We wish to see Amabedkarji with us to contest these elections,” according to Ashish Dua, secretary, AICC with responsibility of Maharashtra.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Selma Blair Discusses Multiple Sclerosis, and Many Hear Their Own Story
['Selma Blair arrived at the Vanity Fair Oscar party on Sunday in Los Angeles.', 'The actress Selma Blair appeared at the Vanity Fair Oscar party on Sunday evening wearing a diaphanous Ralph & Russo gown and carrying a custom-made cane covered in black patent leather.', 'Ms. Blair, who has appeared in movies including “Cruel Intentions,” “Legally Blonde” and “Hellboy,” said she had been experiencing symptoms at least since her son was born in 2011. She said she did her best to handle the intense fatigue, emotional distress and loss of physical control. But the disease was not formally diagnosed until August.', 'Ms. Blair’s voice wavered as she spoke, and she noted that she had spasmodic dysphonia, a condition that makes it hard to control the muscles in the larynx. But for many people who have multiple sclerosis, her words came through loud and clear.', 'Josie Benassi, 47, caught the interview on television on Tuesday at her home in Reading, Mass. She received her diagnosis of M.S. in 2009, and like Ms. Blair, she had experienced symptoms for years before that.', 'It started when she was a teenager and the vision in her left eye suddenly got fuzzy. There were additional small warning signs as the years went on, but things took a serious turn about 10 years ago when she took her children to an ice-skating rink and realized she couldn’t stay upright on her skates.', 'Sometimes Ms. Benassi got tired. Sometimes she lost her balance. Sometimes her left leg just stopped working. For years, she has been learning to live with the symptoms.', 'She said she was happy to see Ms. Blair talk about the disease with candor. “It’s so good that she’s out there, just showing people that it’s O.K.,” Ms. Benassi said.', 'Carol Ann Justice, 45, runs a Facebook group for people with multiple sclerosis and said she received her diagnosis six years ago but felt symptoms long before that. “Selma is definitely correct by saying that doctors don’t hear you, and chalk up your symptoms to tiredness or anxiety, especially for a woman,” she said.', 'Researchers have not been able to pinpoint what exactly triggers the disease. It appears to be partly genetic, but several other factors — including low levels of vitamin D, childhood obesity and smoking — could also play a role.', 'She added that the disease could be difficult to diagnose early because the symptoms — like numbness, tingling or fatigue — can have a wide range of causes outside of multiple sclerosis.', 'Most people with the disease have the “relapsing-remitting” form of M.S., which means that they experience a cycle of worsening and recovery.', 'Treatment can come in the form of steroids, which help people to recover from relapses, or disease-modifying therapies, which come in many forms but generally tend to focus on managing symptoms in the long term.', 'For Ms. Benassi, one more thing stood out about Ms. Blair’s television appearance: the cane. During the interview, the actress pointed out that the walking aid was adorned with a real pink diamond. “How can we make canes chic?” Ms. Blair asked.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


‘Executing Babies’: Here Are the Facts Behind Trump’s Misleading Abortion Tweet
['Infants are rarely born alive after abortion procedures, and if they are, doctors do not kill them.', 'President Trump was reacting to a measure in the Senate, sponsored by Senator Ben Sasse, Republican of Nebraska, that would penalize doctors for failing to provide medical care for babies born alive after attempted abortions.', 'The latest battle in the nation’s continuing war over abortion involves a federal bill called the Born-Alive Abortion Survivors Protection Act. Senate Democrats this week blocked the bill from reaching a vote, and President Trump responded with an angry tweet.', 'Senate Democrats just voted against legislation to prevent the killing of newborn infant children. The Democrat position on abortion is now so extreme that they don’t mind executing babies AFTER birth....', 'What would the bill do?', 'Senator Ben Sasse, the Nebraska Republican who is the author of the bill, had called it an “infanticide ban.” Opponents said that the bill was aimed at discouraging doctors from performing legal abortions and that it was unnecessary because a similar law already exists, the Born-Alive Infants Protection Act of 2002.', 'How often are infants born alive after attempted abortions?', 'It hardly ever happens, according to Dr. Daniel Grossman, a professor of obstetrics, gynecology and reproductive sciences at the University of California, San Francisco. He performs abortions and is a spokesman for the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, where he leads a committee on health care for underserved women.', 'A healthy fetus becomes viable — potentially able to survive outside the womb — at about 24 weeks of pregnancy. Only about 1.3 percent of abortions in the United States in 2015 were performed in or after the 21st week of pregnancy, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. Less than 1 percent of all abortions are done after 24 weeks, and many are performed because the fetus has a fatal condition or the pregnant woman’s life or health is at severe risk.', 'If an abortion is performed at 20 weeks or later, a drug may be injected to stop the fetal heartbeat before the fetus comes out of the womb, Dr. Grossman said. In other cases, suction devices and other instruments end the fetus’s life before it is removed, he said.', 'What happens in rare cases when a baby is born alive after a pregnancy is cut short?', 'Dr. Grossman said there were painful situations in which the fetus might be at the edge of viability and labor must be induced to save the mother’s life. For instance, a condition called pre-eclampsia, involving high blood pressure and other problems, can kill both mother and fetus, and in most cases the only treatment is to deliver the baby. If it seems unlikely that the baby will survive, the family may choose to provide just comfort care — wrapping and cuddling the baby — and allow the child to die naturally without extreme attempts at resuscitation.', 'The bill would force doctors to resuscitate such an infant, even if the parents did not want those measures, said Dr. Jennifer Conti, an obstetrician gynecologist who is a fellow of Physicians for Reproductive Health, an advocacy group. Doctors who violated the law would be subject to criminal penalties, as would anyone who saw the violation and failed to report it, she said.', 'Dr. Conti, a clinical assistant professor of obstetrics and gynecology at Stanford University, who also performs abortions, said a patient recently had an abortion at 23 weeks because the fetus had severe abnormalities that were considered incompatible with life.', 'The woman chose not to have the injection to stop the fetal heartbeat, preferring that her fetus die a natural death. The death occurred during the procedure, before the fetus left the womb, Dr. Conti said. Had it not, she added, comfort care would have been provided.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'Denise Grady has been a science reporter for The Times since 1998. She wrote “Deadly Invaders,” a book about emerging viruses.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


In Show of Bipartisanship, House Approves a Sweeping Land Conservation Bill
['Zabriskie Point in Death Valley National Park, one of the parks that would expand under the bill.', 'Want climate news in your inbox?', 'Lawmakers and environmentalists celebrated passage of the bill as a victory for bipartisanship and conservation.', 'Mr. Grijalva is one of several Western lawmakers from both parties who have worked for four years on the bill.', 'Senator Lisa Murkowski of Alaska, the lead author of the bill, on Capitol Hill on Tuesday.', 'The bill is packed with parochial provisions designed to help the home states and districts of its authors. Among those is a provision for a land transfer in La Paz County, Ariz., to allow for the development of a solar farm, and a land exchange of 360 acres in Custer County, S.D., to allow the county to expand its airport.', 'Among the most consequential provisions is the permanent reauthorization of the Land and Water Conservation Fund, a federal program established in the 1960s that uses fees and royalties paid by oil and gas companies drilling in federal waters to pay for onshore conservation programs.', 'Although the program has long enjoyed bipartisan support, Congress typically renews it for only a few years at a time, and it expired on Sept. 30 and has not been renewed. The new public lands package would authorize the program permanently, ending its long cycle of nearing or passing expiration and awaiting congressional renewal.', 'The bill would designate 1.3 million acres in Utah, New Mexico, Oregon and California as wilderness, the most stringent level of federal land protection. It prohibits any development and the use of most motorized vehicles. And the bill creates less-stringent but permanent protections for land in Montana and Washington State.', 'The home of the civil rights activists Medgar and Myrlie Evers in Jackson, Miss., would become a national monument under the measure.', 'It would also classify approximately 225 miles of river in Massachusetts and Connecticut and 280 miles of river in Oregon as wild, scenic or recreational.', 'It would add approximately 40,000 acres of federal land to the Death Valley and Joshua Tree National Parks and Mojave National Preserve.', 'Coral Davenport covers energy and environmental policy, with a focus on climate change, from the Washington bureau. She joined The Times in 2013 and previously worked at Congressional Quarterly, Politico and National Journal.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Watch: Rapid fire with Rujuta Diwekar
["Rujuta Diwekar is an acclaimed nutritionist and diet coach to the stars. She helped Kareena Kapoor get into the shape everybody envied! With the ways she preaches the health benefits of desi food, she has a lot of fans.  She sat down for an exclusive interview with us where we conducted a fun rapid-fire session with her. She answered all the burning questions, choosing her favourite and the healthiest option from dal chawal, salads, ghee, oil, milk, haldi, green tea and everybody's favourite adrak vali chai! In an effort to connect people with their roots and make a healthier choice, she is helping people stay in shape, one day at a time. From saying no to the latest fads, crash dieting and recommending an internet fasting to detox the body, Rujuta preaches an important mantra- only eat what passes the famous grandmother test.  Simply said, desi Indian ghar ka khaana is the best for you.Watch this video to know more!", 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Fitness rapid fire with Claudia Ciesla
["Claudia Ciesla has been in the industry for long and is a certified nutritionist and wellness coach, with a book to her name, 'Keep Eating Keep Losing'. The actress maintains such a fit body, you cannot help but envy her. In case you think that Claudia eats clean and healthy all the time, think again. She is just a foodie like you and me! We caught up with the actress in an exclusive interview where she talked about her fitness secrets, what she likes to cheat on and her favourite workout routine. We conducted a special fitness rapid fire with the former Bigg Boss contestant and quizzed her on many secrets. She also revealed that she has a sweet tooth and can't say no to Indian sweets like ladoo and Barfi! She also revealed who among Bollywood she considers the fittest and the strongest. She is also a great supporter of yoga and meditation and considers it as one of the biggest things which have helped her stay fit. To know more, watch the video!", 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Make your own cough syrup at home
["Suffering from a severe bout of cold and cough that just won’t go away? Is your nose so congested that you are not able to breathe properly and your voice sounds like a croaked frog? Battling cough is especially annoying if you have an important presentation or meeting coming up. After all, you want people to take you seriously, instead of paying attention to your croaked voice. While the weather continues to get worst (hello chilly winters), there is no escape from sneezing co-workers and coughing commuters.So, if you have been struggling with a terrible cough for the last few days, we may have the perfect solution for you. (You don't have to step out of the comfort of your home)Try these DIY cough syrup remedies and you will be good to go!", 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Nutritionist Kavita Devgan's diabetes prevention diet
["Diabetes is the biggest lifestyle problem we are facing today. We all think of ways to keep ourselves at bay but can it actually be cured? We spoke to nutritionist Kavita Devgan who busted some myths for you about suggests a diet plan which can be easily followed by everyone. According to her, diabetes cannot be cured but you can easily cut down your risk and prevent the disease by following a rich and nutritious diet. She also listed down 6 foods which are known to fight diabetes at the root level and keep your body fit. According to her, you should absolutely include foods like Barley, spinach, apples, egg yolk, nuts and seeds as well as spices which contain plenty of vitamins and proteins which increase insulin production.Barley, which has a high fibre contain delays digestion and in doing so, stops the sugar levels from spiking up. Rich veggies and fruits like apples and spinach have high Vitamin A and magnesium content in them which keep the body healthy. Also, make sure to have egg yolk in your everyday diet which has a high Omega3 and DHA levels which cut down inflammation and ultimately reduce the diabetes risk. Again, there is a very valid reason why you shouldn't be skipping out on nuts and seeds on your diet. They contain a lot of important vitamins like globulins, L-arginine, resveratrol and good anti-oxidants which keep the risk away. So, it's time you make a healthy choice with your diet if you want to keep diabetes away.", 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...
['There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', 'Did you know that while building this wonder fo the world, Gustave Eiffel had put a small secret apartment inside it. Only the lucky few had access—Thomas Edison was one such VIP. Located on the third level of the tower, Eiffel’s private apartment was not large, but it was cozy. The apartment is on display for visitors to come and peer into through windows.', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Weekly Books News (Feb 4-10)
["Watch this week's top books news!", 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?
["If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", 'Watch this fun video and share it now!', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Valentine's Day Special: 3 ways to use a red lipstick
['Love red lipstick? Try our make-up look using one red lipstick for the love season!', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


10 early signs of pregnancy
['There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!
["Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!", "Take a look at all the seven days of the Valentine's week.", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!", 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", 'Valentine’s Day 2019: Here’s how people are planning to celebrate V-Day!', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Virat's V-Day post for Anushka will give you some serious relationship goals!", "Jacqueline's celebrates V-day with her team!"]


Get New Year ready with this homemade weight loss drink
['One of most awaited parties of the year is not so far away. With not many days left in hand, we all will reach out to fad diets that promise to make us lose weight in a short time. But fad diets, as we all know, do more harm than good. They may help you lose weight but may compromise on your immunity and overall health. Experts and doctors recommend not to follow fad diets under any condition. Then what should one do? A healthy and balanced diet along with regular exercise definitely helps one with healthy weight loss. But with just 10 days to go for the New year party, this would not be enough.Here’s the video of a detox drink that promises to make you lose belly fat and makes you overall fit if consumed for one week regularly before bedtime.', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Selma Blair Discusses Multiple Sclerosis, and Many Hear Their Own Story
['Selma Blair arrived at the Vanity Fair Oscar party on Sunday in Los Angeles.', 'The actress Selma Blair appeared at the Vanity Fair Oscar party on Sunday evening wearing a diaphanous Ralph & Russo gown and carrying a custom-made cane covered in black patent leather.', 'Ms. Blair, who has appeared in movies including “Cruel Intentions,” “Legally Blonde” and “Hellboy,” said she had been experiencing symptoms at least since her son was born in 2011. She said she did her best to handle the intense fatigue, emotional distress and loss of physical control. But the disease was not formally diagnosed until August.', 'Ms. Blair’s voice wavered as she spoke, and she noted that she had spasmodic dysphonia, a condition that makes it hard to control the muscles in the larynx. But for many people who have multiple sclerosis, her words came through loud and clear.', 'Josie Benassi, 47, caught the interview on television on Tuesday at her home in Reading, Mass. She received her diagnosis of M.S. in 2009, and like Ms. Blair, she had experienced symptoms for years before that.', 'It started when she was a teenager and the vision in her left eye suddenly got fuzzy. There were additional small warning signs as the years went on, but things took a serious turn about 10 years ago when she took her children to an ice-skating rink and realized she couldn’t stay upright on her skates.', 'Sometimes Ms. Benassi got tired. Sometimes she lost her balance. Sometimes her left leg just stopped working. For years, she has been learning to live with the symptoms.', 'She said she was happy to see Ms. Blair talk about the disease with candor. “It’s so good that she’s out there, just showing people that it’s O.K.,” Ms. Benassi said.', 'Carol Ann Justice, 45, runs a Facebook group for people with multiple sclerosis and said she received her diagnosis six years ago but felt symptoms long before that. “Selma is definitely correct by saying that doctors don’t hear you, and chalk up your symptoms to tiredness or anxiety, especially for a woman,” she said.', 'Researchers have not been able to pinpoint what exactly triggers the disease. It appears to be partly genetic, but several other factors — including low levels of vitamin D, childhood obesity and smoking — could also play a role.', 'She added that the disease could be difficult to diagnose early because the symptoms — like numbness, tingling or fatigue — can have a wide range of causes outside of multiple sclerosis.', 'Most people with the disease have the “relapsing-remitting” form of M.S., which means that they experience a cycle of worsening and recovery.', 'Treatment can come in the form of steroids, which help people to recover from relapses, or disease-modifying therapies, which come in many forms but generally tend to focus on managing symptoms in the long term.', 'For Ms. Benassi, one more thing stood out about Ms. Blair’s television appearance: the cane. During the interview, the actress pointed out that the walking aid was adorned with a real pink diamond. “How can we make canes chic?” Ms. Blair asked.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Modern Love: Tiny Love Stories: Australia Edition
['Modern Love in miniature, featuring reader-submitted stories of no more than 100 words. For this issue, we sought stories from our Australian readers.', "My grandmother's blurry picture.", 'Together at her family farm.', 'The white dress.', 'Our airport engagement.', "The groom's friend, Ed, closing the  barn door.", 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Mind: When the Bully Is the Boss
['Leadership figures such as Bobby Knight, the Indiana University basketball coach and author of “The Power of Negative Thinking,” enjoy a presumption that being tough gets results, but researchers say there is no evidence to support that notion.', 'Steve Jobs, the co-founder of Apple.', 'But researchers who study organizations, productivity and leadership styles attribute the achievements of such figures to exceptional ability.', 'The study of leadership style has blossomed in the last decade. Psychologists, business analysts and organization experts have conducted all kinds of investigations, from anonymous surveys of employees to studies of worker behavior over time. Various measures of productivity, performance and well-being have been called upon.', 'By nature, any study of group dynamics in a real-world setting is plagued by design limitations, including the lack of a control group and the hidden personal grievances of the employees. But the vast majority of findings point to the same conclusion: Bullying bosses tend to undermine their own teams. Morale and company loyalty plunge, tardiness increases and sick days are more frequent.', 'In Ms. Klobuchar’s case, any discussion of leadership style invites suspicion of a double standard based on gender. That double standard certainly exists; in many situations, male leaders are given greater leeway to be tough.', 'Although some reports of Senator Amy Klobuchar’s volatile leadership style have raised suspicion of sexism, researchers say women are no less likely than men to be abusive as bosses.', 'If an abusive management style provides so little benefit, then why do so many abusive managers and bosses rise in organizations? One clue comes from social psychologists who have studied how teams of people behave and solve problems in the absence of a hierarchy.', 'Leaders tend to emerge organically, and common traits of those who assume the role include boldness, a healthy ego and a sense of entitlement. Confidence, too: People who take charge in these simulations tend to be decisive, making calls from the gut, and quickly.', 'A series of studies led by Jennifer Overbeck, an associate professor of management at Melbourne Business School, has found that, in simulated work groups, people gave high ratings to leaders who made quick decisions, particularly in moral dilemmas. It’s not that snap decisions were correct more often than deliberate ones. Rather, they were perceived to be more correct, and the decision maker seemed more morally assured than other potential leaders.', 'As these individuals rise through the ranks, they internalize the belief that they are natural, morally instinctual leaders. This belief, in turn, affects how they view the people under them.', 'Dr. Overbeck and Vitaliya Droutman of the University of Southern California randomly assigned 50 students to groups, to be managers or team members. The researchers administered a series of standard tests to gauge how the participants judged their own traits and others’.', 'The managers were aware of their own personal strengths and weaknesses, but also concluded that their staff members “shared their negative, but not their positive, traits and feelings.” That is, managers often misread team members’ emotions as being in line with their own — “She’s as frustrated with herself as I am” — even though this often is not the case.', 'Abusive supervisors come in many flavors, including the insecure, the overmatched and the garden-variety sadist who picks on underlings solely for the pleasure of exercising power. But even mini-tantrums and put-downs can be counterproductive, undermining the efforts of a normally civil person and an otherwise effective boss.', 'Picture a Leader. Is She a Woman?', 'Why Do We Reward Bullies?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


in her words: Taking Back ‘Hysterical’
['Serena Williams’s new all-female Nike ad, “Dream Crazier,” hit on an issue almost as old as time: the “hysterical” woman.', 'Welcome to In Her Words, where women rule the headlines.', 'Women being labeled hysterical or crazy as a way to degrade them dates back centuries. “Hysteria” — which comes from the Greek word for womb, hystera — was one of the first mental health conditions attributed to only women.', 'The real politicization of the word, Showalter said, began around 1890 with the early suffrage movement and the rise of “the new woman”: an independent, challenging, confident, adventurous woman who laid claim to her emotions.', 'During that time, hysterical and crazy were used mostly against two groups of women: those demanding entry to universities, particularly medical schools (“they’re going to overwork their brains” was an argument) and women who spoke publicly (they were seen as “abnormal, threatening and repulsive,” according to Showalter).', 'From left, Awkwafina and John Mulaney presented the Oscar for best documentary short to Melissa Berton and Rayka Zehtabchi.', 'What you might have missed was that an anonymous Oscar voter called the movie “icky” on his ballot.', 'Here are five articles from The Times you might have missed.', 'The challengers (namely Maryland, Tennessee and West Virginia) argued that the amendment had not been properly adopted or that it was unconstitutional.', 'After the court’s ruling, Alice Paul, vice president of the National Woman’s Party, declared the decision a “final and complete official recognition of the victory of a 72-year campaign by the women of the United States.” Next up, she said, was the fight for equality in political office, marriage, property, wages and children.', 'Are you on Instagram?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Extreme Weather Can Feel ‘Normal’ After Just a Few Years, Study Finds
['Want climate news in your inbox?', 'But if extreme temperatures arrived in your area, would you even notice?', 'In fact, the study suggests, people learn to accept extreme weather as normal in as little as two years.', 'Frances C. Moore, the lead author of the new study, wanted to find out how people contextualized extreme temperatures based on past weather experiences.', 'It’s Not Your Imagination. Summers Are Getting Hotter.', 'Summer temperatures have shifted toward more extreme heat over the past several decades.', 'Still, Dr. Mohammad said the study was a good early attempt at trying to understand how people perceive climate change through extreme weather. “It is sort of sounding a warning bell saying that we keep seeing these anomalous weather events over many years and we can quickly get adjusted to that,” he said.', 'If this recalls the apocryphal tale of the frog that allows itself to be cooked to death if placed in a pot of water that is slowly boiled, it should be noted that frogs won’t actually allow themselves to die this way; they will jump out of the pot.', 'Social scientists refer to “windows of opportunity” when extreme events can act as triggers for social change.', 'Infield, a professor of regional planning at the University of Massachusetts, Amherst, who was also not part of the research.', 'They found that people experiencing extreme temperatures still had more negative sentiment scores than average.', 'Kendra Pierre-Louis is a reporter on the climate team. Before joining The Times in 2017, she covered science and the environment for Popular Science.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Mind: When the Bully Is the Boss
['Leadership figures such as Bobby Knight, the Indiana University basketball coach and author of “The Power of Negative Thinking,” enjoy a presumption that being tough gets results, but researchers say there is no evidence to support that notion.', 'Steve Jobs, the co-founder of Apple.', 'But researchers who study organizations, productivity and leadership styles attribute the achievements of such figures to exceptional ability.', 'The study of leadership style has blossomed in the last decade. Psychologists, business analysts and organization experts have conducted all kinds of investigations, from anonymous surveys of employees to studies of worker behavior over time. Various measures of productivity, performance and well-being have been called upon.', 'By nature, any study of group dynamics in a real-world setting is plagued by design limitations, including the lack of a control group and the hidden personal grievances of the employees. But the vast majority of findings point to the same conclusion: Bullying bosses tend to undermine their own teams. Morale and company loyalty plunge, tardiness increases and sick days are more frequent.', 'In Ms. Klobuchar’s case, any discussion of leadership style invites suspicion of a double standard based on gender. That double standard certainly exists; in many situations, male leaders are given greater leeway to be tough.', 'Although some reports of Senator Amy Klobuchar’s volatile leadership style have raised suspicion of sexism, researchers say women are no less likely than men to be abusive as bosses.', 'If an abusive management style provides so little benefit, then why do so many abusive managers and bosses rise in organizations? One clue comes from social psychologists who have studied how teams of people behave and solve problems in the absence of a hierarchy.', 'Leaders tend to emerge organically, and common traits of those who assume the role include boldness, a healthy ego and a sense of entitlement. Confidence, too: People who take charge in these simulations tend to be decisive, making calls from the gut, and quickly.', 'A series of studies led by Jennifer Overbeck, an associate professor of management at Melbourne Business School, has found that, in simulated work groups, people gave high ratings to leaders who made quick decisions, particularly in moral dilemmas. It’s not that snap decisions were correct more often than deliberate ones. Rather, they were perceived to be more correct, and the decision maker seemed more morally assured than other potential leaders.', 'As these individuals rise through the ranks, they internalize the belief that they are natural, morally instinctual leaders. This belief, in turn, affects how they view the people under them.', 'Dr. Overbeck and Vitaliya Droutman of the University of Southern California randomly assigned 50 students to groups, to be managers or team members. The researchers administered a series of standard tests to gauge how the participants judged their own traits and others’.', 'The managers were aware of their own personal strengths and weaknesses, but also concluded that their staff members “shared their negative, but not their positive, traits and feelings.” That is, managers often misread team members’ emotions as being in line with their own — “She’s as frustrated with herself as I am” — even though this often is not the case.', 'Abusive supervisors come in many flavors, including the insecure, the overmatched and the garden-variety sadist who picks on underlings solely for the pleasure of exercising power. But even mini-tantrums and put-downs can be counterproductive, undermining the efforts of a normally civil person and an otherwise effective boss.', 'Picture a Leader. Is She a Woman?', 'Why Do We Reward Bullies?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Bill Jenkins, Who Tried to Halt Tuskegee Syphilis Study, Dies at 73
['Bill Jenkins in 1997. He denounced the government’s unethical Tuskegee syphilis experiment aimed at black men, and spent his career working against injustice in health care.', 'Bill Jenkins, a government epidemiologist who tried to expose the unethical Tuskegee syphilis study in the 1960s and devoted the rest of his career to fighting racism in health care, died on Feb. 17 in Charleston, S.C. He was 73.', 'His wife, Dr. Diane Rowley, said the cause was complications of sarcoidosis, an inflammatory disease.', 'Dr. Jenkins was working as a statistician at the United States Public Health Service in Washington in the 1960s when he first learned of the infamous Tuskegee study. In that study, the federal government deceived hundreds of black men in Macon County, Ala., where Tuskegee is the county seat, into thinking that their so-called “bad blood” — they weren’t told that they had syphilis — was being treated when it wasn’t.', 'The researchers had wanted to see what unchecked syphilis would do to the human body and used these men as guinea pigs, without their informed consent.', 'The disease, which is usually transmitted by sexual contact and can cause brain damage, paralysis, blindness and death, ran its course in several of the men. Some infected their wives, who passed it on to some of their children. The study lasted from 1932 to 1972.', 'A colleague told Dr. Jenkins about the study while it was still going on, but not in much detail. Dr. Jenkins did some research and found dozens of articles about it in medical journals, so he understood that it was not being done in secret. Even local chapters of the American Medical Association supported it.', 'Still, he was troubled by the ethics of the situation and spoke to his supervisor.', 'Dr. Jenkins, who was black, and some colleagues wrote an article about it and sent it to other African-American doctors and to a few reporters. But Dr. Rowley, his wife, said he did not include any background or explanatory information, and the news media did not pick it up.', 'Eventually, another health service epidemiologist, Peter Buxtun, gave the information to The Associated Press. The A.P. article appeared on the front page of The New York Times and elsewhere and shocked the nation. The study was soon halted.', 'For Dr. Jenkins, the Tuskegee study confirmed what he had long believed — that medical research was biased against people of color and that this study was just the tip of the iceberg.', 'It would change his life. He would go on to devote himself to trying to reduce disease and illness among African Americans and other people of color, in part by recruiting more such people into the public health professions.', 'He was one of the first researchers at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to recognize how dramatically AIDS was affecting black men. He helped organize the first conference on AIDS in underserved neighborhoods and became the C.D.C.’s director of AIDS prevention for minorities.', 'And for 10 years he oversaw the government’s Participants Health Benefits Program, which provides free lifetime medical care to the men of the Tuskegee study and their eligible family members.', 'A doctor in Tuskegee, Ala., drew blood from a subject of the government’s experiment on black men to determine what happens when syphilis is left untreated. The men were deceived into thinking that they were being treated.', 'Susan Reverby, author of “Examining Tuskegee: The Infamous Syphilis Study and Its Legacy” (2009), said in a telephone interview that Dr. Jenkins had successfully fought to expand the benefits for survivors and their families, insuring that health care, like nursing homes, would be covered in addition to medical care.', 'The apology is commemorated every year at the National Center for Bioethics in Research and Health Care at Tuskegee University; the government paid for the center as part of the apology, and Dr. Jenkins helped establish it.', 'William Carter Jenkins was born on July 26, 1945, in Mt. Pleasant, S.C. His father, Albert Daniel Jenkins, was a funeral home director and restaurant owner; his mother, Martha (Wilson) Jenkins, was a schoolteacher.', 'He graduated from historically black Morehouse College with a bachelor’s degree in mathematics in 1967. He went to work for the National Center for Health Statistics, a division of the public health service, and became one of the first black commissioned officers in the Public Health Service Commissioned Corps.', 'After the Tuskegee study was exposed, he was determined to make more of a difference in the world and decided he needed more training. He earned his master’s of science degree in biostatistics in 1974 at Georgetown University. He was awarded a second master’s, in public health, in 1977 from the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, where he went on to earn a doctorate in epidemiology in 1983.', 'He married Dr. Rowley that year. They had met at the C.D.C., where they were both epidemiologists. In addition to his wife, Dr. Jenkins is survived by their daughter, Danielle Rowley-Jenkins. His brother, Dr. Albert Daniel Jenkins Jr., died in 2006.', 'Dr. Rowley said her husband had always been an activist. In high school, he had registered people to vote. In college, he was a foot soldier in the Student Nonviolent Coordinating Committee. He was jailed, along with the future Georgia congressman John Lewis and others, for protesting the whites-only restaurant owned by Lester Maddox, a segregationist and future governor of Georgia.', 'And while he was at the public health service, he helped start an underground newspaper, The Drum, directed at employees who felt they were experiencing racism in their work or witnessing it.', 'Later in his career, Dr. Jenkins founded the Society for the Analysis of African American Public Health Issues, which is dedicated to eliminating health inequities among the races.', 'But it was the Tuskegee study that would define his life’s work.', 'An earlier version of this obituary misspelled the given name of the director of the National Center for Bioethics in Research and Health Care at Tuskegee University. He is Dr. Rueben Warren, not Reuben.', 'It also misspelled the surname of an epidemiologist who gave information about the Tuskegee syphilis study to The Associated Press. He is Peter Buxtun, not Buxton.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Skin Deep: Why You Should Care About Vegan Beauty
['How a super-niche category got to be so buzzy.', 'This demand for all things vegan has made other industries take notice, especially beauty.', 'But with beauty, she was confronted with a problem: She couldn’t find any information online about vegan beauty brands. So she did something about it.', 'What Does Vegan Beauty Actually Mean?', 'There’s a lot of confusing jargon around vegan beauty — “cruelty-free” is one example, with many people assuming that they’re one and the same.', 'Plain and simple, vegan beauty means the absence of animal ingredients, while cruelty-free refers to a product that doesn’t test on animals. In other words, it’s possible for a vegan item to have been tested on an animal and a cruelty-free product to contain animal ingredients.', 'Adding to the confusion is the lack of Food and Drug Administration guidelines. A handful of organizations have rolled out insignia to signal whether a product is vegan or cruelty-free, the most distinguished being the Leaping Bunny Program, which grants certification to personal care and household product companies that ensure that no animal testing is done at any phase of the production process.', 'Common animal-derived ingredients found in beauty products include honey, beeswax, lanolin (wool grease), squalene (shark liver oil), carmine (crushed-up beetles), gelatin (cow or pig bones, tendons or ligaments), allantoin (cow urine), ambergris (whale vomit) and placenta (sheep organs).', 'While they’re harmless, they’re not better for you, either, though the thought of smearing on the animal parts found in moisturizers, cosmetics and shampoos may be a deterrent.', 'But the term “vegan beauty,” which is synonymous with “plant-based,” can be misleading, too. It conjures up images of virtuous greens and, in turn, healthiness, which is not necessarily the case.', 'The next step is to clean up the ingredient list without completely stripping away preservatives, which, Dr. Gross points out, can help maintain a product’s freshness.', 'In the 30 years that Kathy Guillermo, a senior vice president of PETA, has campaigned to end the use of animals in laboratory experiments, she can pinpoint two industrywide shifts that spurred vegan awareness in beauty. The first was in 1990, when Estée Lauder and Revlon stopped testing on animals.', 'It caused backlash and consumer demand for cruelty-free products, which eventually led to the development of instrumentation to replace animal testing.', 'For many brands, she said, concern about the ethical and environmental impact of their products is the No. 1 consumer question they encounter.', 'Perhaps the biggest benefit to come out of the vegan beauty movement is that it’s pushing consumers to assess ingredients. “People are starting to question and research what they’re buying, and I think that’s empowering,” Ms. Piasecka said.', 'All signs point to an industry that’s working toward being not only cleaner, but also vegan and cruelty-free.', 'Ms. Subramanian used to know every vegan beauty brand. Now, she said, it’s impossible to keep up.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Field Notes: Tips for Creating the Perfect Wedding Hashtag
['Mike and Heather Julian showcased their hashtag on the side of a shuttle bus that transported guests to their venue in Santa Barbara, Calif.', 'Wedding photographers can’t possibly capture every moment of your special day, but guests can easily fill in the gaps on social media.', 'Using a designated wedding hashtag, attendees can post photos on Facebook, Instagram, Twitter and other platforms, serving as a sort of personal paparazzi.', 'Creating a hashtag has become a core step in the wedding-planning process, said Kari Dirksen, the owner and lead planner at Feathered Arrow Events, a Los Angeles-based wedding and events planning business. “I’d say 90 percent of my clients incorporate a hashtag into their wedding,” she said.', 'With so many hashtags from which to choose, couples may feel pressure to create something clever and distinctive. Some may even hire professional hashtag writers.', 'Ms. Wakim offers three price packages: one hashtag for $50, three for $95, and $125 for five. “A lot of couples want options,” she said.', 'Need help crafting your own hashtag? Here are some tips to ensure your hashtag isn’t an #epicfail.', 'A welcome sign helped promote the wedding hashtag for Katie and Mark Moss.', 'A natural starting point is to think about creative ways to incorporate your last name. For instance, Ms. Wakim created this hashtag for Tres Penny and Katie Smith: #PennyFoundHisDime. She also created the hashtag #HopelessRahmantics for Shabnam Mahmood and Rezwan Rahman.', 'If you’re stumped for ideas, Mr. Shelley recommends grabbing a thesaurus and jotting down words that sound like either person’s first or last names. For a groom with the last name Hurst, the Wedding Hashers created the hashtag #LoveAtHurstSight.', 'Though clever hashtags are the most popular, “not everyone loves puns,” Mr. Shelley said. If you’re looking for something more straightforward, consider using an alliteration, like #ForeverFong or #FinallyForman, or combining each person’s first or last name, like #DebraandAdamAugust2019. Incorporating your wedding’s location is another option, like #NelsonsInTheBarn or #TaylorsTakeNYC.', 'Pro tip: Capitalizing the first letter of each word will make your hashtag more readable at a glance, Mr. Shelley said.', 'Photo booths and props can promote a wedding hashtag.', 'If you want a lot of options, ask friends on Facebook, Instagram and other social media for hashtag suggestions. You can also solicit ideas from wedding vendors, such as your photographer, wedding planner or caterer. “I would get as many people involved in the brainstorming process as possible,” Ms. Wakim said.', 'Distinctive hashtags will often incorporate the names of the couple.', 'The point of creating a wedding hashtag is to have your guests use it when posting photos from your wedding day, which is why Ms. Trumpower recommends couples create something distinctive. “You don’t want to compete with someone else’s hashtag, because you don’t want to be sifting through a ton of other people’s photos,” Ms. Trumpower said.', 'Once you’ve created a hashtag you like, do a search on social media to see if it already exists. If it does, Mr. Shelley said, adding the date of your wedding, like #LisaandMikeMay012019, could solve this problem.', 'Some couples choose to go big. When Mike and Heather Julian got married in Santa Barbara, Calif., on April 29, 2016, they used oversize magnets to showcase their hashtag, #FinallyTheJulians, on the side of a shuttle bus that transported guests to and from the venue. “Small signs can be overlooked, but you can’t ignore a six-foot hashtag on the side of a bus,” Ms. Julian said.', 'There are a number of other places where you can display your hashtag. Among them: a welcome chalkboard, guest book, ceremony program, cocktail napkins, dinner menus, photo booth props, favors, drink stirrers and table number signs.', 'Ms. Dirksen also recommends couples promote their hashtag on their save-the-date mailings, wedding website or at pre-wedding events likes the bridal shower.', 'Continue following our fashion and lifestyle coverage on Facebook (Styles and Modern Love), Twitter (Styles, Fashion, and Vows) and Instagram.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Fashion Review: A Designer You Should Know
['PARIS — For all the talk of new generations and upstart millennials dictating the agenda these days, the fashion establishment is awfully — how to put this? — mature.', 'The winners generate a lot of buzz. Yet sometimes it’s hard to tell if that’s a product of sheer wishful thinking — a desperation to believe renewal is coming — or actual merit.', 'It’s a bit early to judge Rokh, the brand that was the subject of the most chat on Day 1 (it’s fully in the Vetements/Sacai/Margiela vein of de- and reconstructed trench coats, floral dresses and frumpy work suits, plus some clear vinyl).', 'Mr. Jacquemus, the self-crowned bard of the sun-kissed Croisette, is in a transition phase, chafing against the box he built himself and trying to expand into tailoring, though the flaps he added to skirts and jackets were more distracting than delighting. His accessories, on the other hand — bags macro and very micro, earrings with clips to hold hankies or postcards — were clever.', 'But Ms. Serre, who imagined a post-climate-change apocalyptic landscape populated by survivors deep in a green- and lavender-lit series of wine caverns on the outskirts of Paris — she clearly has a vision all her own, and it has both currency and electricity. If the road warrior and his ilk suddenly got their own couturier, this is what their wardrobes would look like.', 'Beautifully sculpted coats hung with deep ruffs and cuffs of fake fur in unnatural shades; moiré pit-crew suits; off-the-shoulder duvet cocktail dresses; bias gowns composed of a rainbow of fabric ends; little black dresses dangling old mussel shells and found objects — all connected the techniques and tropes that defined fashion’s past with the issues that are shaping its present, and they did so in perfectly judged balance.', 'Rarely has doomsday been so inspiring.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Gajapati’s royal scion joins BJD
['Kalyani Devi, scion of the erstwhile royal family of Paralakhemundi in Gajapati district of Odisha, joined the ruling Biju Janata Dal on Tuesday. She was inducted into the party at the residence of Chief Minister and BJD president Naveen Patnaik in Bhubaneswar.', 'Her joining the BJD will strengthen the party in Gajapati district and Berhampur parliamentary constituency, said sources. The BJD might consider fielding her as its candidate from Paralakhemundi Assembly seat or Berhampur parliamentary constituency, the sources said.', "Ms. Devi's family had been politically active from before Independence. She is the daughter of former Congress MP from Berhampur, Gopinath Gajapati, who was a member of the ninth and 10th Lok Sabha. He later joined the BJD in 2009.", 'Her grandfather Krushna Chandra Gajapati (1892-1974)played a key role in the formation of Odisha State on linguistic basis and is revered throughout the State. He was the first prime minister of Odisha before Independence and a member of the Constituent Assembly of India. The present day Gajapati district, carved out of Ganjam district, is named after him.', 'Ms. Devi expressed her gratitude towards Mr. Patnaik for her induction into the BJD and the support extended towards the treatment of her ailing father.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Speculation rife as 4 big leaders in Odisha yet to announce poll plans
['As the Lok Sabha and Assembly elections draw closer in Odisha, the fate of four prominent politicians of the State — Baijayant Panda, Srikant Jena, Bijoy Mohapatra and Dilip Ray — continues to hang in the balance.', 'Their being not affiliated to any political party at present gives rise to speculation in the Parliamentary and Assembly constituencies where they contested in 2014. Questions such as will they join any party, or contest the upcoming elections as independents, or maybe not enter the fray at all continue to be raised in public sphere.', 'Mr. Panda, who quit the ruling BJD in May last year — four months after he was suspended from the primary membership of the party for “anti-party” activities — continues to visit Kendrapara from where he was elected to the Lok Sabha in 2009 and 2014 elections.', 'Although Mr. Panda continues to be critical of the State government on social media, he has not been able to make up his mind about joining any other party till date. No one knows whether he will join the BJP or the Congress or contest from Kendrapara or any other constituency as an independent candidate with the support of either of the two national parties.', 'Political analysts are keeping their fingers crossed when it comes to predicting the next move of former Union Minister Srikant Jena. He has been critical of both the BJD and the Congress since he was expelled from the latter on January 19 on charges of anti-party activities.', "Similar confusion persists about the political future of former Minister Bijoy Mohapatra and former Rourkela legislator Dilip Ray. Both of them quit the BJP on November 29 last year after they were sidelined by the party. “We can’t be treated as furniture in the party while the rootless talk big and project a larger-than-life image,” they had said in their joint letter to BJP's national president Amit Shah.", 'Speculation is rife that both Mr. Mohapatra and Mr. Ray, who played a key role in the formation of the BJD in 1997, may join the ruling party. But there is little sign of their making a return to the party so far.', 'Since hectic lobbying has already begun in the BJD, the Congress and the BJP by those aspiring for Lok Sabha and Assembly tickets, the fate of these four leaders may be decided when the nomination paper filing process begins.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


False claim on air strike, says SP leader
['Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Balakot air strikes: Diplomats laud choice of targets
['Responding to India’s air strikes, veteran diplomats said Islamabad should appreciate the fact that Indian jets did not strike Pakistan military installations but only the camp of the terror outfit Jaish-e-Mohammed in Balakot.', 'A former senior diplomat said New Delhi had carefully described the operation as a “pre-emptive strike” and not a retaliation against the military.', 'Mr. Sinha’s comments came after the Pakistan military spokesman said the Pakistan military would surprise India with its response. Mr. Sinha said India had clearly indicated that it did not want an escalation, and Pakistan was playing to its domestic gallery of fundamentalists.', 'Frank Hans Dannenberg-Castellanos, Dean of Diplomatic Corps, expressed satisfaction at the way India briefed all Heads of Missions stationed in India. “It was expressed that there is no intention to escalate, and India will act in restraint and responsibly,” Mr. Dannenberg-Castellanos said.', 'Chinmaya Gharekhan, former Indian envoy to the UN, however, cautioned India to prepare for a diplomatic offensive by Pakistan as Beijing was a key international supporter of Pakistan. “There is a possibility that Pakistan supported by China could present Indian military strike on its territory as a violation of its sovereignty and push UN Security Council to take up the Kashmir issue,” Mr. Gharekhan said.', 'Pakistan has failed to force the UN to take up the Kashmir issue for many years despite its consistent campaign on the issue. Mr. Gharekhan cautioned India to be alert for a counter-diplomatic initiative by Islamabad.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', "IAF strikes on JeM's Balakot terror camp: who is Yusuf Azhar?", 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.', 'A 5-judge constitution bench headed by CJI says that even if one per cent chance of mediation exists in the politically sensitive land dispute matter, it should be done.']


No toilet at home for pad women of Oscar-winning film
['The girls who run a sanitary pad manufacturing unit in a Hapur village.', 'Period. End of Sentence.', 'However, the two girls, part of the face of a revolution in Khatikhera village, don’t have a toilet at their house, locally known as ‘Mohan ki Haveli’ after their great-grandfather.', 'Ms. Rakhi and Ms. Preeti’s father Vijender Tanwar, 55, is very proud of his daughters and greets visitors conveying wishes with a wide smile. He could not build a toilet because money is short. “The floor needs to be dug out and it demands money. The government gives money for building toilets but the Gram Pradhan dodges us,” he said.', 'Ms. Rakhi said that everyone in her family used the makeshift toilet in the next street, as did many other residents of the village.', 'Many of the villagers don’t have toilets in their house. When asked how they managed, women directed this reporter to makeshift open toilets in empty plots where they relieved themselves.', 'But this fame and happiness has come at a cost. Recalling the beginning of their journey, the women said they faced objections, were mocked at and made fun of, and had to lie and put up a fight to be able to run the manufacturing unit. “We told our mothers but to our fathers, we initially said that we were going to make diapers for children,” said Ms. Rakhi.', 'Among them, Ms. Sushma (32) perhaps struggled the most. She is married and belongs to a Scheduled Caste (SC). Her husband Satish runs a grocery store in the village. Ms. Sushma recalled how her husband told her to finish all chores and only then could she go to work. She was also told by her family to not sit, eat and drink with Gujjars and Muslims.', 'Of the seven women, only Ms. Sushma dropped out of school because of menstruation because her school neither had a toilet nor a female teacher. “I was using cloth till two years ago,” she said.', 'The manufacturing unit has given the women wings to ‘Fly’ — the brand . But they still don’t feel “fully liberated”. “Our life is still about work and home. We don’t go to cities and are not allowed to do so alone. Things are changing slowly,” said Ms. Preeti.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.', 'A 5-judge constitution bench headed by CJI says that even if one per cent chance of mediation exists in the politically sensitive land dispute matter, it should be done.']


Seven Black Inventors Whose Patents Helped Shape American Life
['U.S.', 'U.S.', 'Garrett Morgan created an improved gas mask. Marie Van Brittan Brown patented a home security system. Lonnie Johnson dreamed up the Super Soaker.', 'Garrett A. Morgan, born to former slaves in the post-bellum South, designed an improved gas mask.', 'Mr. Morgan after putting his invention into practice in 1916, when he helped rescue injured workers from a tunnel after an explosion under Lake Erie.', 'Black inventors’ paths to securing a patent in the United States have historically been jammed with obstacles.', 'Black Americans had limited opportunities to receive technical training, Mr. Fouché wrote. And professional organizations that were often vital for making business connections did not allow black people in their ranks.', 'Still, many black inventors have overcome these obstacles to secure their own patents — though the marketing of those products brought further challenges. With Black History Month nearing its end, we looked back at seven such innovators.', 'Garrett A. Morgan’s patent application for his gas mask included an illustration of a man breathing through tubes that dangle low to the ground, where smoke is less likely to linger.', 'Born in the 1870s to former slaves in the post-bellum South, Garrett A. Morgan had only six years of formal education.', 'In the late 1960s, Marie Van Brittan Brown, who worked as a nurse, patented a invention that became a technological precursor to the modern home security system.', 'Lonnie G. Johnson created the design for what would one day be called the Super Soaker. Sales for the toy reached $200 million in 1992.', 'Mary Beatrice Kenner designed this sanitary belt in an effort to help women manage their periods. The belt could be adjusted to fit women of different sizes.', 'Before there were tampon commercials promising an easier period, there was Mary Beatrice Kenner, an inventor who wanted to make old-fashioned sanitary belts more comfortable for women.', 'Dr. Charles R. Drew created a device that could preserve donated blood for transfusions. He patented the invention during World War II, a time when there was a desperate need for blood donations.', 'Dr. Patricia Bath, who invented a more efficient way to remove cataracts, in 2017. In the 1980s, she discovered how to use a laser to correct the condition.', 'When Dr. Patricia Bath had her “eureka” moment with a tool to fix cataracts in the 1980s, her supervisor was skeptical. By that point, she was used to being treated differently from her male counterparts in ophthalmology.', 'Dr. Weatherby’s yellow detergent used nonstaining dyes that could maintain their color when in the presence of chlorine bleach, serving as the basis for the famous lemon-scented Cascade detergent.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


NASA Renames Facility After Katherine Johnson of ‘Hidden Figures’ Fame
['Katherine Johnson, left, and Christine Darden, two of the first African-American women to work as mathematicians at NASA. The agency named a facility in Ms. Johnson’s honor on Friday.', 'The 2016 film, based on a book released earlier that year, depicted the struggle of Ms. Johnson and other black women for equality at NASA during the height of the space age and segregation. The mathematician tracked the trajectories of crucial missions in the 1960s.', 'President Trump signed the measure to rename the facility after Ms. Johnson in December after Congress passed a bill introduced by Senator Capito to do so, according to a NASA spokeswoman.', 'NASA’s Katherine Johnson Independent Verification and Validation Facility in Fairmont, W.Va. The program housed at the facility monitors the software used to track high-profile NASA missions.', 'Ms. Johnson was not always respected. Called “colored computers,” she and other black women who worked in NASA’s computing pool more than a half-century ago were separated from their white colleagues while they calculated trajectories for the Apollo missions and other programs. Ms. Johnson tracked the orbits of certain major missions, including Alan Shepard’s Freedom 7 in 1961 and John Glenn’s Friendship 7 in 1962, the agency said.', 'Ms. Hylick said that her mother was living comfortably and was humbled by the recognition. She added that she hoped the dedication would inspire others in the future, beyond Black History Month.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Pinterest Restricts Vaccine Search Results to Curb Spread of Misinformation
['Opponents of a bill that would stop parents from opting out their school-aged children from a vaccine in Washington State. Companies such as Pinterest and Facebook have faced pressure to curb inaccuracies promoted by anti-vaccination groups.', 'Pinterest, a digital platform popular with parents, took an unusual step to crack down on the proliferation of anti-vaccination propaganda: It purposefully hobbled its search box.', 'Type “vaccine” into its search bar and nothing pops up. “Vaccination” or “anti-vax”? Also nothing.', 'Pinterest, which allows people to save pictures on virtual pinboards, is often used to find recipes for picky toddlers, baby shower décor or fashion trends, but it has also become a platform for anti-vaccination activists who spread misinformation on social media.', 'Other platforms like Facebook and YouTube have also been infiltrated with misinformation about vaccines, and are taking steps to combat it. One of YouTube’s policies is to demonetize anti-vaccine videos.', 'The changes, which were not publicly announced, started in September and October.', 'Opposition to vaccinations can be traced to the introduction of the first vaccine in the 18th century. Over time most people accepted vaccines, and diseases that could be prevented by them declined. They declined so much, in fact, that the success of vaccines may have muted the dangers associated with those diseases.', 'There are several reasons for vaccine hesitancy: worries about side effects, cost, moral or religious objections, fears about a debunked link to autism and lack of knowledge about immunizations.', 'YouTube said on Thursday that it started surfacing more authoritative content in late 2017 for people searching for vaccination-related topics, and that its algorithmic changes would become more accurate over time.', 'YouTube also said it does not permit anti-vaccine videos to show ads.', 'The company said it was considering reducing or removing this type of content from recommendations and demoting it in search results.', 'Dr. Poland, an internist who has spent 35 years in the vaccine field, said he often encountered patients who relied on social media when researching health questions.', 'For all of these companies, containing the spread of misinformation, particularly about something as emotionally charged as vaccines, will be a lasting challenge as they balance fears about censorship with the need to promote useful content, experts said.', 'Why Don’t We Have Vaccines Against Everything?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


UnitedHealth Loses Case to the Health Venture Begun by Amazon, Berkshire-Hathaway and JPMorgan Chase
['UnitedHealth’s main argument was that the venture formed by Amazon, Berkshire Hathaway and JPMorgan Chase was a competitor.', 'A federal judge in Boston denied UnitedHealth’s request to have the executive, David William Smith, immediately stop working. Mr. Smith was an executive at Optum, a unit of UnitedHealth, and it accused him of taking corporate secrets to what it claimed was a competitor. Mr. Smith has denied any wrongdoing.', 'In its court filings, UnitedHealth argued that Mr. Smith’s role at Optum made him privy to sensitive information about its plans. Among Optum’s businesses is one of the nation’s largest pharmacy benefit managers, which serve as intermediaries between drug makers and employers that purchase medicine for their workers.', 'The industry has been sharply criticized for a lack of transparency in how pharmacy benefits managers operate, and Optum’s two main rivals recently merged with two large insurers, Aetna and Cigna.', 'While Judge Mark L. Wolf ruled against it, Optum emphasized that the issues remain unresolved and would need to be settled in arbitration. “We are committed to protecting our confidential information and will aggressively do so in arbitration,” said Matt Stearns, a spokesman for Optum, in an emailed statement.', 'A spokeswoman for the new venture, referred to as “A.B.C.” or “A.B.J.” in court papers, declined to comment. Unlike court proceedings, the arbitration sessions would not be public.', 'Dr. Atul Gawande, a high-profile physician who writes for The New Yorker.', 'The court proceedings also underscored just how unhappy customers — particularly these three employers — are with the status quo.', 'The three employers combined are spending about $4 billion a year on the roughly one million people they cover. But employees “have a poor experience,” Mr. Stoddard said.', 'The venture, which has no name and fewer than 20 employees, plans to tackle several areas, including how benefits are provided through traditional health insurance plans, Mr. Stoddard said. High deductibles, which force employees to pay for significant amounts of their care before their insurance kicks in, are a hardship for “fulfillment-center workers and call-center workers,” he said.', 'The companies also want to see if they can lower the cost of drugs for chronic conditions. In his testimony, Mr. Stoddard insisted that the new venture had no plans to enter the pharmacy business but wanted to better understand the process and the actual cost of drugs.', 'The employers also want to make it easier for workers to see a doctor, Mr. Stoddard testified. Because Optum also operates a large network of primary-care doctors, the venture might want to work with Optum to provide employees with easier access to physicians.', 'Like other large employers, the companies also want to see if they can make better use of doctor and hospital data and identify where employees can go for better care at lower prices.', 'The venture plans to conduct a series of experiments to test new approaches for smaller groups of employees with various partners, including Optum, Mr. Stoddard said.', 'But while Mr. Stoddard would not rule out the possibility that the venture could be a competitor, he emphasized that it had a different purpose. Unlike Optum, which he described as trying to “maximize profits,” the new organization is “trying to create value for families who are trying to use the health care system,” he said.', 'Follow @NYTHealth on Twitter.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


At Lanvin, Trying to Recreate Desire
['Bruno Sialelli sees his debut collection as a “beautiful challenge,” and the key to reviving the troubled fashion house.', "Bruno Sialelli working on his debut collection for Lanvin at the fashion house's headquarters in Paris.", 'PARIS — Bruno Sialelli does not look like a knight in shining armor.', 'Clean cut and solidly built, dressed in a blush-colored sweater, checked blouson jacket, wide-cut trousers and sneakers, with a diamond stud and three thin gold hoops gleaming in one earlobe and an array of rings on his fingers, Mr. Sialelli, 31, looks the kind of cool millennial you might spot in SoPi (the trendy neighborhood south of Pigalle) or hanging out with friends in a cafe along the Canal St.-Martin.', 'That is a lot of pressure but 10 days before the debut, sitting in Lanvin’s light-filled showroom, Mr. Sialelli allowed that his youth, his obscurity and the recent downward trajectory of the brand might ultimately work to the house’s advantage. In any case, he personally has nothing to lose and everything to gain.', 'Jean-Philippe Hecquet, Lanvin’s chief executive and the man who selected Mr. Sialelli for the job, weighed in, saying, “Youth is necessary to fashion, I think, but Bruno is unique for his age.” Mr. Hecquet himself was appointed only last August by Lanvin’s new owner, the Chinese group Fosun International; he previously had been C.E.O. of the accessible fashion brand Sandro, owned by another Chinese conglomerate, Shandong Ruyi.', 'That history, however, has not always been smooth.', "Mr. Sialelli was named creative director of the house in January, and is responsible for both women's and men's wear.", 'Lanvin, established in 1889 and the oldest continuously operating couture house in France, was revived in 2001 as a multicultural success story: the Taiwanese investor Shaw-Lan Wang bought it from L’Oréal and installed the Moroccan-Israeli designer Alber Elbaz. Together, the two transformed the house into the epitome of modern French elegance.', 'One day earlier this month Mr. Sialelli was in a small room at the atelier, adjusting garments on a fit model with the help of a stylist and three members of his design team. The mood was almost Zen: Everyone had put their phones on a conference table to concentrate on the work. A smattering of looks already were hanging on several racks.', 'On the walls, a mood board mapped Mr. Sialelli’s vision for the season in a magpie collage of vintage magazine spreads, archival motifs and what Mr. Sialelli called “a fracas of archetypes”: Fassbinder meets “Ladyhawke” meets Jean Genet meets manga.', 'If you can’t quite picture it, never mind. Mr. Sialelli can, and he seems comfortable conflating heritage Lanvin signatures — a velvet yoke, a gathered sleeve — with anime, whether on a flowing dress or fur coat. Prints and embroidery techniques lifted from the archives nod to the show venue, with stylized riffs on labyrinths, illuminated manuscripts and dragon slayers, tweaked for the street with gold finger caps and ear shields.', 'In keeping with a trend, and following the departure in November of Lanvin’s longtime men’s wear designer, Lucas Ossendrijver, Mr. Sialelli’s presentation will include looks for women and men, making him the first designer in a generation to produce both collections for the house.', 'When it comes to the house’s organization, one of his hopes is to reprise the kind of “flat hierarchy” he said he experienced at the Acne Studio in Stockholm.', 'In the days before the show, the in-house atmosphere appeared to be cautiously optimistic and even upbeat. The industry, however, was somewhat skeptical.', 'A mood board for Mr. Sialelli’s fall collection.', 'When fashion executives and industry experts are asked about Mr. Sialelli and the future of Lanvin, reactions tend to range from enthusiasm to “good luck with that.” But almost no one wants to speak on the record. It’s as if they are afraid a dark cloud now follows the name.', 'Now that design duties have been consolidated, Mr. Hecquet said the brand would turn its attention to key categories, including the imminent appointment of what he described as two “top talents” to design handbags and shoes. He also said Lanvin is rethinking the house web strategy.', 'But while finding success in China is essential to Lanvin’s future, Mr. Hecquet said, he stressed that the brand would remain true to its French roots, with European production and a unified, upscale product offered worldwide.', 'In Paris, Lanvin has winnowed staff and office space. After renovations to offices at 15 and 22 Rue du Faubourg St.-Honoré, home to Lanvin’s men’s and women’s boutiques, the brand will centralize its teams in those two buildings, vacating a third at number 17. “We’re big in terms of history but small and beautiful, which means we can be agile like entrepreneurs. That’s a strength. We can move fast,” Mr. Hecquet said, gazing over the Paris skyline from his office’s seventh-floor terrace.', 'Madame Lanvin, the house’s founder, once traveled in the same circles at the Hermès family, Mr. Sialelli said. For him, the woman herself may hold the key to reviving the house.', 'On Wednesday, Mr. Sialelli gets to show the fashion world his true colors.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


On Location: For an Atlanta Home of a Certain Age, a Design With Patina
['The developer of the midcentury-modern Dewberry hotel in Charleston, S.C., creates an apartment with an eye to an earlier century.', 'John Dewberry, who collaborated with the architecture and design firm Workstead on the Dewberry’s interiors, likes modernism well enough. But he is more interested in creating spaces that appear true to their context.', 'John Dewberry, the developer behind the Dewberry hotel in Charleston, S.C., bought and renovated an apartment in the 1924 neo-Classical Reid House in Atlanta with his wife, Jaimie Brown Dewberry.', 'Reid House was designed by Philip T. Shutze, of the architecture firm Hentz, Reid & Adler.', 'The couple was impressed with the intimately scaled architecture of the apartment, which included a series of smaller rooms for specific functions, including a formal dining room, a study and a sunroom, rather than the wide-open spaces seen in more contemporary homes. So they left the walls as they found them.', 'The dated kitchen and bathrooms weren’t quite so charming, so they gutted those spaces. The new kitchen has stainless-steel base cabinets, shelves made with wood reclaimed from an old Georgia icehouse, and walls and counters of Vermont Danby marble. The master bathroom has more Danby marble and the claw-foot soaking tub that came with it.', 'Mr. Dewberry insisted that they paint the walls gray, to create a feeling of coziness. But rather than choosing just one shade, they chose seven, using them in different rooms. They also added velvet and damask curtains, some of them finished with Samuel and Sons trim.', 'The living room has custom-made lounge chairs, vintage 1960s studded brass trunks used as end tables and a 1970s bronze mirror by Guy Lefevre. The James chandelier is by Robert Long Lighting (from $3,500).', 'To complete the décor, the couple collected furniture and art during their travels, from an 18th-century Hepplewhite sideboard found in Charlottesville, Va., to a vintage Turkish rug bought in the south of France. They added those to pieces Mr. Dewberry already owned, including a 19th-century mahogany dining table.', 'They completed the renovation in phases, and continued to use the apartment as construction progressed. By the time they were finished, in 2016, they had spent about $700,000, including the furniture and art.', 'The resulting design mixes traditional and contemporary elements to create a home that honors the past, but isn’t stuck in it.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Meet the Italian Makers of Luxury
['Crafted Society, an Amsterdam-based start-up, wants to give artisans their moment in the limelight.', 'Martin Johnston and Lise Bonnet, the co-founders of The Crafted Society, in their showroom in Amsterdam. Mr. Johnston is British and Ms. Bonnet, Dutch.', 'AMSTERDAM — The Milan collections have drawn to an end. Alessandro Michele of Gucci, bearded and bejeweled, has taken his runway bow. So has Miuccia Prada and Donatella Versace and Daniel Lee, the new name at Bottega Veneta.', 'We are long used to applauding designers at the end of a season. But behind them is a plethora of generally unheralded artisans who also power the “Made in Italy” brand, creating everything from knits to sneakers. Now, one nascent company is aiming to place that talent firmly in the spotlight.', 'That, however, gave them a new idea.', "The Amsterdam neighborhood where the couple's store is located.", 'Marco Cini, left, who makes luxury textiles, and the artist Roger Selden.', 'Sneakers at the Crafted Society’s showroom.', 'The partnerships that Crafted Society has been building, he said, could also tackle a broader crisis weighing on the future of Italian luxury manufacturing: the struggle to find the next generation of artisans.', 'An earlier version of this article misstated the lowest price of Panama hats. They are 125 euros, not 175 euros.', 'Elizabeth Paton is a reporter for the Styles section, covering the fashion and luxury sectors in Europe. Before joining The Times in 2015, she was a reporter at the Financial Times both in London and New York.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Virgin Galactic Rocket Plane Reaches Edge of Space
['U.S.', 'U.S.']


Trump Administration Blocks Funds for Planned Parenthood and Others Over Abortion Referrals
['The new rule would steer federal family planning funds under Title X to anti-abortion and faith based groups.', 'An abortion rights supporter in Metairie, La.', 'The new federal rule is almost certain to be challenged in court. Clinics will be able to talk to patients about abortion, but not where they can get one. And clinics will no longer have to counsel women on all reproductive options, including abortion, a change that will make anti-abortion providers eligible for funding.', 'The rule, which has been expected for months, is the most recent step by the Trump administration to shift the direction of federal health programs in a conservative direction. The administration has expanded the ability of employers to claim religious or moral objections to the Affordable Care Act’s requirement that they offer employees insurance coverage for contraception. It has channeled funding for teen pregnancy prevention programs and family planning grants into programs that emphasize sexual abstinence over contraception.', 'Some of these changes are being challenged in lawsuits by groups that support reproductive rights, but the new policies have broad support among evangelicals, who are a big part of the president’s political base.', 'The rule announced on Friday is not a wholesale defunding of Planned Parenthood, a long-held goal of conservatives. Organizations receiving money through the federal family planning program, called Title X, will still be able to perform abortions but will have to do so in a separate facility from their other operations and adhere to the new requirement that they not refer patients to it.', 'Organizations that receive federal funds have already been prohibited for years from using that money to finance abortion services. The new rule goes a step further by ordering them to keep separate books for their abortion operations.', 'Many women’s organizations said the new requirements will interfere with health providers’ responsibilities to fully counsel patients about reproductive health.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'Title X provides $286 million in funding for programs that provide services like birth control, screening for breast cancer and cervical cancer and screening and treatment for sexually transmitted diseases. These programs serve about 4 million patients each year, many of them poor, at more than 4,000 clinics. About 40 percent of those clinics are operated by Planned Parenthood, which receives close to $60 million through the family planning program each year.', 'That rule was challenged all the way to the Supreme Court, which upheld it in 1991, during the administration of President George H.W. Bush. But the Bush administration did not implement it and in 1993 Bill Clinton was sworn in as president and eliminated the rule.', 'Conservative lawmakers hailed the new rule as a long overdue move back toward the Reagan policy, and some were especially pleased by the prospect that anti-abortion health providers could now be eligible for federal family planning funds.', 'But several medical organizations predicted that the new rule would ultimately leave large numbers of patients, especially low-income and minority women, without access to basic care.', 'Dr. Niva Lubin-Johnson, president of the National Medical Association, which represents African-American physicians and their patients, said that if Planned Parenthood loses the funding, other providers supported by the program would have to increase their caseloads by an average of 70 percent to care for the 1.6 million people who currently receive such services through Planned Parenthood.', 'Most of the changes required by the new regulation will be phased in beginning 60 days after it is published in the Federal Register. Compliance with the financial separation requirement takes effect 120 days after publication and clinics have a year to comply with the physical separation requirements.', 'Robert Pear contributed reporting from Washington.', 'Pam Belluck is a health and science writer. She was one of seven Times staffers awarded the 2015 Pulitzer Prize for International Reporting for coverage of the Ebola epidemic. She is the author of “Island Practice,” about a colorful and contrarian doctor on Nantucket.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Sackler Testimony Appears to Conflict With Federal Investigation
['Publication of a sealed deposition by Richard Sackler of Purdue Pharma shows inconsistencies between his statements about OxyContin and evidence presented in a Justice Department report.', 'A January demonstration outside Suffolk Superior Court in Boston, where the state’s lawsuit against Purdue Pharma, the maker of the opioid painkiller OxyContin, is proceeding.', 'A member of the family that owns the manufacturer of OxyContin repeatedly gave testimony in a lawsuit that conflicts with details in a report by federal prosecutors, newly disclosed court papers indicate.', 'Dr. Richard Sackler, who was once president of the company, Purdue Pharma, and is the son of one of its founders, said under oath during a pretrial deposition that he first learned from a Maine newspaper article in 2000 that OxyContin, a powerful opioid painkiller, was being abused.', 'The deposition, in a lawsuit filed by the state of Kentucky, was given in 2015 and has been sealed since. On Thursday, two news organizations, STAT and ProPublica, published the transcript of the deposition. Since the case’s settlement in 2015, Purdue Pharma has been fighting to keep the deposition secret.', 'In a statement, Purdue Pharma, which is based in Stamford, Conn., called the release of Mr. Sackler’s deposition “a clear violation of the court’s order and, as such, is regrettable.” The company also maintained that Mr. Sackler, when alerted to OxyContin’s abuse, immediately took steps to address the problem.', 'Mr. Sackler responded that he was not aware abuse was an issue when that email was written. However, it was two months earlier, in September, federal prosecutors wrote in 2006, that Mr. Sackler was told of internet reports of OxyContin abuse.', 'In the same deposition, Mr. Sackler testified that he recalled “never hearing about” significant abuse of OxyContin’s predecessor drug, a morphine-based painkiller sold under the brand name MS Contin.', 'That is also contradicted by the 2006 report, in which federal prosecutors pointed to emails and reports sent to Mr. Sackler and other family members in the late 1990s showing that there was significant abuse of MS Contin in Canada and other countries.', 'As part of the deposition, Mr. Sackler was also shown internal marketing documents that suggested Purdue Pharma was promoting OxyContin as a less powerful opioid than morphine. In fact, it is two times stronger than morphine. In his responses, Mr. Sackler claimed that the promotions were not efforts to mislead doctors into thinking OxyContin was a safer drug but to avoid any comparisons of it to morphine, which was viewed as a drug given to dying cancer patients.', 'Based on their findings, the prosecutors recommended in 2006 that three top company executives be indicted on felony charges. But in 2007, the government settled the case and allowed the three executives to plead guilty to misdemeanor charges. At that time, the prosecution memo was never disclosed.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


After SpaceX Launch, Israeli Spacecraft Begins Journey to the Moon
['The privately built spacecraft will take a long trip to the moon, landing on its surface in April.', 'A SpaceX Falcon 9 rocket carrying an Israeli moon lander and other payloads ahead of its launch from the Cape Canaveral Air Force Station in Florida on Thursday.', 'Until now, only three nations — the United States, former Soviet Union and China — have sent robotic landers to the moon. Beginning in 2007, a competition run by the X Prize Foundation and financed by Google was supposed to spur entrepreneurs to send a privately financed spacecraft there, but the competition deadline passed without anyone taking home the $20 million grand prize.', 'When will Beresheet land on the moon?', 'The landing is expected to occur in April.', 'An artist’s rendering of the Beresheet spacecraft, which is expected to arrive at the moon in April.', 'Why will it take so long to get there?', 'The spacecraft is taking a long but fuel-efficient route. Instead of blasting out of Earth’s orbit, it will gradually elongate its elliptical orbit until it passes close enough to the moon to be captured by lunar gravity. Then it will spend a few more days making its orbit around the moon more circular before attempting a landing.', 'With $100 million and a lot of volunteer labor, SpaceIL’s Beresheet spacecraft could be the first privately built vessel to reach the lunar surface.', 'What will the Beresheet spacecraft do on the moon?', 'An instrument built by the Weizmann Institute of Science is to measure the moon’s magnetic field as the spacecraft approaches for landing. That information could reveal something about the iron core far below the surface.', 'NASA provided the spacecraft with retroreflectors, essentially, mirrors that reflect light in the same direction as the incoming beam. Lasers on Earth shined at that spot will bounce back, enabling precise measurement of the distance between Earth and the moon. Apollo astronauts left similar devices on the moon nearly 50 years ago.', 'The spacecraft is also a time capsule containing hundreds of digital files including the Torah, the Israeli flag, artwork contributed by the public and a children’s book that was inspired by SpaceIL’s mission to the moon.', 'It also will ferry a digital archive containing 30 million pages of information — including a full version of the English-language Wikipedia encyclopedia — provided by the Arch Mission Foundation, a nonprofit seeking to create a backup of humanity’s knowledge.', 'A final drill at SpaceIL’s mission control in Yehud, Israel, last week.', 'How long will the mission last?', 'Not long. Beresheet is not designed to operate for more than a few days. It will land at the beginning of a lunar day. The electronics are not designed to survive the hotter temperatures that prevail on the moon’s surface as the sun gets higher in the moon’s sky.', 'Will the mission succeed?', 'The traditional and more expensive approach to spacecraft design is to rely on components that have successfully flown before, and to include backups for critical systems. SpaceIL left out much of the redundancy and tried to take a more nimble approach to save money.', 'The engineers at SpaceIL and Israel Aerospace Industries, the large aerospace company that collaborated on building Beresheet, said the mission is riskier, but they made considered decisions on where to take shortcuts.', 'Will Beresheet hop?', 'One of the requirements for winning the $20 million Google Lunar X Prize was that the spacecraft had to move 500 meters, or 1,640 feet, on the lunar surface. To achieve this, SpaceIL’s engineers planned to have Beresheet take off again after landing and move the required distance.', 'The SpaceIL team will make a final hop-or-no-hop decision after the landing in April.', 'What other spacecraft launched with Beresheet aboard the SpaceX rocket?', 'Beresheet was not the main payload on the rocket. The main customer was Pasifik Satelit Nusantara, an Indonesian satellite operator that is launching a telecommunications satellite called Nusantara Satu. As a secondary rideshare, SpaceIL was able to pay much less for its trip.', 'The rocket will also deploy an experimental satellite for the United States Air Force.', 'The first stage of the SpaceX Falcon 9 rocket itself has launched and landed twice, once in July 2018 and again in October.', 'Kenneth Chang has been at The Times since 2000, writing about physics, geology, chemistry, and the planets. Before becoming a science writer, he was a graduate student whose research involved the control of chaos.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Scene City: Inside the Governors Ball, the Official Oscars After-Party
['Rami Malek, Lady Gaga, Regina King, Alfonso Cuarón and other winners get their trophies engraved.', 'If the Academy Awards are the peak expression of American culture, perhaps it’s fitting they’re held in a mall. After the ceremony at the Dolby Theater, guests ascended five levels via escalator, across from stores like Victoria’s Secret and Dave & Buster’s, to the Ray Dolby Ballroom.', 'Did Freddie ever mention who he wanted to portray him in the Hollywood version of his life?', 'Mr. May thought for a moment. “Burt Reynolds,” he said.', 'About last night!', 'All the looks from Hollywood’s biggest night.', 'Because of their work for “Black Panther,” Beachler and Carter became the first African-American women to win Oscars in a nonacting category since the 1980s.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


The Best and Worst Moments of the 2019 Oscars
['A more diverse winners’ list, a best-picture blunder, a joyous victory and misbegotten acceptance — these were the highs and lows as we saw them.', 'Only 3 black women have won Oscars for anything other than acting. 2 of them just happened tonight.', 'Sign up to the Watching newsletter for recommendations on what to watch straight to your inbox.', 'Glenn Close on the red carpet.', 'Maya Rudolph, Tina Fey and Amy Poehler onstage.', 'Awkwafina and John Mulaney presenting awards.', 'Kevin Hart, center, in a clip from “Night School” that was part of a montage at the Oscars.', 'Won’t You Be My Neighbor?', 'Lady Gaga and Bradley Cooper performing their duet.', 'The “Vice” winners with their Oscars.', 'What ‘Green Book’ Says About the Academy. Our Critics on the Oscars.', 'Nobody Hosted the Oscars. And They Did a Fine Job of It.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


In Milan, Men Win Supporting Roles
['The women’s shows, from Gucci to Roberto Cavalli, had a coed feel this season.', 'Gucci, fall 2019.', 'You couldn’t fairly say that they dominated it. The women on the runways, with their stern, set expressions, stalking in their fearsome heels (this was a week to remind you that our word “stiletto” derives from the Italian for “little dagger”), were too powerful and too numerous for that. It was more like a Sadie Hawkins Day, and women’s wear, with the power all on its side, had invited the men to the dance.', 'The reasons are easy enough to guess. While it remains, at least for the moment, a smaller part of the business than women’s wear, men’s wear has been growing explosively in recent years. And the heads of luxury brands have noticed the change with evident pleasure.', 'Presenting a unified collection while saving costs is a powerful draw, especially at a moment when fashion shows are as much a public entertainment as an industry invitational, and wherever and whenever they occur, they are ultimately destined to live where we increasingly all do: online.', 'For the designers and creators in Milan, the argument was more frequently one of creativity and coherence than commerce. Angela Missoni, who runs her family’s namesake knitwear label, invoked, in her own fashion, the old wisdom about measuring twice to cut once.', 'Clarity was the virtue cited as well by Paul Andrew of Salvatore Ferragamo, who was elevated last week from women’s creative director to creative director of the entire brand, men’s and women’s alike.', 'So it was that Mr. Armani’s ponytailed gentlemen, in their check suits and blue-on-black formal wear, gave the sense of being mere walkers to his women. Which was almost a shame, when you recalled that Mr. Armani, who started his label decades ago with men’s wear, revolutionized women’s wear by dappling it with the style and shape from the other side of that divide.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Shaped by Mérida’s Artistic Soul
['Plantel Matilde, an arts center rising in the jungle was conceived by Javier Marin, the Mexico City sculptor, and serves as a campus for international art students and local schoolchildren as well as studio and exhibition space for the artist..', 'The capital of the Yucatán attracts creative types from around Mexico and across many borders, drawn by its Mayan and colonial heritage and, for some, its path to the future.', 'Plantel Matilde, an arts center rising in the jungle was conceived by Javier Marin, the Mexico City sculptor, and serves as a campus for international art students and local schoolchildren as well as studio and exhibition space for the artist..', 'An elegant blonde woman in slacks drifted over to the table to say hello to David — Elena, he explained, a fashion designer from Milan. A few minutes later a tanned couple, the husband leaning on a cane as a result of a riding accident, dropped by — Ralf and Yvonne, the Germans who run the Yucatán Polo Club. After lunch we stopped at Ki’Xocolatl — the chocolate store next to the restaurant run by two Belgians — and bumped into Carmen, a painter from Mexico City, and Marcela, a Yucatecan artist who got out her phone to show me pictures of the sculptures she makes from sisal fiber.', 'Apoala, a Mexican-fusion restaurant in Mérida, is a great place for people watching.', 'The Catedral de San Ildefonso is evidence of a Roman influence in Mérida’s past.', 'The interior of the Catedral.', 'The heat — or maybe it was the food — was having the opposite effect on me. But our Uber driver, Israel, a Yucatecan of Lebanese descent, cranked up the AC in his Dodge Neon. The radio was also rousing: Israel blasted KIIS FM (“You’re the One That I Want”) as he negotiated the narrow streets lined with tall colonial houses in sherbet colors back to David’s place.', "The Paseo de Montejo, Mérida's main artery, is lined with mansions once owned by 18th- and 19th-century millionaires.", 'On cue, Israel had turned up the Paseo de Montejo, the city’s main artery, and suddenly we were surrounded by palm-shaded mansions in the Beaux-Arts style — the trophy homes of the 18th- and 19th-century millionaires who made their fortunes producing henequen (or sisal) from the agave plant. The rich Yucatecans rejected Hispanic culture in favor of all things French, and Paseo de Montejo bears more than a passing resemblance to a street in old New Orleans, which happens to be a sister city.', 'The pale blue exterior of the 200-year-old house in the Santiago barrio that David and his partner, Robert Willson, bought a few years ago is reserved, almost anonymous. Inside it looks the way you might imagine a casa restored by two guys who used to run one of Los Angeles’s premier design showrooms would look. There are 20-foot beamed ceilings and boldly patterned concrete tile floors, terra cotta sphinxes and French chairs made of steel and twine. The lush scent of plumeria wafts from the courtyard, where a Piranesi-inspired mural overlooks a turquoise pool.', 'Casa Lecanda, two blocks from Paseo de Montejo, is one of the fancier  places to stay in Mérida.', 'I repaired to my guest room, settling in for a siesta on the steel canopy bed. An Olivia Newton-John/John Travolta ear worm had worked its way into my head, but at some point I dozed off. When I awoke my room was dark, and rain pelted the roof — a steady, cooling volley punctuated by rumbling thunder.', 'Luckily Israel’s musical tastes were varied. The next morning, he was playing Mexican techno. In a light drizzle we set off for the ruins of Uxmal, a Maya city 50 miles south of Mérida, known for its ornate Puuc-style architecture and its fine state of preservation.', 'Uxmal, population 20,000, give or take, was founded about 500 AD by Chac Uitzil Hun, I learned from my guide, Fabio, a Yucatecan with a mouth full of gold and a wicked sense of humor. We made our way around the Pyramid of the Magician, the site’s tallest structure, to the grass-covered Ballcourt. Competitions here generally concluded with a human sacrifice, Fabio said, doing a little pantomime of the victor having his heart ripped out and offered to the gods, his gold teeth sparking in the mist.', 'The massive mosaic facade of the Governor’s Palace has 103 masks of the rain god Chac.', 'The restaurant Tatemar is in Plaza La Isla, a newly opened 180-store mall in the suburbs recently built north of Mérida.', 'Traditional Yucatecan cuisine, on the other hand, weds Mayan ingredients (corn, chilis, pumpkin) with culinary contributions from Spain (pork, lard, Seville orange) and other parts of Europe. Mr. Tower, the chef, who has lived in Mérida for the last decade, haunts the city’s food stalls for fried pork belly and other Yucatecan staples. Gringos who want to master time-honored recipes like pavo en relleno negro (roasted turkey in charred chili sauce) can take classes at Los Dos, the cooking school founded by David Sterling.', 'Tatemar serves Oaxacan-flavored dishes like octopus with maize purée and pork and shrimp tacos.', 'When we left the mall the sun was sinking below a stand of tamarind trees. Suddenly there was an explosion of bird chatter — the evening song of blackbirds known locally as X’Kau — a reminder that, for all the golf courses and Porsche dealerships, we were still in the jungle.', 'The Centro Cultural La Cupula, a sprawling garden-linked complex, hosts music, dance and theater performances, as well as exhibitions.', 'We had been asked to lunch at the country hacienda of Laura Kirar, the designer, and her husband, Richard Frazier. So we picked up a roasted chicken at a roadside stand, and Israel navigated a series of narrow village roads lined with shacks in taffy colors and teeming with mototaxis, pedestrians and dogs that seemed oblivious to both.', 'The Hacienda Subin, a crumbling 18th- and 19th-century Moorish-style compound on 40 acres in the jungle, is being painstakingly restored.', 'Dozens of the sisal haciendas outside Mérida have been renovated as resorts. One of the newest and poshest is the Chablé Resort and Spa, in Chocholá — 38 modern casitas, each with its own pool and hammock, on the jungled grounds of the former henequen estate Hacienda San Antonio Chablé. As for Hacienda Subin, Richard and Laura are rehabbing its factory building as a multipurpose space for community events.', 'One of the newest resorts is the Chablé Resort and Spa, in Chocholá,  which has 38 modern casitas, each with its own pool and hammock.', 'Expat colonies can be insular, but Mérida’s outlanders are establishing deep roots here. On our way back to the city we stopped at Plantel Matilde, a 39,000-square-foot arts center rising like a modern acropolis in the middle of the jungle. Conceived by the Mexico City sculptor Javier Marin, Matilde serves as a campus for international art students and local schoolchildren as well as a studio and exhibition space for the artist.', 'After a full day my host had planned a casual dinner back in town. But this was Mérida: the meal, at a simple cantina called Catrin, was a long, festive, Mezcal-fueled affair. Richard and Laura showed up, as did Marcela, the sisal sculptor. There was Jason, an artist from Chicago, and Kate, from Poland, who did hair, and Ross, from New York, who works in real estate.', 'We passed around platters of cactus salad and vegetarian flautas and empanadas. The conversation returned to Mérida’s recent growth. Not everyone shared David’s and Carlos’s enthusiasm for the changes. Jason groused about the traffic and noise. Ross said the Levi’s plant was polluting the water with toxic dyes.', 'Get weekly updates from our Travel Dispatch newsletter, with tips on traveling smarter, destination coverage and photos from all over the world.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Wait —: Wait — What Is a Hole?
['Wait — What Is a Hole?', 'Wait — What Is a Hole?', 'Allow me to ruin your life real quick.', 'A few days into the new year, someone asked me, as a kind of puzzle: “What is a hole?” Right now, your brain is protecting you; human brains are poor multitaskers and since yours is occupied with reading, you haven’t yet had time to sit back and consider the question that has blown across the fecund wasteland of my thoughts nearly every day of 2019. The problem is that your brain cannot protect you forever. If you want to get off this ride, you need to do it now.', 'What is a hole?', 'And yet, there are other characteristics of holes that escape our special attention. We have no common word for a hole that is bigger than a pinprick but smaller than a pothole. German identifies a metaphorical hole in the month of January when the bustle, spirits and commerce of the holiday season suddenly abate (“Januarloch”). In some dialects of Spanish, a “butrón” is a hole made in a building to carry out a break-in.', 'Great question.', 'Speaking of holes...', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Norman Orentreich, 96, Force Behind Hair Transplants, Dies
['Dr. Norman Orentreich in the mid-1950s during an appearance on the television program “World of Medicine.” His research showed the viability of transplanting hair to a bald scalp.', 'Dr. Orentreich (pronounced OR-en-trike), who died on Jan. 23 at 96, went on to develop other cosmetic countermeasures for aging, but not without controversy. One of his novel treatments — injecting tiny droplets of liquid silicone in the skin to smooth facial wrinkles — raised concerns among some of his peers and drew regulatory scrutiny.', 'Dr. Orentreich’s pioneering approach and personal attention drew actors, artists, models, publishing executives and other high-profile clients to his office, the Orentreich Medical Group, on Fifth Avenue on Manhattan’s Upper East Side.', 'In addition to transplants and injections, Dr. Orentreich often prescribed face creams and other products of his own devising.', 'It was the second multibillion-dollar market that he had a hand in advancing. Today, American beauty products that apply ideas from dermatology to promote skin health or treat problems like acne are cosmetic industry staples.', 'Dr. Norman Orentreich in 2011. His private Fifth Avenue practice drew actors, artists, models, publishing executives and other high-profile clients.', 'Although Dr. Orentreich’s name was not listed on Clinique’s products, his role as its guiding dermatologist paved the way decades later for entrepreneurial plastic surgeons and dermatologists to develop and market skin-care brands under their own names.', 'Norman Orentreich was born on Dec. 26, 1922, in Manhattan and, with his younger brother, Seymour, grew up in tenements on the Lower East Side.', 'His father, David Orentreich, an immigrant from Austria, was a tailor in the garment district. His mother, Anna Scheiner, from Poland, ran a store selling household items.', 'Dr. Orentreich’s entrepreneurial bent emerged early on. He learned to drive when he was 13 during the Great Depression, and earned money parking cars.', 'He graduated from Stuyvesant High School in Manhattan in 1939 and from City College of New York with a bachelor’s in biology and chemistry.', 'While he was an undergraduate, Dr. Orentreich met his future wife, Roslyn Seidner, who was in high school. He was 19 and she was 16. The meeting had been arranged by their parents. Her father, a furrier, had met his father through the garment industry.', 'Dr. Orentreich received an introduction to medicine after he was drafted into the Navy during World War II. From 1943 to 1945, he was stationed at the Brooklyn Navy Yard, where he served in the Navy Medical Corps as a pharmacist’s mate, helping medical officers examine recruits.', 'After the war he attended what is now the New York University School of Medicine, graduating in 1948. From 1950 to 1953 he did postgraduate training in dermatology at the N.Y.U. Medical Center’s skin and cancer unit. He became head of the unit’s hair clinic in 1953.', 'But the medical understanding of hair loss was still in its early stages, and the young doctor had few treatments to offer. To learn more about hair growth and loss, he devised a research study, in which he punched out small circles of skin from the back and front of men’s scalps. He then transplanted the hair that he had removed from the back of the head to bald areas in the front.', 'It was a eureka moment. And it led Dr. Orentreich to begin developing hair transplantation surgery as a viable, medically proven treatment.', 'But his idea was so revolutionary that a major dermatology journal declined to publish his research. It was eventually published in the Annals of the New York Academy of Sciences, in 1959. Over the decades, other doctors would refine hair transplantation surgery.', 'His son, Dr. David Orentreich, said his father died of complications of pneumonia in Manhattan. In addition to him, he is survived by two daughters, Dr. Catherine Orentreich and Sari Mass, and four grandchildren. David and Catherine Orentreich, both dermatologists, continue to run their father’s practice and also consult for Clinique.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


China Uses DNA to Track Its People, With the Help of American Expertise
['Tahir Imin, a 38-year-old Uighur, had his blood drawn, his face scanned and his voice recorded by the authorities in China’s Xinjiang region.', 'The Chinese authorities turned to a Massachusetts company and a prominent Yale researcher as they built an enormous system of surveillance and control.', 'Tahir Imin, a 38-year-old Uighur, had his blood drawn, his face scanned and his voice recorded by the authorities in China’s Xinjiang region.', 'BEIJING — The authorities called it a free health check. Tahir Imin had his doubts.', 'They drew blood from the 38-year-old Muslim, scanned his face, recorded his voice and took his fingerprints. They didn’t bother to check his heart or kidneys, and they rebuffed his request to see the results.', 'Mr. Imin was one of millions of people caught up in a vast Chinese campaign of surveillance and oppression. To give it teeth, the Chinese authorities are collecting DNA — and they got unlikely corporate and academic help from the United States to do it.', 'Collecting genetic material is a key part of China’s campaign, according to human rights groups and Uighur activists. They say a comprehensive DNA database could be used to chase down any Uighurs who resist conforming to the campaign.', 'To bolster their DNA capabilities, scientists affiliated with China’s police used equipment made by Thermo Fisher, a Massachusetts company. For comparison with Uighur DNA, they also relied on genetic material from people around the world that was provided by Kenneth Kidd, a prominent Yale University geneticist.', 'On Wednesday, Thermo Fisher said it would no longer sell its equipment in Xinjiang, the part of China where the campaign to track Uighurs is mostly taking place. The company said separately in an earlier statement to The New York Times that it was working with American officials to figure out how its technology was being used.', 'Dr. Kidd said he had been unaware of how his material and know-how were being used. He said he believed Chinese scientists were acting within scientific norms that require informed consent by DNA donors.', 'China’s campaign poses a direct challenge to the scientific community and the way it makes cutting-edge knowledge publicly available. The campaign relies in part on public DNA databases and commercial technology, much of it made or managed in the United States. In turn, Chinese scientists have contributed Uighur DNA samples to a global database, potentially violating scientific norms of consent.', 'Cooperation from the global scientific community “legitimizes this type of genetic surveillance,” said Mark Munsterhjelm, an assistant professor at the University of Windsor in Ontario who has closely tracked the use of American technology in Xinjiang.', 'China has maintained an iron grip in Xinjiang, where it is trying to make Uighur Muslims more subservient to the Communist Party.', 'From 2016 to 2017, nearly 36 million people took part in it, according to Xinhua, China’s official news agency. The authorities collected DNA samples, images of irises and other personal data, according to Uighurs and human rights groups. It is unclear whether some residents participated more than once — Xinjiang has a population of about 24.5 million.', 'In late 2016, the Communist Party embarked on a campaign to turn the Uighurs and other largely Muslim minority groups into loyal supporters. The government locked up hundreds of thousands of them in what it called job training camps, touted as a way to escape poverty, backwardness and radical Islam. It also began to take DNA samples.', 'In at least some of the cases, people didn’t give up their genetic material voluntarily. To mobilize Uighurs for the free medical checkups, police and local cadres called or sent them text messages, telling them the checkups were required, according to Uighurs interviewed by The Times.', 'A market in Kashgar, a city in Xinjiang. China has detained up to a million people in camps in the western region.', 'Kenneth Kidd first visited China in 1981 and remained curious about the country. So when he received an invitation in 2010 for an expenses-paid trip to visit Beijing, he said yes.', 'Dr. Kidd is a major figure in the genetics field. The 77-year-old Yale professor has helped to make DNA evidence more acceptable in American courts.', 'His Chinese hosts had their own background in law enforcement. They were scientists from the Ministry of Public Security — essentially, China’s police.', 'During that trip, Dr. Kidd met Li Caixia, the chief forensic physician of the ministry’s Institute of Forensic Science. The relationship deepened. In December 2014, Dr. Li arrived at Dr. Kidd’s lab for an 11-month stint. She took some DNA samples back to China.', 'Dr. Kidd’s data became part of China’s DNA drive.', 'Paul Flicek, member of the steering committee of the 1000 Genomes Project, said that its data was unrestricted and that “there is no obvious problem” if it was being used as a way to determine where a DNA sample came from.', 'The data flow also went the other way.', 'Dr. Kidd said he was “not particularly happy” that the ministry had cited him in its patents, saying his data shouldn’t be used in ways that could allow people or institutions to potentially profit from it. If the Chinese authorities used data they got from their earlier collaborations with him, he added, there is little he can do to stop them.', 'He said he was unaware of the filings until he was contacted by The Times.', 'Dr. Kidd also said he considered his collaboration with the ministry to be no different from his work with police and forensics labs elsewhere. He said governments should have access to data about minorities, not just the dominant ethnic group, in order to have an accurate picture of the whole population.', 'As for the consent issue, he said the burden of meeting that standard lay with the Chinese researchers, though he said reports about what Uighurs are subjected to in China raised some difficult questions.', 'China is ramping up spending on health care and research. The Chinese market for gene-sequencing equipment and other technologies was worth $1 billion in 2017 and could more than double in five years, according to CCID Consulting, a research firm. But the Chinese market is loosely regulated, and it isn’t always clear where the equipment goes or to what uses it is put.', 'Thermo Fisher sells everything from lab instruments to forensic DNA testing kits to DNA mapping machines, which help scientists decipher a person’s ethnicity and identify diseases to which he or she is particularly vulnerable. China accounted for 10 percent of Thermo Fisher’s $20.9 billion in revenue, according to the company’s 2017 annual report, and it employs nearly 5,000 people there.', 'China used Thermo Fisher’s equipment to map the genes of its people, according to five Ministry of Public Security patent filings.', 'The researchers said they had obtained 95 Uighur DNA samples, some of which were given to them by the police. Other samples were provided by Uighurs voluntarily, they said.', 'Tahir Hamut, a Uighur now living in Virginia whose blood was taken by the police in Xinjiang, said it was “inconceivable” that Uighurs there would have consented to give DNA samples.', 'Human rights groups praised Thermo Fisher’s move. Still, they said, equipment and information flows into China should be better monitored, to make sure the authorities elsewhere don’t send them to Xinjiang.', 'China’s tracking campaign unnerved people like Tahir Hamut. In May 2017, the police in the city of Urumqi in Xinjiang drew the 49-year-old Uighur’s blood, took his fingerprints, recorded his voice and took a scan of his face. He was called back a month later for what he was told was a free health check at a local clinic.', 'Mr. Hamut, a filmmaker who is now living in Virginia, said he saw between 20 to 40 Uighurs in line. He said it was absurd to think that such frightened people had consented to submit their DNA.', 'Sui-Lee Wee has been a correspondent for The New York Times in the Beijing bureau since October 2016. She covers business in China, Chinese consumers, health care and the intersection of demographics and the economy.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


‘What action can you take against political parties?’
['The Delhi High Court on Tuesday sought the stand of the Election Commission of India (EC) on taking action against political parties, which do not comply with its instructions to disclose funding and expenditure details.', 'The EC told the Bench that it has been consistently writing to the parties, which have not disclosed their expenditure.', 'The High Court directed the EC to file an affidavit indicating what powers or options it has to ensure implementation or enforcement of its guidelines regarding disclosure of expenditure by political parties and what steps it can take when there is violation of its norms.', 'The High Court was hearing a petition by NGO Association for Democratic Reforms (ADR) seeking implementation of the guidelines as well as the Law Commission’s recommendation that a provision be enacted to monitor and regulate the expenditure by political parties during elections.', 'Senior advocate Arvind Nigam and advocate Abhimanue Shrestha, appearing for Association for Democratic Reforms, said the Supreme Court has held that the EC has the power to give effect to the law panel’s recommendations.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.', 'A 5-judge constitution bench headed by CJI says that even if one per cent chance of mediation exists in the politically sensitive land dispute matter, it should be done.']


MBBS exam: plea in HC questions bar on disabled
['A view of Delhi High Court.', 'The Delhi High Court on Tuesday sought a response from the Centre and the Medical Council of India (MCI) on a petition challenging a notification which barred persons having more than 80% disability from taking admission to undergraduate medical education programmes.', 'A Bench of Chief Justice Rajendra Menon and Justice V. Kameswar Rao, however, declined to stay the notification saying no affected persons had moved the court challenging it.', 'The court was hearing a petition filed by one Satendra Singh.', 'The petition said the measure also violated various Sections of the Rights of Persons with Disabilities (RPWD) Act, 2016 and more specifically Section 3, Section 6 and Section 7 of the said Act.', 'The petitioner had argued that the notification not only attacked the dignity of persons with benchmark disability but also failed to apply the principal of equal opportunity.', 'The High Court has listed the case for April 4.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.', 'A 5-judge constitution bench headed by CJI says that even if one per cent chance of mediation exists in the politically sensitive land dispute matter, it should be done.']


Assam to cut pay of staff who ignore parents
['The Assam government on Tuesday formed a three-member Commission for hearing cases under a pay-cut policy envisaged to make its employees take care of their dependent elderly parents and physically challenged siblings.', 'The three-member PRANAM (Parents Responsibility and Norms for Accountability and Monitoring) Commission is headed by Chief Commissioner V.B. Pyarelal. Former MLA Alaka Desai Sarma and social worker Jugabala Buragohain are the two Commissioners.', 'Assam Finance Minister Himanta Biswa Sarma had in 2017 said that such a law would be introduced to ensure parents are cared for.', 'Geriatric care was linked to the State government employees’ pay from the 2018-2019 fiscal. The policy, enforced on October 2 last year, said an employee would be liable to part with 10-15% of his or her pay if found guilty of ignoring their dependent parents and physically challenged siblings.', 'The deducted money would then be transferred to the bank account of a parent or sibling.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Assamese ‘precursor’ of ‘Gully Boy’ set for release
['The film, Mr. Borua said, is a simple tale of a wronged man seeking revenge through participatory democracy. “The film has an ensemble cast, no hero and no heroine. Rather, there’s an anti-hero — a devious man named Puna Saikia played by Hiren Sarma because of whom the others come together and generate a campaign against him through rap music,” he said.', 'The film traces 40 years of political upheavals since the Assam Agitation and extremism in the 1980s while focussing on 27 years of injustice that Saikia metes out to an ordinary villager named Domboru Borbora (Upamanyu Boruwa). But instead of contesting the election against Saikia, Borbora props up honest schoolteacher Digombor Rajkhowa (Ranjit Baruah) and engages local rapper Pobitro Sonowal (Kussum Koilash) for influencing people through some hard-hitting songs.', 'Mahmara, in eastern Assam’s Sivasagar district, has traditionally been a Congress bastion. The incumbent MLA is Suren Mohan of the Bharatiya Janata Party (BJP).', 'In the film, it isn’t easy for the wronged man (Borbora) to convince rapper Sonowal to “change lanes” — shift from routine rustic romantic songs to political narratives.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


India does not expect any escalation: Swaraj
['Spreading the word: Congress leader Ghulam Nabi Azad and Home Minister Rajnath Singh at an all-party meeting chaired by External Affairs Minister Sushma Swaraj in New Delhi on Tuesday.', 'The Opposition parties asked pointed questions of the government at a briefing of all political parties on Tuesday morning’s air strikes on terror camps in Pakistan, and requested it to ensure that passions were not whipped up on contentious issues such as Articles 35A and 370 of the Constitution.', 'The meeting, chaired by External Affairs Minister Sushma Swaraj, was attended by Home Minister Rajnath Singh and Finance Minister Arun Jaitley. India’s High Commissioner to Pakistan Ajay Bisaria and Foreign Secretary Vijay Gokhale were present. Defence Minister Nirmala Sitharaman and the Chief of the Air Staff, B.S. Dhanoa, were not present.', 'Ms. Swaraj circulated the Foreign Secretary’s earlier statement, and reasserted that it was a “non-military strike on terror targets” and India did not expect any military escalation.', 'The Opposition parties asked Mr. Bisaria on the likely Pakistani response. “He told us that Pakistan was initially in denial, but they will try to be belligerent. He informed that tomorrow [Wednesday] a meeting of Pakistan’s nuclear command has been called, and claimed that it is only a “sabre-rattling” measure for the international and domestic audience,” a senior Opposition leader said. The Opposition questioned the government on why Air Force and Army officials were not present. They pointed out that the briefing after the surgical strikes had high-ranking Air Force and Army officials who gave specific information about the location of the strikes using maps.', 'CPI(M) general secretary Sitaram Yechury, according to sources, asked the government to specify which “Balakot” was struck. There are two locations, one in Pakistan-occupied Kashmir and another in Khyber Pakhtunkhwa.', 'The Home Minister said the site hit was in Khyber Pakhtunkhwa, and the jets entered nearly 80 miles (128 km) inside Pakistan air space across the Line of Control.', 'The Opposition parties questioned this claim. “It sounds very unrealistic that they entered so many miles inside, but the government did not respond to our question,” a senior Opposition leader said.', 'Former J&K Chief Minister Omar Abdullah flagged the “panic” in the Kashmir Valley and the apprehension of a possible war. He said people were stocking up on food items and there was a fuel shortage. He urged the government to relocate the people on the LoC who could be impacted in case of any retaliatory action by Pakistan. Mr. Abdullah said the terror attack by JeM was to ensure that Kashmir did not vote with the rest of the nation and therefore the government should not fall into this trap.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.', 'A 5-judge constitution bench headed by CJI says that even if one per cent chance of mediation exists in the politically sensitive land dispute matter, it should be done.']


Shopping Guide: Shopping for Desk Chairs
['When you’re choosing seating for a home office, don’t forget to think about where else you might be using it.', 'At the office, a desk chair usually has just one purpose: to keep you comfortably upright in front of a computer.', 'In addition to serving as a place to sit and write a letter or compose a quick email, for instance, a desk chair ought to be able to function as extra seating at the dining table, or in the living room.', 'That means that a high-tech, lever-sprouting task chair isn’t necessarily the best choice.', 'How long will you really be sitting there? An honest answer to that question, Ms. Gachot said, will help determine how much support and cushioning is required.', 'Should it have armrests? They can provide extra comfort, but measure how high they are, Ms. Gachot advised, to ensure that the chair can be tucked under your desk when it’s not in use.', 'Should it have casters? They are convenient for scooting between work areas, but not essential. For a seat that will double as a dining chair, it may be better to forgo them.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Oscars Red Carpet: Lady Gaga, Billy Porter, Kacey Musgraves and More at the Academy Awards
['Here’s everything we saw.', 'And a very brief moment of exciting gender fun but overall a very traditional view of mens’ and womens’ dressing.', 'Jonah Bromwich is based in New York. He writes for the Style section.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Oscars 2019: ‘Green Book,’ Rami Malek and Olivia Colman Are Winners
['LOS ANGELES — “Green Book,” about a white chauffeur and his black client in segregation-era America, won best picture and two other trophies at the 91st Academy Awards, overcoming a series of awards-season setbacks and mixed critical notices.', 'In many ways, the ceremony — the first without a host in 30 years — played out like the more populist and less prestigious Golden Globes: veering in multiple directions as voters sprinkled their attention among a dozen pictures, with no film walking away with a commanding sweep.', 'A gobsmacked Colman gave a giggling, circuitous acceptance speech that nonetheless managed to address the elephant in the room — that her victory had denied one to Glenn Close (“The Wife”), who had been expected to break her seven-nomination losing streak.', 'Spike Lee was not as sanguine. When “Green Book” won best picture, he made a disgusted gesture and started walking out of the theater as “Green Book” producers gave their speeches. Backstage, Lee said, “No comment,” when asked about the coronation of “Green Book,” which detractors complain has a retrograde view of race.', 'In a major shift from the #OscarsSoWhite years of 2015 and 2016, this year’s ceremony, which lasted a little over three hours, was notable for the diversity of honorees. Two “Black Panther” crew members, Hannah Beachler (production design) and Ruth E. Carter (costumes), became the first African-Americans to receive Oscars in their respective categories. Cuarón received the prize for best cinematography for “Roma,” making him the first director to win for shooting his own film.', 'Asian-Americans were represented in the victory of “Free Solo,” which was named best documentary. (“Bao,” which won best animated short, was made by a Canadian filmmaker of Asian descent.) L.G.B.T. people were acknowledged with “Bohemian Rhapsody.', 'And the Oscar for best Academy Awards host goes to … nobody!', 'So began this hostless, in-a-hurry Oscars, itself a longtime institution moving forward and putting on a show without the public face it started with.', 'And as it turns out, Hart — or whoever might have replaced him — was hardly missed.', 'Brian May and Adam Lambert opened the Academy Awards ceremony.', 'The show took its lead from the Grammys, opening with a rowdy rendition of “We Will Rock You” by Queen.', 'Tina Fey, Amy Poehler and Maya Rudolph then took the stage and — while explaining they were not the hosts — gave a mini-performance that drew relaxed laughter from the audience and seemed to make the case that the three women should be hired to co-host next year, pronto. In a quick segue, they began presenting the Oscar for best supporting actress at the show’s eight-minute mark. Last year, it took the show 18 minutes just to get through Jimmy Kimmel’s monologue.', 'Two subsequent awards also found African-American women called to the stage. Carter, a three-time nominee (“Amistad,” “Malcolm X”), won best costume design for her Afro-futuristic “Black Panther” attire. Beachler made history herself for her work (with Jay Hart).', 'The film also won for Ludwig Goransson’s score.', 'The Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences had pressed the producers of this year’s ceremony to drastically reduce the running time. Last year, the Oscars stretched to almost four hours — beyond the endurance of viewers, with ratings dropping to a record low. In one abandoned plan, the academy wanted to award four Oscars, including hair and makeup, during the commercial breaks, with the winning moments edited and aired later in the broadcast.', 'Perhaps as a protest, intentional or not, the three winners for hair and makeup, honored for their work on “Vice,” took their time at the microphone. In an awkward and halting set of thank yous, they fumbled with a piece of paper containing names and went way over their allotted 90-second time. Producers started the playoff music and ultimately cut sound to the microphone.', 'Notably, none of the winners from “Bohemian Rhapsody” thanked Bryan Singer, who was fired as the film’s director because of erratic behavior on the set and has been dogged by sexual misconduct allegations.', 'The first win for “Green Book” was a supporting actor victory by Mahershala Ali. It was Ali’s second supporting actor win in recent years. (He previously won in 2017 for his role in “Moonlight.”) Ali became the second African-American man to win two Oscars for acting, joining Denzel Washington.', 'Peter Ramsey, one of the three-credited “Spider-Verse” directors, spoke about the importance of inclusion in animated films. “We see you, we’re powerful,” he said to fans who identified with the diverse characters in the film.', 'Pixar did not leave empty-handed, thanks to its win for “Bao,” conceived and directed by Domee Shi. Even the space-race thriller “First Man” picked up an award, for visual effects.', 'An earlier version of this article misstated the ancestry of the filmmaker of “Bao.” The filmmaker is a Canadian of Asian descent; she is not an Asian-American.', 'Nobody Hosted the Oscars. And They Did a Fine Job of It.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


This Week’s Wedding Announcements
['All of the weddings right here on one handy page for you.', 'Patrice Moss and Melvin Witcher Jr.', 'Melvin Witcher Jr. got a first glimpse of Patrice Moss in April 2015 during an Easter play performed at the First Baptist Church in Glenarden, Md.', 'Mr. Witcher, who is admittedly shy, did not try starting a conversation with her. “The words were just stuck in my throat,” he said.', 'Two months later, he managed to let a few of those words loose and steered them in Ms. Moss’s direction when he bumped into her at a housewarming party in Upper Marlboro.', 'Two months later, Mr. Witcher and several friends were sitting in a restaurant when Ms. Moss walked through the door with several of her friends.', 'But this time, he went over to her and they chatted briefly and exchanged phone numbers.', 'But Mr. Witcher was still shy, which is why he didn’t call or text her for nearly a week. “I guess I was a little nervous,” he said. But Ms. Moss was not exactly sitting home waiting for her phone to ring.', 'Two weeks later, they were back where they started, at the same church, where a music festival was being staged.', 'Read more.', 'Jessica Rose Brandt and Dr. Jeffrey Alan Tornheim were married Feb. 20 in Westmoreland Hills Park in Bethesda, Md. Rabbi Hannah Goldstein, a friend of the couple, officiated. On Feb. 24, Rabbi Adam J. Baldachin also a friend of the couple, is to lead a Jewish ceremony at Casa Maya Kaan, a private villa in Tulum, Mexico.', 'Ms. Brandt, 35, is a fellow in foreign policy at the Brookings Institution in Washington, where her research focuses on multilateral institutions and the geopolitical consequences of state fragility. She is a David Rockefeller fellow of the Trilateral Commission and a term member of the Council on Foreign Relations in Manhattan. She graduated with honors from Johns Hopkins University and received a master’s degree in public policy from Harvard.', 'She is a daughter of Janet E. Ribardo of Lakewood Ranch, Fla., and Alan J. Brandt of West Nyack, N.Y. The bride’s father retired as the principal at Intermediate School 193 in the Bronx, and then retired as the director of curriculum for kindergarten through Grade 12 at the College Board in Manhattan. Her mother retired as an independent nurse practitioner, based in Yorktown Heights, N.Y.', 'Dr. Tornheim, 37, an infectious disease doctor, is an assistant professor of medicine and a physician-scientist at Johns Hopkins University School of Medicine in Baltimore. His research focuses on the application of new diagnostic technologies to improve health outcomes in the treatment of drug-resistant tuberculosis in India. He graduated magna cum laude from Brandeis University and received a medical degree and a master’s degree in public health from Mount Sinai School of Medicine, now known as the Icahn School of Medicine.', 'He is the son of Bonnie J. Tornheim and Mark Tornheim of Surprise, Ariz. His mother retired as a teacher at Sequoia Elementary School in Pleasant Hill, Calif. His father retired as a commercial real estate appraiser at the Alameda County Assessor’s Office in Oakland, Calif.', 'The couple met in the summer of 2016 through the dating app JSwipe, and when he moved to Mumbai, India, for the academic year in September, they then met for extended dates around the world in Tel Aviv, Paris, Lake Tahoe, Calif., and finally in Goa, India.', 'Craig Emery Szalai and Geoff Charles Todebush were married Feb. 23 at the Ritz-Carlton in Rancho Mirage, Calif.', 'Mr. Szalai (left), 42, is a senior manager for talent acquisition in the North American headquarters of Tommy Hilfiger in New York. He graduated from Allegheny College in Meadville, Pa.', 'He is the son of Janet E. Szalai and Emery A. Szalai of New Kensington, Pa. Mr. Szalai’s father, who is retired, owned Emery Szalai Architects and Associates in Pittsburgh.', 'Mr. Todebush, 48, is a senior vice president for production operations at Viacom in New York, where he works across several brands like Comedy Central, MTV and Nickelodeon. He graduated from Hobart College.', 'He is a son of the late Betty L. Todebush and the late Ralph B. Todebush Jr., who lived in St. Charles, Ill. Mr. Todebush’s mother worked as a sales associate at Talbots, a clothing store in Naples, Fla. His father was a data processing manager for Nichols-Homeshield, a company that manufactures specialized aluminum products in Naperville, Ill.', 'The couple met in 2006 through Match.com in New York.', 'Jeanne Esther Leitenberg and Jordan Isaac Newman were married Feb. 23 at Liberty House, a restaurant and events space in Jersey City. Rabbi Inna Serebro-Litvak officiated.', 'The bride, 35, is a television screenwriter in Los Angeles. Her credits include the CW’s “Gossip Girl” and ABC Family’s “Chasing Life.” She graduated from Emerson College in Boston.', 'She is a daughter of Marion M. Orr and Jack M. Leitenberg of New City, N.Y. The bride’s father is a New York-based manager for the musicians Lionel Loueke, Butcher Brown and Grégoire Maret. Her mother, who is retired, managed the career of the jazz artist Bob James and his record company, Tappan Zee Records.', 'The groom, 34, works in Los Angeles as a digital strategist for political campaigns. He currently serves as a digital director at Leadership for Educational Equity, an organization that helps elect teachers to public office. He graduated from Boston University.', 'He is the son of Mara H. Newman and Jeffrey D. Newman of Randolph, N.J. The groom’s mother retired as an outpatient dietitian at Morristown Medical Center in Morristown, N.J. His father, also retired, worked as a principal at PricewaterhouseCoopers in New York, and currently serves as president of Temple Shalom in Succasunna, N.J.', 'The couple met in October 2016 through the dating app Bumble.', 'Jessica Taylor Sutton and Patrick Thomas Quinn were married Feb. 23 at the Holy Trinity Church in Brooklyn. The Rev. Kate Salisbury, an Episcopal priest, performed the ceremony.', 'Mrs. Quinn, 30, is a senior associate in the litigation department at Willkie Farr & Gallagher, the Manhattan law firm. She graduated magna cum laude from Duke with two bachelor’s degrees, one in linguistics and one in French. She also received a law degree from the University of Pennsylvania.', 'She is the daughter of Christine Akerman Holzer of Manhattan and Dennis P. Sutton of Plano, Tex. The bride’s father is the director of owner relations and communications at Compass Royalty Management, an oil and gas asset management company in Addison, Tex. Her mother is a psychotherapist in private practice in Manhattan.', 'The bride is the stepdaughter of the late Karl Akerman, who owned Rocketfuel Sales, a sports management company in Manhattan.', 'Mr. Quinn, 29, is counsel at Two Sigma Investments, a hedge fund in Manhattan. He graduated magna cum laude from Villanova University, with two bachelor’s degrees, one in accounting and one in finance. He also received a law degree from the University of Pennsylvania.', 'He is a son of Aimee Quinn and Thomas P. Quinn of Havertown, Pa. The groom’s mother is the mathematics department chair at Merion Mercy Academy in Merion Station, Pa. His father, who is retired, was formerly the director of project management at Johnson & Johnson in Raritan, N.J.', 'The couple met in June 2014 while working together as associates at Willkie Farr & Gallagher.', 'Julia Niles Ward and Bryant Anthony Rich were married Feb. 23 at the Fifth Avenue Presbyterian Church in New York. The Rev. Kate Dunn, a Presbyterian minister, officiated.', 'The bride, 32, is the manager of workplace strategy in New York for New York Road Runners. She graduated from Davidson College and received a masters of public administration in nonprofit management from N.Y.U.', 'She is a daughter of Nancy N.W. Ward and Alex Ward of New York. The bride’s father is the editorial director of book development at The New York Times. Her mother is the vice president and the managing director of the Independent Journalism Foundation in New York, which creates training centers for journalists in Eastern and Central Europe and Southeast Asia.', 'The groom, 34, is a vice president in the credit research group at Conning Asset Management in Hartford. He graduated from Bowdoin College and received an M.B.A. from Georgetown.', 'He is the son of Vanessa L. Bryant and Tracy L. Rich of Avon, Conn. The groom’s mother is a United States District Court judge in Hartford for the District of Connecticut. His father is a retired executive vice president and general counsel for the Guardian Life Insurance Company of America, for which he now serves as of counsel to the company.', 'The couple met in October 2016 through the dating app Hinge.', 'Diana Dae Yeon Won and Hassan Emaduddin Ansari were married Feb. 21 at the Manhattan Marriage Bureau. Angel L. Lopez of the city clerk’s office officiated.', 'The couple met at the University of Michigan, from which the groom graduated and received a law degree, and each received a master’s degree in public policy.', 'The bride, 30, is a program manager in New York for the Pershing Square Foundation, a charitable venture that has provided more than $400 million in grants since 2006. She graduated magna cum laude from Rutgers and received a Fulbright grant in 2011-12 to teach English at the Autonomous University of Bucaramanga in Bucaramanga, Colombia.', 'She is a daughter of Junghee Won and Jongil Won of Closter, N.J.', 'The groom, 29, is an assistant professor of law at the Lahore University of Management Sciences in Lahore, Pakistan, where he teaches courses in legal theory and human rights to undergraduates. He is currently on sabbatical to conduct research in New York.', 'He is the son of Iram Ansari and Hassan Ansari of Lahore.', 'The couple met at a Mexican Independence Day party in September 2013, and began dating the next year.', 'Joanna Rose Genco and Dr. Christian Joseph Zaino were married Feb. 23 at the Shrine Church of St. Bernadette in Brooklyn. The Rev. Glenn Sudano, a Roman Catholic priest and a cousin of the groom, performed the ceremony.', 'Mrs. Zaino, 31, is a registered nurse in the Morristown, N.J., office of Garden State Urology, a group practice based in Whippany, N.J. She graduated from Hunter College, and received an associate degree in nursing from Phillips School of Nursing at Mount Sinai Beth Israel in Manhattan and a bachelor of science degree in nursing from the University of Texas at Arlington.', 'She is a daughter of Phyllis J. Genco and Joseph S. Genco of Brooklyn. The bride’s father, a retired dental technician, oversaw Genco Restorations, a dental laboratory in Brooklyn.', 'Dr. Zaino, 34, is an orthopedic hand surgeon at the Orthopedic Institute of New Jersey in Morristown. He graduated magna cum laude from N.Y.U., from which he also received a medical degree.', 'He is the son of Anita R. Zaino and Barney B. Zaino of Brooklyn. The groom’s father, who is retired, owned Dental Connections, a dental equipment and servicing company in Brooklyn.', 'The bride and groom, who each grew up in Dyker Heights, Brooklyn, met in 2009 at NYU Langone Medical Center while Ms. Genco worked for one of Dr. Zaino’s mentors. Five years later, after Dr. Zaino contacted the NYU Langone office, where she was still working, to do some research, she asked him out for a drink just to catch up. Instead, he asked her out to dinner in Red Hook, Brooklyn.', 'Pooja Patel and Alastair Eric Rami were married Feb. 22 at the Manhattan Marriage Bureau. Angel L. Lopez, a staff member of the city clerk’s office, officiated. On March 5, Jacob Ritter, an interfaith minister, is to lead the couple in an exchange of vows in a ceremony on the beach at the Phi Phi Island Village Beach Resort on Ko Phi Phi Island, Thailand.', 'Ms. Patel, 30, works as a director of legal affairs at Glossier, a cosmetics company in New York. She graduated summa cum laude from the University of Maryland and received a law degree from Harvard.', 'She is a daughter of Margi Patel and Navin J. Patel of Gaithersburg, Md. The bride’s father is an independently contracted software engineer for United States Customs and Border Protection in Alexandria, Va. The bride’s mother is a division chief at the Department of Defense in Arlington, Va.', 'Mr. Rami, 34, works as a team lead at Bridgewater Associates, an investment firm in Westport, Conn. He previously served as the deputy chief of staff and legislative director to Representative Henry Cuellar, Democrat of Texas. He graduated from Northwestern and received an M.B.A. from Stanford.', 'He is a son of Angela A. Rami and Anand C. Rami of Vancouver, Wash. The groom’s father works in Vancouver as the president of Silicon Innovation, a firm that advises companies that manufacture polysilicon.', 'The couple met in 2012 at a bar in Washington while both were graduate students.', 'Naomi Tanya Levin and Avraham Shneur Zalman Cohn are to be married Feb. 24 at Crystal Plaza, an events space in Livingston, N.J. Rabbi Naftali Citron is to officiate.', 'The bride, 35, will be taking her husband’s name. Until 2018, she was a software developer at Yext, an online business-management technology company in New York. She ran in the 2018 election as the Republican candidate in New York’s 10th Congressional District. She is on the board of Endowment for Middle East Truth, a pro-Israeli nonprofit group in Washington informing legislators and policy decisions on national security and the Middle East. She is also a vice president on the board of the Manhattan Republican Party. She graduated from Boston University with a dual bachelor’s degree in computer science and biology.', 'Ms. Levin is a daughter of Larissa V. Levin and Leonid A. Levin of Newton, Mass. Her father is a computer science professor at Boston University. He is a member of the American Academy of Arts and Sciences in Cambridge, Mass. Until 1992, her mother was a biochemist focusing on cancer research at the University of Massachusetts Medical School in Worcester.', 'The groom, 31, who is known as Abe, is an intellectual property lawyer at the Cohn Legal Group in New York, a division of Howard M. Cohn & Associates in Cleveland, in which his father, Howard M. Cohn, a patent lawyer, is the managing partner. The groom graduated cum laude from the University of Maryland and received a law degree from Yeshiva University.', 'He is a son of Basha Cohn and Mr. Cohn of Beachwood, Ohio.', 'The couple met in 2016 when Ms. Levin and a group of her friends met Mr. Cohn and a group of his friends at a sushi lounge in Midtown Manhattan.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Trilobites: Tiny Tyrannosaur Hints at How T. Rex Became King
['The deer-sized dinosaur preceded one of Earth’s most fearsome predators.', 'A new species of dinosaur, a tiny relative of the Tyrannosaurus rex, called Moros intrepidus, lived 96 million years ago and its fossils were found in central Utah.', 'Tyrannosaurs weren’t always tyrants. For millions of years, the ancestors of the regal T. rex were relegated to second-class predator status while a different dinosaur dynasty ruled over what is now North America: towering allosaurs.', 'To better understand how and when tyrannosaurs became giants, paleontologists have sought examples of their lineage from when they were small. Their latest discovery is a tiny tyrannosaur that lived in the shadow of larger predators some 96 million years ago.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'In 2012 while Dr. Zanno was fossil hunting in central Utah, she noticed a dinosaur leg bone sticking out from a rocky hillside. The next year she and her team excavated the fossilized remains. Although the bones were poorly preserved, she could tell by how thin they were that they belonged to a theropod, which is the major group of carnivorous dinosaurs that include allosaurs and tyrannosaurs.', 'The upper leg bones of Moros intrepidus.', 'The next steps were to find whether the tiny tyrannosaur belonged to a new species or was a juvenile of a known species.', 'The fossilized leg bone was sticking out from a hillside in central Utah.', 'Nicholas St. Fleur is a science reporter who writes about archaeology, paleontology, space and other topics. He joined The Times in 2015. Before that, he was an assistant editor at The Atlantic.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Nine Key Questions About the Green New Deal
['Representative Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez of New York and Senator Edward J. Markey of Massachusetts, right, announcing the resolution on Feb. 7.', 'Want climate news in your inbox?', 'A Green New Deal is Technologically Possible. Its Political Prospects Are Another Question.', 'What is the Green New Deal?', 'The Green New Deal is a congressional resolution that lays out a grand plan for tackling climate change.', 'Introduced by Representative Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez of New York and Senator Edward J. Markey of Massachusetts, both Democrats, the proposal calls on the federal government to wean the United States from fossil fuels and curb planet-warming greenhouse gas emissions across the economy. It also aims to guarantee new high-paying jobs in clean energy industries.', 'The resolution is nonbinding, so even if Congress approves it, nothing in the proposal would become law.', 'Variations of the proposal have been around for years.', 'Ms.', 'Will there be a vote on it?', 'Yes.', 'Republicans have cast the Green New Deal as a socialist takeover and say it is evidence that Democrats are far from the mainstream on energy issues.', 'Mitch McConnell, the Senate majority leader, plans to bring the plan to the floor as early as next week. Democrats say that the vote would be a stunt because Republican Senate leaders do not want to have a sincere debate about climate change.', 'What problem is the Green New Deal addressing?', 'Oil refineries near Norco, La. The Green New Deal calls on the federal government to wean the United States from fossil fuels.', 'The goal of the Green New Deal is to reduce greenhouse gas emissions in order to avoid the worst consequences of climate change while also trying to fix societal problems like economic inequality and racial injustice.', 'Subscribe today for free.', 'Supporters of the Green New Deal also believe that change can’t just be a technological feat, and say it must also tackle poverty, income inequality and racial discrimination.', 'A Green New Deal Is Technologically Possible. Its Political Prospects Are Another Question.', 'What are its main provisions?', 'The Green New Deal calls on the federal government to dramatically reduce greenhouse gas emissions, create high-paying jobs, ensure that clean air, clean water and healthy food are basic human rights, and end all forms of oppression.', 'To achieve those goals, the plan calls for the launch of a “10-year mobilization” to reduce carbon emissions in the United States. It envisions sourcing 100 percent of the country’s electricity from renewable and zero-emissions power, digitizing the nation’s power grid, upgrading every building in the country to be more energy-efficient, and overhauling the nation’s transportation system by investing in electric vehicles and high-speed rail.', 'To address social justice, the resolution says it is the duty of the government to provide job training and new economic development, particularly to communities that currently rely on jobs in fossil fuel industries.', 'What doesn’t it say?', 'The resolution doesn’t do any of those things.', 'The resolution itself also steers clear of endorsing or rejecting specific technologies or sources of energy, something that Mr. Markey said was done purposefully to encourage broader support for the plan.', 'What’s with the name?', 'The Green New Deal takes its name and inspiration from the major government makeover, known as the New Deal, launched by President Franklin D. Roosevelt to help the United States recover from the Great Depression.', 'That series of public-works programs and financial reforms included the Civilian Conservation Corps (which put people to work in manual labor jobs like planting trees and constructing park trails) and the creation of the Public Works Administration to work on the construction of bridges, dams, schools and more.', 'Like the original New Deal, the Green New Deal is not a single project or piece of legislation.', 'What are the costs?', 'That’s not clear yet.', 'President Trump claimed it would cost $100 trillion. Supporters of the Green New Deal say climate change could be equally costly to the American economy. For now it’s impossible to pin down dollar figures on the plan.', 'Modernizing the electrical grid across the United States could cost as much as $476 billion, yet reap $2 trillion in benefits, according to a 2011 study issued by the Electric Power Research Institute.', 'Ms. Ocasio-Cortez has acknowledged that the Green New Deal is going to be expensive, but contends the plan will pay for itself through economic growth.', 'Do critics offer alternative proposals?', 'How will the Green New Deal shape the debate?', 'At the same time, all of the attention on the Green New Deal has put new pressure on Republican critics to come up with their own plan for cutting greenhouse gases.', 'It is likely that the Green New Deal will remain a lightning rod throughout the 2020 presidential campaign.', 'Lisa Friedman reports on climate and environmental policy in Washington. A former editor at Climatewire, she has covered nine international climate talks.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Trilobites: The World’s Largest Bee Is Not Extinct
['An expedition of conservationists found a living Wallace’s Giant Bee on remote islands in Indonesia. It hadn’t been seen since 1981.', 'Wallace’s giant bee, shown here with a honeybee for scale, has a wingspan of more than 2.5 inches and a body the size of a thumb.', 'It’s been 38 years since scientists last spotted the insect known as Wallace’s Giant Bee, a rare species found only in a group of Indonesian islands called the North Moluccas. With a wingspan of 2.5 inches and a body the size of a human thumb, it’s considered the world’s largest bee, and was feared extinct.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'The discovery did not come easily. Despite the bee’s size, its rarity, remote location and nesting habits make it difficult to find.', 'The bees make their homes by digging holes in the nests of tree-dwelling termites, where they spend much of their time hiding.', 'Photographer Clay Bolt, left, and a guide, Iswan, photographing the Megachile pluto nest in the North Moluccas of Indonesia.', 'Though Wallace didn’t seem particularly interested in the bee — he devoted only a single line to it in his journal — it became something of an obsession among biologists. The next sighting didn’t come until 1981, when Adam Messer, an entomologist, observed several in the wild and returned home with a handful of specimens that are now held in the American Museum of Natural History in New York, the Natural History Museum in London and other institutions.', 'Dr. Messer observed that the bees use their unusually large mandibles to scrape together balls of tree resin and wood to fortify their nests, and that they are relatively solitary animals.', 'Simon Robson of the University of Sydney with the live specimen, the first time a living Megachile pluto has been photographed and videotaped.', 'The plan now is for the team to return to the island and conduct more extensive research, but “that will involve making links with local scientists in the area and getting permission to go and work with them,” said Dr. Robson.', 'Can You Pick the Bees Out of This Insect Lineup?', 'Do Bees Know Nothing?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Upper East Side Salon Under Investigation for Racial Discrimination
['New York City is reviewing complaints from former employees at Sharon Dorram Color at Sally Hershberger who say their hair was deemed inappropriate for work.', 'A client getting her hair washed at Sharon Dorram Color at Sally Hershberger on the Upper East Side of Manhattan.', 'Former workers at a luxury Upper East Side hair salon that is under investigation for racial discrimination said this week that they were told by the management there that Afros and box-braided hairstyles did not reflect the upscale image of the neighborhood.', 'Between 2016 and 2018, four complaints were filed to New York City’s human rights commission about the management and one senior stylist at Sharon Dorram Color at Sally Hershberger. The resulting investigation into the salon led, in part, to the announcement last week of the city’s ban on discrimination based on hair.', 'Two other complaints were filed in June 2018. One was from a former receptionist who is Hispanic and claimed she was asked to steer clients away from stylists who refused to sign a document attesting to the fairness of the salon’s dress code.', 'Ms. Dorram asked him to create a dress code.', 'Ms. Ocasio, 28, who is Puerto Rican, said in an interview this week that she quit her job at the salon because she felt the hair-up rule was racist.', 'Ms. Roberts said that if white employees wore their hair down, “no one said anything.” She quit in May 2016 and filed a complaint several months later in December.', 'Afro.', 'Ms. Guy described the policy of mandating ponytails and buns as “a cop-out.” She said: “They were trying to figure out a way to have me not wear my hair like this,” referring to her Afro.', 'Ms. Aubourg, 26, also quit shortly after the rules were introduced, about a year after she was hired. When she started at the salon in October 2014, Ms. Aubourg wore her hair in a weave and it was straight. But later that year, after she came back from vacation with box braids, a senior stylist, Tim Lehman, didn’t approve, she said.', 'Mr. Lehman did not reply to repeated requests for comment.', 'Ms. Dorram vehemently denied that the employee hair policy was racially motivated and said the text messages were mischaracterized. She also said she offered Ms. Roberts a promotion and a raise and claimed that after Ms. Roberts quit, she would return to the salon for blowouts.', 'On Wednesday, Mr. Tuttleman said he was unaware of the details of the allegations. He described himself as a “silent partner,” who is not involved in the daily operations of the salon. “Of course, I don’t condone racial discrimination at all and never would support it in any capacity,” he said.', 'Mr. Speer, the general manager, shared emails with the Times that he sent to Ms. Hershberger and Mr. Tuttleman in August of 2015 informing them that he was resigning because he refused to enforce dress code policies.', 'On Wednesday, Ms. Guy recalled that in her time at the salon, clients reacted positively to her look.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Marella Agnelli, Society’s ‘Last Swan’ and a Passionate Gardener, Is Dead at 91
['Marella Agnelli and her husband, Giovanni Agnelli, in 1988.', 'Marella Agnelli, a descendant of Neapolitan nobility who lived a rarefied life of palatial estates, ornamental gardens, fine art, high fashion and lofty society, died on Saturday at her home in Turin, Italy. She was 91.', 'The death was announced by the Agnelli family in a statement.', 'Mrs. Agnelli remained active and creative in her later years, purchasing and restoring a dilapidated villa in Marrakesh, Morocco, publishing an autobiographical coffee table book and appearing in an HBO documentary about the life of her husband, in 2003.', 'She was born Princess Marella Caracciolo di Castagneto on May 4, 1927, in Florence. Her mother, the former Margaret Clarke of Peoria, Ill., was a wealthy Anglo-American expatriate, the daughter of a distiller; her father, Filippo Caracciolo, was part of a Neapolitan noble family.', 'The Agnellis in Rome in 1954.', 'Marella’s world expanded with her education. She studied art and design at the Académie des Beaux-Arts and Académie Julian in Paris before moving to New York in the early 1950s. There she modeled in exchange for the chance to learn about photography from Erwin Blumenfeld, a Vogue contributor.', 'The life of Mr. Agnelli, known as Gianni to his friends, seemed in line with the adventurous one she hoped to lead. She had heard stories about his service in World War II from friends and knew well of his tight-knit family’s penchant for glamour and speed.', 'Fiat, the company Mr. Agnelli’s grandfather founded in 1899 in Turin, had experienced tremendous growth after the war during a period known as Italy’s “miracolo economico,” or economic miracle. Accordingly, the Agnellis insulated their lives with excess: parties, villas, yachts, cars, women.', 'Gianni, the eldest of the seven Agnelli children and the head of the family since his parents’ deaths, had a reputation for being a playboy and had frequently been mentioned in gossip columns. So when he and Marella got engaged in 1953, it was a relief to his siblings.', 'The Agnellis’ villa in the hills of Italy’s Piedmont region.', 'After the wedding, Mrs. Agnelli was not eager to take on the role of housewife. She had recently spent 18 months apprenticing with Blumenfeld and accepted a reporting job with Condé Nast, which she abandoned after the wedding.', 'What she did love, though, was the leisure and the luxury. In the Vanity Fair article, she recalled a shopping trip in Paris shortly after the wedding. Mrs. Agnelli had booked an overnight train from Turin, and when she boarded her sleeping car, she found that it was full of her home comforts: monogrammed towels, her favorite toiletries, even fresh flowers.', 'Marella Agnelli during the funeral service for her husband, Gianni Agnelli, of the Fiat car manufacturing empire, in Turin, Italy, in 2003.', 'The couple had their first child, Edoardo, in 1954, and Margherita followed the next year. Mrs. Agnelli is survived by her daughter, Margherita Agnelli de Pahlen, her brother Nicola Caracciolo di Castagneto and eight grandchildren. Her son died in 2000.', 'As parents Marella and Gianni continued to refine their image as a power couple. They acquired an expansive contemporary art collection that included works by Jasper Johns, Robert Rauschenberg and Frank Stella; yachted up and down the Amalfi Coast with John and Jacqueline Kennedy and swam in the Adriatic Sea with Mr. Capote; collected cars, yachts and private planes; and cultivated acres of pristine gardens at their several homes on three continents.', 'Gardening was one of Mrs. Agnelli’s lifelong passions. She spent decades working with the English garden designer Russell Page to perfect her family’s 25 acres at Villar Perosa in Turin, and later got involved with the Italian Environmental Fund, an organization focused on preserving historic landscapes. Her love of landscape architecture was cataloged in two books that she co-wrote, “Gardens of the Italian Villas” (1987) and “The Agnelli Gardens at Villar Perosa: Two Centuries of a Family Retreat” (1998).', 'Gaia Pianigiani and Vanessa Friedman contributed reporting.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Domains: We Love to Be Smushed
['Heavy bedding is everywhere. Does it work?', 'Mr. Roche wanted out of architecture, but bubble ball, he reckoned, was maybe not the most sustainable future. He had been reading self-help books on entrepreneurship and they all said the same thing: Just start something.', 'By June of 2017 he had an online shingle, some basic Google ads and a place on Amazon. By 2018, rocabi was selling thousands for $199 and had branched out, just before Christmas, with a new item: the Boyfriend Blanket, made from shearling and denim, to mimic the look of a cozy jean jacket.', 'Mr. Roche is hardly alone in his heavy-bedding endeavor. Weight may be the new thread count, as he and other newly minted makers of therapeutic comforters hope to turn the bedroom into a quasi-medical space, the latest iteration in the commodification of sleep.', 'One frigid afternoon when the Polar Vortex was in town, I dragged the Boyfriend Blanket onto the sofa, furry side up. I put myself and the cat on top, and wrestled the Napper into place over my shins.', 'Thus encumbered, the cat and I passed out.', 'Penelope Green is a reporter for Styles. She has been a reporter for the Home section, editor of Styles of The Times — an early iteration of Styles — and a story editor at the Times magazine.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Trilobites: Sleepless Flies Lived Long Lives. Why Not Us?
['Sleepless Flies Lived Long Lives. Why Not Us?', 'Sleepless Flies Lived Long Lives. Why Not Us?', 'Flies deprived of sleep didn’t see reductions in their life spans. Does that mean we’ve got sleep deprivation all wrong?', 'Researchers developed a system for monitoring fruit flies kept track of their movements with cameras and used tiny motors that would tip the flies any time they went still for 20 seconds.', 'Sleep — that absurd, amazing habit of losing consciousness for hours on end — is so universal across the animal kingdom that we usually assume it is essential to survival. Now, however, scientists who repeatedly disturbed the sleep of more than a thousand fruit flies are reporting that less slumber may be necessary for sustaining life than previously thought, at least in one species.', 'A handful of studies involving dogs and cockroaches going back to the late 19th century suggest that being deprived of sleep can result in a shortened life span. But the methods behind some of these studies can make it difficult to say whether the test subjects were harmed by sleep deprivation itself, or by the stress of the treatment they were given — such as being shaken constantly.', 'The new study took a milder approach, in hope of seeing the true effects of sleep deprivation. The automated system the researchers developed for monitoring the flies kept track of their movements with cameras, scoring any extended period without movement as sleep. When they were not being awakened repeatedly, the males slept about 10 hours a day, females about five on average.', 'To keep the flies awake, the researchers equipped the system with tiny motors that would gently tip the flies any time they went still for at least 20 seconds. With this method, researchers deprived flies of rest over the course of their entire lifetimes, tipping them hundreds of times a day such that if they were snoozing during those periods of stillness, they might have been able to sleep around 2.5 hours a day on average.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'While female flies in the experiment died about ten days sooner than other flies, male flies had completely normal life spans of about 50 days. Dr. Gilestro suggests that perhaps whatever sleep is doing in the way of essential maintenance can happen in a very, very short period of time, such that little sleep is required to keep an organism alive.', 'The study has limitations. It looked at only a single strain of fruit fly, said Dragana Rogulja, a professor at Harvard who studies sleep using fruit flies. “In principle, I think it would be have been awesome to test multiple strains,” she said, to understand whether other flies, some of which can live much longer, respond similarly.', 'Additionally, not everyone agrees that the scientists have succeeded in accurately recording when the flies are awake or asleep. Some periods in which flies made tiny movements were scored as waking time, for instance.', 'Dr. Gilestro countered that these movements are not the same as the twitches that occur while animals are asleep.', 'The flies walked around in between the recorded small movements, and they appeared to be feeding or grooming at those times.', 'The work touches on an interesting question: how much does the length of time spent asleep connect to sleep’s beneficial effects? For most of us, knowing exactly how much sleep you need to be healthy is likely to remain of academic interest. The unpleasant effects of missing even a couple hours, or being awakened even a couple times during the night, tend to discourage experimentation. But it’s intriguing to think that perhaps some of that time spent asleep matters less than the rest of it.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Trilobites: Why Do Zebras Have Stripes? Scientists Camouflaged Horses to Find Out
['If you spend time around horses or flies, you might want to invest in some zebra print.', 'Those stripes might be some of nature’s most effective insect repellent.', 'What’s black, white and striped all over — except for its head?', 'Horses wearing zebra coats on a farm in Britain.', 'The animals weren’t attending a masquerade. They were dressed for studies investigating a mystery that has puzzled scientists for more than a century.', 'Wallace were theorizing about evolution, scientists have debated the function of this sassy animal print. It’s been called camouflage to confuse big predators, an identity signal to other zebras and a kind of wearable air conditioner. Now most scientists agree that the function of a zebra’s stripes is to ward off biting flies that can carry deadly diseases.', 'But what exactly is it about a zebra’s wardrobe that flies don’t like?', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'A horse dressed as a zebra to investigate fly behavior in England.', 'The flies pestered all of the horses and the zebras in the paddocks equally. But once they got close, the zebra stripes seemed to dazzle the flies so much that they couldn’t manage a controlled landing. Flies zoomed in too fast and either veered off just in time — or simply bumped into the zebra and bounced off. The flies didn’t seem to like the zebra coats on horses, either, but their bare heads were fair game.', 'The only thing they can say for certain is that the high contrast between black and white most likely tricks the fly’s low-resolution vision, which relies on sensing movement.', 'In an optical illusion called the barber pole, diagonal stripes appear to move up or down, depending on which way the pole is rotating. Something similar could be happening as flies approach zebra stripes. From afar, the fly may interpret the object as gray, but as it moves closer, the zebra’s diagonal stripes may appear to be moving in false directions. As a result, a fly may think it’s headed toward open space instead of landing. Or perhaps the sudden appearance of stripes may overload the fly’s vision and startle it into a buzzing stupor.', 'The researchers are now conducting tests with coats of different patterns, contrasts and thickness, to see just what it is about the stripes that stops the flies. “By playing around with those variables, we’ll be able to get inside the head of the fly, or the eye of the fly, to work out what’s sort of confusing to it,” said Dr. Caro.', 'In the meantime, people planning on being around horses or horse flies may want to consider wearing zebra print rather than a solid to avoid being bitten. You should probably make your horse a twinsie, too.', 'What’s Black and White and Travels 310 Miles?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Neptune Has a Newly Discovered Moon. What Else Is It Hiding?
['Neptune Has a Newly Discovered Moon. What Else Is It Hiding?', 'Neptune Has a Newly Discovered Moon. What Else Is It Hiding?', 'There is much more to learn about the solar system’s eighth planet, which hasn’t been visited by a spacecraft for 30 years.', 'A recent image taken by the Hubble Space Telescope of the planet Neptune, whose tally of moons has been upped to 14 in a new paper.', 'It’s time to add one more tiny moon to Neptune’s icy family tree. Astronomers using the Hubble Space Telescope have spied a previously undetected satellite around the solar system’s eighth planet, bringing its total number to 14.', 'That’s especially true for Uranus and Neptune, which are known as the ice giants. While every other planet in our solar system has been poked and prodded by multiple spacecraft, these two remain largely unexplored.', 'Mark Showalter, a researcher at the SETI Institute in Mountain View, Calif., did not set out to make this discovery. He was analyzing Neptune’s rings with a new technique to process old images that essentially twisted them while adding them together. That allowed him to better see the rings, which are both faint and quick-moving.', 'On a whim, he decided to apply that same technique to other parts of the image he produced. To his surprise, a tiny white dot appeared.', 'Further analyses have confirmed that it is a moon, and a rather odd one.', 'An image made by the Hubble Space Telescope in 2004, showing Neptune and some of its moons — including Hippocamp — at right. Hippocamp is also shown enlarged in the inset image top right.', 'When Voyager 2 zipped past Neptune in 1989, it revealed a dynamic world with winds that whip and churn through its atmosphere at speeds as high as 1,500 miles per hour. Its blue atmosphere was also marked by a dark blemish nicknamed the Great Dark Spot. And while it was reminiscent of Jupiter’s Red Spot, which has remained intact for hundreds of years, Neptune’s spot vanished roughly five years later. In the years since, other blemishes have come and gone — each a mystery.', 'As are Neptune’s rings and moons. From Earth, the rings appear to clump together into partial rings, or arcs, unseen elsewhere in the solar system and previously thought impossible (any such material in orbit around the planet should stretch into a continuous ring). But Neptune’s arcs persist and astronomers can’t say why.', 'Only a closer look could explain these mysteries.', 'Studying Neptune and Uranus could also have implications for our understanding of thousands of worlds detected in orbit around distant stars.', 'Astronomers, however, think the tide is turning. In a survey produced every 10 years by an expert committee that ranks funding priorities for NASA, a mission to the ice giants was ranked third after missions that would return samples from Mars and visit Jupiter’s moon Europa. Given that scientists have made headway on the first two, a mission to these blue orbs might have good prospects in the near future.', 'It’s the Solar System’s Most Distant Object. Astronomers Named It Farout.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Inside the Rise and Fall of a Multimillion-Dollar Airbnb Scheme
['Two apartments at 385 Greenwich Street in TriBeCa, Manhattan, were illegally offered through Airbnb, city officials said. According to a lawsuit, they were part of an enterprise that made more than $20 million in revenue.', 'Multiple misleading identities, more than 100 host accounts and 18 corporations were created to run an illegal hotel business in Manhattan, according to a lawsuit filed by the city.', 'Two apartments at 385 Greenwich Street in TriBeCa, Manhattan, were illegally offered through Airbnb, city officials said. According to a lawsuit, they were part of an enterprise that made more than $20 million in revenue.', 'From the outside, there was nothing especially notable about the small white building on the corner of a cobblestone street in TriBeCa. But until recently, it was a crucial location in a sprawling empire.', 'Two of the three apartments in the building were popular with tourists looking to stay in one of Manhattan’s most desirable neighborhoods — at $600 a night each, they were a bargain for a large group.', 'But they were also illegal — part of an elaborate real estate scheme to make millions by circumventing state and local laws and Airbnb’s own rules.', 'The plot was geared toward getting around city regulations that are intended to keep blocks of apartments from being turned into makeshift hotels that avoid lodging taxes and oversight.', 'Interviews and documents offer a glimpse at how the New York scheme worked. According to the suit, the ring used multiple misleading identities to dodge Airbnb’s rules, text tourists and book apartments to budget-minded travelers. Addresses were fudged to avoid scrutiny. A cadre of cleaners was apparently recruited through Facebook.', 'In all, more than 100 Airbnb host accounts and 18 corporations were created to run an illegal hotel business that stretched north from TriBeCa to SoHo, Gramercy, the Upper East Side and Harlem, according to a lawsuit brought by the city.', 'One apartment on Greenwich Street was advertised on Airbnb as “Beautiful Loft Prime Tribeca 4BR/2BA Sleep 10” for $600 a night.', 'New York regulations are supposed to keep apartments from being pulled out of an already-tight rental market to cater to the tourist trade. They specify that it is illegal to rent an entire apartment in most buildings for fewer than 30 days unless the permanent tenant is present while the renter is there.', 'Posting a unit that should not be listed on Airbnb is a civil offense, not a criminal one, and the city typically issues violations that can result in fines of thousands of dollars; lawsuits are filed in the most egregious of cases. In this lawsuit, the city is seeking more than $20 million from the defendants.', 'At the center of the scheme was Max Beckman, 35, a former real estate broker, according to the lawsuit. Mr. Beckman, who moved to the United States 18 years ago from Israel, was one of five people accused. There has not been a verdict, and the case is continuing.', 'Mr. Beckman agreed to be interviewed, making clear that he believed that he did nothing wrong.', 'What he did have was an ambitious, though risky, idea.', 'It was 2012 and Mr. Beckman, in his own telling, was struggling to make it as a real estate broker. He said he had a dismal credit score and $100 to his name when he used that money to pay the application fee for a one-bedroom on the Upper East Side.', 'He began renting it out, short term, to tourists through Airbnb and pocketed the difference after paying rent. It was a simple business model he would go on to replicate.', 'In 2015, Mr. Beckman quit his job as a real estate broker for Metropolitan Property Group, a brokerage firm in Manhattan, to devote himself full time to his Airbnb venture.', 'He persuaded two friends who were also brokers at the firm to become his partners, he said. The men, Alon Karasenty and Simon Itah, were also sued by the city. They did not respond to multiple requests for comment.', 'By the end of the year, the trio was managing dozens of listings on Airbnb, including large spaces in some of the city’s most sought-after neighborhoods — a penthouse overlooking Central Park, a loft in Chelsea — according to court documents.', 'The lawsuit alleged that Mr. Beckman’s former employer, Metropolitan Property Group, and its chief executive officer, Sami Katri, along with his wife, Shely Katri, were also involved.', 'Some of the 18 corporations that received payouts from Airbnb had been registered using Metropolitan Property Group’s office addresses. The suit also claimed the Katris’ names were linked to two Airbnb accounts and the utility bills for two apartments at 200 East 116th Street in East Harlem, where all seven units were on Airbnb.', 'The listing on Airbnb for a four-bedroom unit at 200 East 116th Street in East Harlem.', 'But Mr. Beckman said that the addresses were used without the company’s knowledge and that the Katris were not involved.', 'Mr. Katri, through his lawyer, said he had partnered with Mr. Karasenty and Mr. Itah to legally lease apartments at the East Harlem building, but was unaware they were rented out through Airbnb.', 'The scheme required leasing scores of apartments.', 'Some landlords claimed they were deceived, renting apartments to Mr. Beckman and his partners without knowing the units would be used as hotel rooms.', 'For example, Mr. Beckman signed leases for two apartments in another East Harlem building in late 2017, according to a separate lawsuit filed by the building’s owner last year.', 'A day after signing the lease, the apartments were on Airbnb under the host names “Cedric” and “Tom & Lisa,” the lawsuit said.', 'The rent for one apartment was $3,225, but it was on Airbnb for $250 a night. Hypothetically, Mr. Beckman could cover a month’s rent by filling it with tourists for about two weeks.', 'The owner of 78 East 119th Street in East Harlem sued Max Beckman after Mr. Beckman leased two apartments in the building and rented them to tourists through Airbnb.', 'In just a few months, Mr. Beckman had booked more than 500 guests and generated about $84,000 from the building at 78 East 119th Street, according to the city’s lawsuit.', 'Some residents in the 10-unit building grew annoyed by strangers constantly showing up with luggage.', 'The listing for an apartment in East Harlem. The city has argued that Airbnb has diminished the supply of housing available to full-time renters.', 'The city learned that the units were on Airbnb and slapped the landlord with violations last year, meaning daily fines that could have cost about $60,000, according to Gary Wachtel, a lawyer for Orsipel, the company that owns the building.', 'Airbnb has long said the majority of its hosts are everyday New Yorkers who rent out a spare bedroom or list their apartment while on a long vacation.', 'Still, the company has voluntarily taken down more than 5,000 commercial listings since late 2015. The city estimates that about one-third of listings on home-sharing websites are run by commercial operators; Airbnb disputes those numbers.', 'Under Airbnb’s “One Host, One Home” policy, New Yorkers can list only one apartment, with few exceptions.', 'But Mr. Beckman and his partners appear to have bypassed that policy by creating host accounts using different email addresses and multiple identities, including those of relatives and some with variations of the same name (“Jacob Itah” vs. “Jacob Itach”).', 'They also provided Airbnb with incorrect or incomplete addresses for apartments to avoid scrutiny, according to the city’s lawsuit.', 'Josh Meltzer, the head of public policy for Airbnb in the Northeast, condemned the behavior and acknowledged the limitations of the company’s rules, which he said were intended as a short-term remedy.', 'The mayor and other politicians have argued that Airbnb listings diminish the supply of apartments available to full-time renters, making the city’s affordable housing crisis even worse.', 'But Mr. Beckman said that he never rented out rent-stabilized units and that his listings did not take apartments away from low-income New Yorkers. The majority of the units were high-end apartments in expensive neighborhoods, he said.', 'Ultimately, Mr. Beckman believes the city’s tourism industry could benefit if lawmakers allow apartments to be offered on Airbnb and taxed like hotels.', 'For him, the proof is that he and his associates made it work.', 'At its peak, the city claimed, the business run by Mr. Beckman and his partners booked tens of thousands of guests for 55,331 nights over three years across 35 different buildings.', 'Six buildings each generated more than $1 million in revenue; the top-earner was a residential building in Kips Bay that brought in about $1.8 million, according to the city.', 'At the beginning, Mr. Beckman said, he decorated the apartments with used furniture, but later was able to afford an interior designer.', 'He was also able to employ 15 housekeepers who roamed Manhattan tidying up the apartments, he said.', 'Indeed, most tourists left positive ratings in listings reviewed by The New York Times, although a few lobbed complaints.', 'The Airbnb listing for an apartment at 385 Greenwich Street. Mr. Beckman said his listings did not take units away from low-income New Yorkers.', 'Ms. Swift said she felt unsafe when someone entered the apartment to replace a couch without notice while she was away. She realized the apartment above hers was also a faux hotel after she saw three different groups cycle in and out during her 10-day stay.', 'The lease for one of the apartments in the TriBeCa building was signed by Mr. Beckman and his two partners, and the monthly rent checks of $25,000 for both units were mostly paid by different corporations connected to the men, according to court documents.', 'The landlord, a company presided over by Charles Cohen, terminated the lease in March as a result of the short-term rentals, the lawsuit said. But, according to court documents, Mr. Cohen continued to receive monthly checks until the end of 2018, and the apartments were on Airbnb’s website as late as a few weeks ago.', 'It was unclear whether landlords were typically aware of the Airbnb operations in their buildings, and Mr. Beckman refused to comment on the matter.', 'Mr. Cohen, who appeared to have leased apartments in other buildings where the partners listed Airbnbs, did not respond to multiple requests for comment.', 'All seven apartments in a building at 200 East 116th Street in East Harlem were offered on Airbnb.', 'One night in early January, a police sergeant showed up outside Mr. Beckman’s apartment to serve him with a notice that the city was going to sue him.', 'Mr. Beckman was not home, so the sergeant left the notice with his wife.', 'Since then, Mr. Beckman, who has two children, has been huddling with his lawyers and shuttering his Airbnb operations, terminating dozens of apartment leases.', 'The city also sued five buildings for not cracking down on Airbnbs managed by Mr. Beckman and his partners despite violations issued by the city.', 'Abington Properties, the owner of three of the buildings, did not reply to multiple requests for comment. A secretary for Helm Management, which runs the East Harlem building that became a de facto hotel, said the company did not comment on pending litigation.', 'Mr. Beckman said he intended to reach a settlement with the city, even if that meant paying a hefty fine. He said that, despite the lawsuit, he spoke to The Times because he thought the city had unfairly portrayed him as a criminal.', 'Now, he said, his sights were on “legal new ventures.” Asked to elaborate, he said he was starting a business to sell electric scooters, which are illegal to ride on New York City streets, but could be legalized by the City Council soon.', 'Derek M. Norman contributed reporting. Doris Burke contributed research.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Balakot camp had over 200 terrorists, says official
['This image made out of Google Maps locates Balakot town in Mansehra district of Khyber Pakhtunkhwa Province of Pakistan.', 'The Balakot camp run by the terrorist outfit Jaish-e-Mohammed (JeM) that was hit by the Indian Air Force in the early hours of Tuesday “housed more than 200 terrorists”, a senior government official said.', 'On the banks of the Kunhar river, the camp offered the possibility of aquatic training to terrorists. Trainers at the camp were “ex-Army personnel”, the official said.', 'The camp was initially used as a training camp by the Harkat-ul-Mujahideen (HuM), another terrorist outfit active in Jammu and Kashmir and supported by Pakistan.', 'He was one of the main conspirators involved in the hijacking of the Indian Airlines flight IC 814 to Kandahar in 1999. The JeM chief was released by India in exchange for the hijacked passengers. His name was on a list of 20 fugitives handed over by India to Pakistan in 2002.', 'Watch | Indian Air Force strike in Balakot: what next?', 'In 2000, the Interpol on the basis of a request by the Central Bureau of Investigation (CBI) opened a red corner notice against Yusuf Azhar. The notice said that his place of birth was in Karachi, Pakistan and he was fluent in “Urdu and Hindi”, He is wanted in India for “hijacking, murder and kidnapping”.', 'The ex-official said the JeM was run like a “family enterprise”. “After Azhar, his brothers, Rauf and Ibrahim, are the most important functionaries. The next in line is Yusuf. While the main recruiter continues to be Masood Azhar, Yusuf’s job is to mainly train recruits. Masood likes to remain in the background post-2001 Parliament attack,” he said.', 'Masood Azhar’s relatives and cadres were trained at Balakot in advanced weapons and tactics, he said.', 'According to him, the first camp handed over to JeM was between Mansera and Balakot in 2001. “These camps were located in Pakistan-occupied Kashmir (PoK) earlier but after pressure built on Pakistan post-2001 Parliament attack, they were shifted to deep inside Pakistan,” he said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', "IAF strikes on JeM's Balakot terror camp: who is Yusuf Azhar?", 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.', 'A 5-judge constitution bench headed by CJI says that even if one per cent chance of mediation exists in the politically sensitive land dispute matter, it should be done.']


Balakot air strikes: Punjab border districts put on high alert
['BSF personnel at the Wagah border, about 35 km from Amritsar, on Tuesday.', 'Punjab has put six of its border districts on high alert following the Indian Air Force’s strikes on a Jaish-e-Mohammed terror camp in Pakistan, officials said. Ferozepur, Tarn Taran, Amritsar, Gurdaspur, Pathankot, and Fazilka were on the list, an official spokesperson said.', 'Chief Minister Amarinder Singh chaired a high-level law and order review meeting and ordered a series of measures.', 'However, there was no decision to evacuate people along the border, an official spokesperson said. The Chief Minister’s Personal Secretary Suresh Kumar, Chief Secretary Karan Avtar Singh, Home Secretary N.S. Kalsi, DGP Dinkar Gupta and DGP (Intelligence) V.K. Bhanwara were present at the meeting.', 'Officials said deputy commissioners and the police chiefs of the border districts have been asked to put in place all contingency plans to ensure the protection and safety of the citizens.', 'As a confidence-building measure, the Chief Minister will visit the border areas from Pathankot to Ferozepur by road on Wednesday, the spokesperson said.', 'The State government was in touch with the Union Home and Defence ministries, officials added. Captain Amrinder, who spoke to Union Home Minister Rajnath Singh, earlier tweeted his support for the strikes.', 'Immediately after the Pulwama attack the Chief Minister, a former Army captain, had made it clear that he was in favour of a strong retaliatory action and that the Congress would support any action by the Centre.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', "IAF strikes on JeM's Balakot terror camp: who is Yusuf Azhar?", 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.', 'A 5-judge constitution bench headed by CJI says that even if one per cent chance of mediation exists in the politically sensitive land dispute matter, it should be done.']


Gujarat cancels leave of police personnel following IAF strike on JeM camp
['High alert was sounded across Gujarat on Tuesday after India successfully carried out a “non-military pre-emptive” strike targeting a training camp of the Jaish-e-Mohammad (JeM) at Balakot in Pakistan.', 'Chief Minister Vijay Rupani said the alert was sounded after the Air Force carried out strikes in Pakistan targeting the terror base.', 'Director General of Police Shivanand Jha issued high alert across the border districts of Kutch, Banaskantha and Patan even as all District Superintendents of Police and Range Inspector Generals of Police were asked to remain stationed at their respective headquarters.', 'Three border districts — Patan, Banaskantha and Kutch in particular — have been put on high alert, with the Indian Air Force on high alert at its air defence systems across the western border with Pakistan.', 'Gujarat shares a long international land and coastal border with Pakistan. The State is seeking to prevent any infiltration attempts, especially through border districts of Kutch, Banaskantha and Patan.', 'Meanwhile, a suspected drone was reportedly shot down by the Air Force at Kutch. However, there was no official word regarding the incident.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', "IAF strikes on JeM's Balakot terror camp: who is Yusuf Azhar?", 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Parrikar discharged from Goa hospital; to continue treatment at home
['Ailing Goa Chief Minister Manohar Parrikar was on Tuesday evening discharged from the State-run Goa Medical College & Hospital(GMC), where he was being treated since Saturday for complications arising from advanced pancreatic cancer he has been suffering from.', 'According to hospital sources, Mr. Parrikar was admitted to the GMC on Saturday after he suffered internal bleeding. “Chief Minister has been discharged from GMC. His health parameters are stable. Will continue with his treatment at home,” a CMO statement issued on Tuesday evening said.', 'After he was discharged from the hospital, he was taken to his private residence near here. The former Defence Minister was diagnosed with advanced pancreatic cancer in February last year.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


White House Climate Panel to Include a Climate Denialist
['Water from recent heavy rainstorms breached a levee in Novato, Calif., on Feb. 14.', 'Want climate news in your inbox?', 'WASHINGTON — President Trump is preparing to establish a panel to examine whether climate change affects national security, despite existing reports from his own government showing that global warming is a growing threat.', 'Happer, whose views are sharply at odds with the established scientific consensus that carbon dioxide pollution is dangerous for the planet.', 'William Happer, a physicist serving as President Trump’s deputy assistant for emerging technologies, has said carbon dioxide is beneficial to humanity.', 'Scientists defended the research already conducted by the government. “The link between climate science and national security has been closely studied for over a decade at the highest levels of the U.S. government — by scientists, the Defense Department and intelligence agencies — and all those studies have made a strong case that various aspects of climate change have an effect on national security,” said Michael Oppenheimer, a professor of geosciences and international affairs at Princeton.', 'Critics focused on the appointment of Dr. Happer to the panel given his public history of denying established climate science.', 'Dr. Happer suggested to the purported funders that he not be paid directly. “My activities to push back against climate extremism are a labor of love,” he wrote.', 'How to Cut U.S. Emissions Faster? Do What These Countries Are Doing.', 'How the United States could cut emissions in half, using policies that other countries already have in place.', 'The peer-reviewed reports, researched over several years, were published by more than 13 federal agencies alongside dozens of academic researchers. Dr. Oppenheimer scoffed at the White House’s contention that the reports had not gone undergone rigorous peer review.', 'In addition to those reports, the Pentagon has commissioned and funded scientific research on the impact of climate change and sea-level rise, in order to plan for the effects on low-lying military installations.', 'For example, the report suggested that a string of South Pacific islands that is home to the Ronald Reagan Ballistic Missile Defense Test Site, which operates space weapons programs and tracks NASA research, could be uninhabitable by as soon as 2035 because of rising sea levels.', 'That Pentagon-funded research came after more than a decade of major military and scientific studies, dating back to the George W. Bush administration, that linked climate change to national security threats.', 'Nicholas Fandos contributed reporting.', 'Coral Davenport covers energy and environmental policy, with a focus on climate change, from the Washington bureau. She joined The Times in 2013 and previously worked at Congressional Quarterly, Politico and National Journal.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Measles Outbreak: Your Questions Answered
['One in 10 children with measles gets an ear infection, which can lead to permanent deafness.', 'What is measles?', 'Measles is an extremely contagious virus. It can cause serious respiratory symptoms, fever and rash. In some cases, especially in babies and young children, the consequences can be severe. Measles killed 110,000 people globally in 2017, mostly children under 5.', 'Like the Science Times page on Facebook.', 'Science Times newsletter.', 'How is measles transmitted?', 'Measles is transmitted by droplets from an infected person’s nose or mouth. If you’re in a room with someone infected with measles, you can inhale their virus when they cough, sneeze or even talk. Infected people can transmit the measles virus starting four days before they develop a rash, so they may be contagious before they realize they have the disease. They remain able to spread the virus for about four days after the rash appears.', 'What are the symptoms of measles?', 'But after two or three days of that, fever spikes to 104 or 105 degrees and the telltale red dots appear on the skin, first on the face, then spreading down the body.', 'Abel Zhang, 1, being helped back into his clothes by his mother, Wenyi Zhang, center, his grandmother, Ding Hong, left, and Dr. Lauren Lawler, after receiving inoculations for measles, mumps and rubella at a clinic in Seattle.', 'Is there a cure for measles?', 'No. The vast majority of people who contract measles haven’t been vaccinated, and giving them the measles vaccine within 72 hours of being exposed to the virus might help — at least by reducing the severity and duration of the symptoms. The Mayo Clinic says that pregnant women, babies and people with weak immune systems can receive an injection of antibodies called immune serum globulin within six days of being exposed to measles, which might prevent or lessen the symptoms.', 'How safe and effective is the measles vaccine?', 'Children should receive two doses of the vaccine: the first when they are 12 to 15 months old; the second when they are between 4 and 6 years old. If infants who are between 6 and 11 months old are about to travel from the United States to another country, the C.D.C. recommends they receive one dose of the vaccine beforehand.', 'People who don’t get the vaccine are at very high risk for contracting measles. “Almost everyone who has not had the MMR shot will get measles if they are exposed to the measles virus,” the C.D.C. says.', 'If I’m not vaccinated, is it too late to get the shot?', 'If most people are getting vaccinated, why does it matter if I don’t vaccinate my child?', 'You are probably thinking of the concept of herd immunity, which means that if a large number of people are protected from a disease by a vaccine, the disease will be less likely to circulate, diminishing the risk for people who are unvaccinated. The threshold for herd immunity varies by disease — for a highly contagious disease, a very high percentage of people need to be vaccinated to meet that threshold.', 'In a hypothetical community where nobody has immunity from the measles virus, one infected person might infect 12 to 18 people, who might each infect another 12 to 18 people. At this rate, a small outbreak would quickly grow out of control.', 'In a hypothetical community where nobody has immunity from the measles virus, one infected person might infect 12 to 18 people, who might each infect another 12 to 18 people. At this rate, a small outbreak would quickly grow out of control.', 'In a hypothetical community where nobody has immunity from the measles virus, one infected person might infect 12 to 18 people, who might each infect another 12 to 18 people. At this rate, a small outbreak would quickly grow out of control.', 'In a hypothetical community where nobody has immunity from the measles virus, one infected person might infect 12 to 18 people, who might each infect another 12 to 18 people. At this rate, a small outbreak would quickly grow out of control.', 'Wait, didn’t we eliminate measles?', 'In 2000, measles was declared eliminated from the United States because the country had gone for more than 12 months without any “continuous disease transmission” within its borders. “Eliminated” doesn’t mean the disease was completely eradicated; it means the United States no longer had any places where the disease was endemic or homegrown.', 'Most of the American cases since 2000 have been the result of people traveling to or from countries where measles is endemic because there is little vaccination.', 'How many people haven’t been vaccinated?', 'Who are the people not getting vaccinated?', 'Generally, those who do not immunize their children are demographically more white and more educated, Dr. De St. Maurice said. “In part due to the success of vaccines, people are not as familiar with these diseases, so they question their effectiveness,” she said. Conversely, when the disease reappears, as it did in Washington, demand for vaccines rises.', 'Don’t states have laws requiring parents to vaccinate their children?', 'Signs warning patients at a clinic in Vancouver, Wash.', 'Are the states with lax laws the ones with the most measles cases?', 'There have not been enough cases to warrant a major survey, but Dr. Saad Omer of the Emory Vaccine Center in Atlanta warned that with a rising number of cases, that could change.', 'Dr. Omer, who studies immunization coverage and disease incidence, said research had shown that states that allow more exemptions have increased pertussis (whooping cough) outbreaks.', 'Studies have also shown that people who refuse vaccines are disproportionately represented in the early stage of outbreaks. “They’re providing the tinder that can start the fires of the epidemics,” Dr. Omer said.', 'How does the U.S. compare with other countries?', 'Canada, Britain and Switzerland are a few of the Western countries that are below 90 percent.', 'Worldwide cases of measles have increased 30 percent since 2016, the World Health Organization said last year.', 'Does this mean mumps and rubella cases are re-emerging, too?', 'C.D.C., and cases have increased in recent years, from 229 in 2012 to 6,366 in 2016.', 'Rubella used to cause millions of infections in the United States.', 'According to the C.D.C.', 'Rubella was declared eliminated in the United States in 2004, and the C.D.C. says that fewer than 10 cases are reported each year. But, as with measles and mumps, there are still many countries where it persists because of lack of vaccination, and every case since 2012 has been traced to people infected while traveling or living in another country.', 'Pam Belluck is a health and science writer. She was one of seven Times staffers awarded the 2015 Pulitzer Prize for International Reporting for coverage of the Ebola epidemic. She is the author of “Island Practice,” about a colorful and contrarian doctor on Nantucket.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


styles Q. AND A.: Where Is Carine Roitfeld Now? Making Perfume
['The longtime editor of Vogue Paris strips down to advertise seven new scents.', 'Ms. Roitfeld near her office on Avenue Montaigne in Paris.', 'They will be placed in hot spots all over the city. No model, fashion editor or tourist will be able to escape them. A team has been hired to put up new posters if the first ones are vandalized or covered up.', 'Ms. Roitfeld, 64, has long been a ubiquitous force during the shows here. As the editor in chief of Vogue Paris for 10 years and, later, the founder of CR Fashion Book, she was a front-row regular. Her parties are known for being the most exclusive and elaborate, attracting celebrities like Lady Gaga and Kim Kardashian West.', 'But in those roles she was still somewhat in the background: an editor and influencer, not the main event. Now that’s about to change.', 'They will retail for $285 apiece on Net-a-Porter beginning Monday, May 6 (coincidentally the same day that her rumored longtime rival, Anna Wintour, hosts the Met Gala). Ms. Roitfeld hopes the perfumes will be the beginning of a long line of products that will perpetuate her personal brand and legacy.', 'We had questions.', 'Tell us about the teaser posters. Are you ready for your nude photo to be all over Paris?', 'The photo was actually taken as a joke. It was two years ago, and my daughter was just taking photos of me for fun. But then I thought it might be perfect for this. I asked my son and business partner, Vladimir, if it was O.K., because sometimes I go too far.', 'I like to push. I’m not afraid. I’m following in the footsteps of some notable perfumes. Opium by Yves Saint Laurent. To call something Opium today would be forbidden. Look at Tom Ford; he had naked people in all of his pictures. A lot of people refused to put it in the magazine, but with French Vogue we did. I love the aesthetic.', 'What is the best and worst thing somebody could say about it?', 'The best thing somebody could say about it is you have a good body or you are fearless.', 'If they say “I don’t like your butt,” I don’t care. When you become a public figure you get so many butt comments on Instagram. But I don’t want anyone to think I’m pretentious. Of course I’m a bit of an exhibitionist; that I will accept. But if someone says: “Who do you think you are?” That I would not like.', 'Do you have a favorite Paris Fashion Week memory?', 'For the 90th anniversary of Paris Vogue we held the first masked ball. I copied it after the Truman Capote ball, and I tried to be at that level; I think we beat it. The girls wore the most eccentric dresses. It was a dream, dream, dream party.', 'Stone had a huge mask on for the cover of the issue, and Philip Treacy left with a big poster of her at 2 a.m.', 'Then when I launched CR Fashion Book at Raspoutine, a nightclub, we had a vampire ball. It was so exciting because everyone came for me not just because I was with Vogue. It made me happy because you don’t know if you will disappear.', 'I remember John Galliano called me on the phone before the party and said he can’t be there, but he might be the vampire that comes and bites my neck at midnight.', 'Ms. Roitfeld hopes to create other products that will perpetuate her personal brand.', 'What are you most excited about this year?', 'What will be the best show? I cannot say that, I have too many friends in fashion. But of course Chanel is always a dream. Paris Fashion Week is the greatest. I’m so happy to be home. I know people, and we are speaking French. It’s great.', 'But of course Paris has changed a lot, and it’s now very young and international. Before people looked like they were attending a meeting of Congress. Now the new kids come in crazy dressed, and it’s much more fun to look at.', 'Why did you decide to do a perfume?', 'I did a lot of collaborations, a lot of magazines, but it was always something transient. If you don’t like a magazine, thank God, there is another one coming out in three weeks. But for me perfume is a way to have a legacy. Like Miss Chanel. Chanel No. 5 has been around for almost 100 years.', 'I’ve always been very sensitive to smell. I entered a competition one time to test hundreds of vodkas blindly. I knew which one was which based on the smell.', 'Why are they modeled after seven lovers?', 'I worked 10 years with French Vogue, and I knew with advertising it was really hard to talk about perfume. If you show the bottle you look like an advertisement. If you talk about the smell, it’s very difficult to understand smell with words. So with this perfume we decided to have a story behind the perfume.', 'Seven is also my lucky number. If I get an extra lover somewhere I didn’t expect I guess I will have to do more, but this is a starting point.', 'The lovers of the perfume are just fantasies; I came up with them with my cup of tea in bed. I’m much more boring than people think I am. I would love to be like that, to be fun, but I’m really not.', 'Are any of them named after real people?', 'Lawrence, the Dubai perfume, is named after “Lawrence of Arabia.” I discovered all the ways to protect from the sun from that movie. It’s my favorite.', 'Was making perfume harder or easier than you thought?', 'I thought it would be cool to make a perfume, but it’s not cool. There are so many rules and regulations to make sure it doesn’t burn your skin. And they change across countries. In some places you can’t use alcohol, but George has weed base in it.', 'This interview has been edited and condensed.', 'An earlier version of this article, because of a transcription error, gave an incomplete rendering of the name of the filmmaker who wrote, produced and directed “In the Mood for Love.” He is Wong Kar-Wai, not Kar-Wai.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Critic’s Notebook: President Trump Has Inspired Art. That’s Not Always a Good Thing.
['President Trump Has Inspired Art. That’s Not Always a Good Thing.', 'President Trump Has Inspired Art. That’s Not Always a Good Thing.', 'In “Ivanka Vacuuming,” the artist Jennifer Rubell hired an Ivanka Trump look-alike to clean in a former art gallery in Washington.', 'Sandow Birk’s Trumpagruel #5 from “The Horrible & Terrible Deeds & Words of the Very Renowned Trumpagruel” (2017).', 'A projection by the artist Robin Bell on the side of the Trump International Hotel in Washington, D.C., on Jan. 30, 2018.', 'That may be what’s missing from so much Trump art today — the critical introspection to accompany the laughter. Mr. Guston’s drawings and paintings are intimate, as if he were grappling with the reality of Mr. Nixon’s existence. The process of making them was fraught, both politically and artistically; only a handful were shown in the following decades (Mr. Guston died in 1980). I don’t mean to suggest that contemporary artists like Ms. Bernstein and Mr. Birk don’t know the stakes of our time — I’m sure they do — but hanging on the white walls of galleries, for the eyes of a largely liberal, self-selecting public, caricatures of President Trump feel safe. Creators and viewers alike get validation, rather than a prompt for examination or self-reflection.', 'Part of the trouble may also be with the form. When you have a president whom many people already view as a caricature, representing him as such loses some of its disruptive power. As with Ms. Rubell’s performance, you end up with familiar images and generalized meanings. What would it look like to make art about the Trumps without their likeness? How might it create different aesthetic and political possibilities?', 'An earlier version of this article referred incorrectly to the project titled “Ivanka Vacuuming.” There was one look-alike model vacuuming, not several. The error was repeated in a picture caption.', 'Is Donald Trump, Wall-Builder-in-Chief, a Conceptual Artist?', 'Painting Shows Trump Hanging Out With Lincoln and Nixon. He Loves It.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Critic’s Notebook: The Lustful Middle School Girl Rises
['In the middle school of the American collective imagination, packs of filthy-minded boys stalk the halls, snapping bras and howling at the cliff’s edge of puberty. The sex-obsessed adolescent girl is a rarer breed. More often girls are positioned as victims of raging male hormones, or else they are styled as preternaturally mature, rising above the boys and their juvenile misadventures. Now — in “PEN15,” the film “Eighth Grade” and the Netflix animated comedy “Big Mouth” — the lustful adolescent girl is having her moment.', 'The sex-obsessed adolescent girl is a rarer breed in the pop-culture portrayal of middle school, but shows like “PEN15” (starring Anna Konkle, left) are giving her a moment.', 'It is not, to be clear, an altogether glorious time. At least, it’s not for the girls themselves. Trapped in the years between childhood and adulthood, they are realizing that women are valued for their sex appeal, but do not yet know how to look or feel sexy. They think about boys constantly, but aren’t actually ready to touch them. They pursue sex and romance aggressively, but almost exclusively in their imaginations.', 'Though polished and popular girls — fitted with thongs, coated in lip gloss and paired with boyfriends — exist in their worlds, they might as well belong to a different species. Our girls are awkward and weird. They are undergoing orthodontic treatments. They have made out with every bedpost and doorframe in their bedrooms.', 'Knowing that Elsie Fisher, the star of “Eighth Grade,” was in the same life stage as her character when filming only magnifies the movie’s anxious, claustrophobic feel.', 'In the second episode of “PEN15,” Maya finds herself in a closet make-out scenario with a boy, and when she unclamps her dripping retainer from her mouth, the boy flashes a look of such genuine disgust that you can’t help but feel empathy for both parties. We have seen a version of this dynamic before — it is a staple of the teen movie (à la “She’s All That” and “Never Been Kissed”) for the popular kid to be forced into intimate contact with a loser — but here our alliances have shifted. While it’s clear that Maya has been unfairly ranked in the middle school sexual hierarchy — her “Ace Ventura” impression is criminally underrated — we also recognize that on some level, she is not ready to kiss a boy. And the boy, for his part, seems neither overly judgmental nor indiscriminately sex-obsessed. Through him we see that girls can be revolting, too.', 'The central conceit of “Big Mouth” — pubescent kids are visited by animated hormone monsters — helps to situate its boys and girls as equals.', 'Often tween boys and girls are isolated into separate spheres, portrayed as alien to each other and to adults. But these properties reveal much of adolescent culture that can be shared. When Kayla in “Eighth Grade” finally connects with a boy, it is over their mutual love of the Adult Swim animated comedy “Rick and Morty.” “PEN15” gets its name from the PEN15 Club — a made-up institution that exists to trick other kids to write “penis” on their hands — and the show reveals that such juvenile antics are not exclusive to one gender.', 'In “PEN15,” the 30-something creators, Konkle (left) and Maya Erskine, play seventh-grade best friends with an absurd and haunting realism.', 'Though these are all comedies, they take their horny girls quite seriously. In “PEN15,” the adults who play Maya and Anna are supported by a cast of real middle schoolers. This could easily be played as a sight gag, but instead the choice resonates deeply. It works to punctuate the moment when girls’ growth spurts send them towering over boys, and it dramatizes Maya and Anna’s outsider status at an age when kids seem capable of sniffing out difference on a cellular level.', 'The hyper-realistic style of “Eighth Grade” delivers its own emotional gut punch. The 14-year-old Kayla is played by Elsie Fisher, who was herself 14 when she shot the film. Though Kayla makes YouTube videos for an audience in the single digits, and Fisher is a professional performer, knowing that character and actor are both stuck in the same life stage only magnifies the film’s anxious, claustrophobic feel. Jessi of “Big Mouth” is, of course, a cartoon, which allows the character to careen dramatically between adolescence and maturity. When she gets her period on a field trip to the Statue of Liberty, she is a steel cage of emotional control, but the second she enters her mother’s car after school, she melts into a sub-verbal puddle.', 'New technologies are typically framed as accelerators for the sexual corruption of girls, but here their risks are linked inextricably to great rewards. For the girls of “PEN15,” who together pretend to be a “hot” 26-year-old woman in a chat room, AOL is a portal to disembodied sexual exploration, a way to digitally map out imaginary adult sex lives without actually exposing them to stranger danger. And though it can be painful to watch Kayla lying in her dark bedroom, mainlining her classmates’ Instagram feeds on her phone, it is merely an embodied version of the fantasies that have always thrilled and haunted middle school girls. The “Big Mouth” indifference to technology is its own form of commentary: Social media, it seems to say, just can’t compete with the wild physical and emotional forces of adolescence.', 'Even for a woman who was once a girl like them — I, too, practiced kissing the back of my hand when my mouth was jammed with wires and rubber bands — there can be a frisson of anxiety to actually seeing their private moments revealed onscreen. The default pop cultural perspective remains that of the adult man, and from his vantage point, exposing adolescent female sexuality onscreen can feel predatory or perverted. These comedies have little interest in considering how those men will feel when they are transported into a girl’s bedroom. Girls’ feelings matter, too. And these girls feel so much.', 'An earlier version of a picture caption with this article misstated the surname of one of the actresses. As the article noted, she is Maya Erskine, not Maya Ishii-Peters, which is her character’s name.', 'Why Must I Be a Tween In Lust?', 'Nick Kroll Still Isn’t Over Puberty. Just Ask His Therapist.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Fashion Review: Dressing for Love and War and ‘Wheel of Fortune’
['Prada and Moschino wrestle with reality in unexpected ways; Tod’s goes all-in for leather.', 'It’s a good question at the moment, if a kind of annoyingly existential one, which may be why it’s so hard to handle. At Tod’s, for example, there’s no effort to wrestle with complicated reality; instead there is — leather! As much of it as possible: tailored leather shorts and leather shirts and leather blazers; leather shift dresses and leather puffers; leather trench coats; nappa leather and patent leather. Oh, and some tweed. It’s perfectly accomplished. But not convincing as the answer to everything.', 'More persuasive was Jeremy Scott, and his “don’t we all just need a smile right now? Don’t we all need a little levity in our lives?” explanation backstage before his laugh-in of a Moschino game show.', 'It was funny, no question, but even game show culture has a dark underbelly; problems, after all, can’t really be solved by a spin of the wheel. In recent shows, Mr. Scott has started to grapple with some of the implications of his pop culture one-liners — almost making an art of it — but not this time.', 'This time he seemed distracted by the coming Met Gala, themed around Camp, and its red carpet needs and possibilities. So while there was a lot of sparkle and wit in the clothes (sparkling wit, even), ultimately it was all promise with no real payoff; escape, with little lasting effect.', 'Which doesn’t mean we can’t dream of a happy ending. Mrs. Prada did: One that toggled between Hitchcock heroines and frogwomen, love and war. It’s a perennial story, after all — as human as our lust for a get-rich-quick scheme.', 'The high romance of portrait-necked 1950s party dresses in black wool and silk with swagged skirts caught up at the hip by O-rings, some splashed with bouquets of roses, alternated with crisp white shirt-dresses dangling three-dimensional satin tulips (they were kind of floppy, like they were on their last legs) and army green utilitarian suiting.', "Vanessa Friedman is The Times's fashion director and chief fashion critic. She was previously the fashion editor of the Financial Times.", 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Fashion Review: Bottega Veneta Gets a New Look
['The verdict is in on Daniel Lee’s first runway collection.', 'Wait! Maybe more was going on than boring designer musical chairs.', 'Was Bottega going to reimagine itself as the brand for loyalists of what has become colloquially known as Old Celine? Were they going to have a new place to shop? Was Mr. Lee’s aesthetic also — maybe? — a Philo-phile aesthetic? If so, was that, in fact, a good thing or had its time come and gone (has it been idealized in retrospect)?', 'On Friday morning in Milan, as Mr. Lee unveiled his first runway collection for the brand, everyone got to find out.', 'And the answer is … a qualified yes.', 'Though clearly in the vernacular of Old Celine as well as the house he has just joined, Mr. Lee’s Bottega was tougher, cooler, less interested in tête-à-têtes in an arty corner, and less well-behaved than either past brand. That’s a good thing.', 'It was also, on occasion, overly tricky (especially when it came to quilted skirts that folded into an A-line shape at the sides and linked across the groin with a fancy chain) and sometimes too literal (full-body leather biker jackets and pants). But those are relatively little quibbles. Given the weight of expectations and Mr. Lee’s youth (he’s in his early 30s), it was an impressively confident and coherent debut.', 'A new geometric V was introduced as closures on coats and the flap shape of a pocket, and the aforementioned chain repeated as gold trim on deep round-necked sweaters, and in the form of leather links woven together into a new sort of intrecciato coat.', 'The neck was the erogenous zone, both in reference to Renaissance portraiture and because, Mr. Lee said after the show, “it’s a part of the body most people are comfortable exposing.” Jackets had their collars raised and the lapels wrenched open, the shoulder dropped just off the bone, to create a heart-shaped curve. There were mirrored shirt dresses (shirt dresses are a thing this season) layered atop each other, and two-tone knits twisted up and around and over. There was men’s wear in a similar mode.', 'Even if afterward, with the stress of the reveal finally over, he looked a little played out.', "Vanessa Friedman is The Times's fashion director and chief fashion critic. She was previously the fashion editor of the Financial Times.", 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Buying Abroad, With a Logo
['A growing number of home buyers are choosing to live in corporate-branded communities, with companies from Marriott to Porsche ready to greet them.', 'Ivan and Ann Highley-Gergel, of Philadelphia, bought this Four Seasons branded property on the Caribbean Island of Nevis about a year ago. From their private house, they have access to all the resort’s amenities and facilities.', 'After 16 years of hauling suitcases to the Four Seasons Resort Nevis, Ivan and Ann Highley-Gergel of Philadelphia no longer need to pack for vacations at the Caribbean island resort.', 'About a year ago, the Highley-Gergels paid around $3.5 million for a furnished, four-bedroom villa that comes with a pool and a cottage and is operated by Four Seasons, allowing them to keep the bathing suits, flip-flops and tennis rackets at their otherwise turnkey vacation home.', 'The Highley-Gergels had sworn they would never buy a vacation home because of “the hassle,” but the convenience of buying at a branded development convinced them otherwise. From their private house, they have access to all the resort’s facilities, plus 24-hour security, room service, home maintenance and weekly cleanings.', 'The Highley-Gergels are among a growing number of Americans buying residences in brand-name resort properties, mostly in the Caribbean and Latin America. Elsewhere around the world, international buyers are snapping up easy-to-lock-up-and-leave, high-rise residences under hotel banners like Mandarin Oriental, Marriott, Ritz-Carlton and W, in cities from London to Barcelona to Bangkok.', 'According to a Knight Frank “Global Branded Residences — 2019” report, branded residences are “growing exponentially and can now be found in almost every major city and major holiday destinations,” with more than 400 mostly hotel-branded residences in 60 countries.', 'The Highley-Gergels at their Four Seasons villa. The couple had sworn they would never buy a vacation home because of “the hassle,” but the convenience of buying in a branded development convinced them otherwise.', 'Paul White, president of residential at Four Seasons Hotels and Resorts.', 'More than 80 percent of all projects in its pipeline include a residential component, and eight of the nine new resorts scheduled to open this year will include residences for buyers who want to call Four Seasons their home.', 'In London, for instance, buyers looking to tie the knot with Four Seasons can do so at Twenty Grosvenor Square, A Four Seasons Residence, the hotelier’s new stand-alone project with 37 private residences, a wine cellar, spa, pool, game room and business center, amid private landscaped gardens in the high-end Mayfair neighborhood. About a mile away, the Residences at Mandarin Oriental Mayfair, with 80 luxury apartments, housekeeping and a rooftop bar, are slated to open in 2021.', 'By buying a home with, say, St. Regis or Ritz-Carlton, “you buy into a global brand,” Mr. Bailey said, one able to offer guidance on purchasing real estate in an unfamiliar country with unfamiliar tax laws and regulations. For those buying something that is still under construction, it instills confidence that the developer will deliver a completed product.', "The Highley-Gergels' home came furnished, with a pool and a cottage for guests.", 'Mr. White noted that buying an overseas home under the marquee of a familiar brand also assuages buyers who may be nervous about immersing themselves in a foreign culture.', 'The model has become so popular, in fact, that brands beyond hotels are also attaching their luxury images to residential developments. The Italian jeweler Bulgari now offers residences in London and Dubai. French crystal maker Baccarat operates 60 homes in its Manhattan hotel. Fashion house Fendi is developing 41 Fendi Private Residences in Scottsdale, Ariz. At the Porsche Design Tower in Sunny Isles Beach, Fla., residents can park their cars next to their apartments — even on the 50th floor. And just a few blocks away, 260 luxury residences are nearing completion in the 60-story Armani Casa tower.', 'All that comes at a price.', 'Simon Jacobs, an investor from Manhattan, long considered buying a vacation home in the Caribbean, but he didn’t know where. He was after something with a beachfront, and that was reachable via nonstop flight. “I didn’t want to have to deal with any of the issues,” he said.', 'After checking out possibilities in Anguilla, St. Barts, Barbados, and Turks and Caicos, Mr. Jacobs, 58, his wife Eliana and their two daughters found their dream island home during a Christmas 2015 stay at Sugar Beach, A Viceroy Resort, which is built on an old sugar plantation on St. Lucia and offers privately owned, one- to four-bedroom residences.', 'The 60-story Porsche Design Tower opened in 2017 in Sunny Isles, Fla., with 132 residential units.', 'That May, he paid about $8.25 million for one of the hotel’s five new contemporary beachfront residences, personalizing the 4,200-square-foot house with a double-height living and dining room, a media room and a closet to store snorkeling gear. Since the house was completed a year ago, the Jacobses, who also have a weekend home in Connecticut and summer in Europe, have only been there a few times.', 'But as sales volume rises at branded communities, the average age is falling. Mr. White, of the Four Seasons, said buyers were “younger than expected,” spanning several generations. At resort properties, multigenerational clients are important. “We will see a family buy a residence and bring the grandparents and kids along and use it as a vehicle to build a great legacy and memories,” he said.', 'Four years ago, Mark and Tori Smith bought a beachfront apartment at the Ritz-Carlton Reserve in Dorado Beach, P.R. In 2017, they were fortunate when their new home survived Hurricane Maria largely unscathed.', 'Sagar Desai, the global head of acquisitions and development for Viceroy Resorts, said condo hotels and resort residences started as a way “to help developers financially engineer their deals,” then “morphed into a very unique way to satisfy the needs of guests” who wanted to own homes. Viceroy is currently building residences at new resorts in Panama, Portugal and Mexico.', 'Often, buyers are looking for more than swimming pools and spas. The Four Seasons Palazzo Tornabuoni, popular with Americans and Canadians, houses 37 apartments in a restored 16th-century palace in Florence, Italy, and offers a calendar of lectures and events (wild boar hunting, anyone?) “which you generally wouldn’t find in a residential complex in that location,” Mr. Bailey said. Homeowners also are offered tours to other cities and towns, to help them engage with local culture.', 'Marriott currently has 11 stand-alone residential projects in the works — from a Ritz-Carlton in Singapore to a St. Regis in Dubai and a Marriott in Cairo — as well as eight others in the pipeline.', 'When the Trump Organization launched its Trump International Realty brokerage in 2012, its first project in South America was a luxury residential tower in Punta del Este, a resort area in Uruguay. The building, slated to open in 2020, is not owned by Trump but will bear his brand. About 84 percent of about 160 units have been sold, and the first condos are expected to close by the end of 2019, said Juan Jose Cugliandolo, chief executive of YY, the developer. The Trump Organization currently has 10 properties completed or in development, according to a 2018 report on branded residences by Savills, which lists the organization as the 11th-largest individual residence brand worldwide.', 'As a wider range of brands enters the market, offerings are also being expanded to include people who are not phenomenally wealthy.', 'In 2017, Andrew Ashcroft, a developer, approached Marriott about making Alaia, a 155-unit complex on the barrier reef of Belize’s Ambergris Caye, part of the chain’s Autograph Collection.', 'The Ritz-Carlton Reserve hotel in Dorado Beach, Puerto Rico, was redeveloped in 2012 to include the first Ritz-Carlton Reserve residences.', 'The Smiths’ 3,500-square-foot, three-bedroom apartment includes balconies, ocean views and access to the hotel’s amenities.', 'Slated to open next year, the complex will include studios at $199,000, one-bedrooms at $419,000, two-bedrooms for $649,000, three-bedrooms for $799,000 and eight beachfront villas priced at $1.3 million. Twenty-five percent of inventory is sold, Mr. Ashcroft said, and 85 percent of the buyers are American.', 'Four Seasons also has its eyes on Belize, developing 85 residences as part of a new complex on Caye Chapel, a 280-acre private barrier island, slated to open in 2021.', 'Even as international locales explode in popularity, though, the Savills report notes that the U.S. remains by far the largest market for branded residences, with 32 percent of the globe’s supply. Four years ago, Mark and Tori Smith of Denver purchased a 3,500-square-foot, three-bedroom condo for $3.5 million at the Dorado Beach Ritz-Carlton Reserve, in Dorado, Puerto Rico. When Hurricane Maria hurtled toward the island two years later, the Smiths left before it landed, worried they might lose their investment.', 'They got lucky. The resort suffered extensive damage and the hotel was closed for about a year, but the residents were allowed back when utilities were restored. Last October, Dorado Beach reopened with more than 300,000 new plantings and expanded facilities.', 'Although the Smiths return to Denver every month, they spend a total of five months and a day at the Dorado — the minimum required to call Puerto Rico their permanent residence.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Pakistan resorts to heavy shelling along LoC in J&K; 5 soldiers injured
['The Army on Tuesday said Pakistan Army violated the ceasefire agreement on the Line of Control (LoC) in Jammu and five soldiers were injured.', 'He said in exchange of fire five soldiers of Indian Army suffered minor injuries out of which two soldiers were evacuated to\xa0 military hospital for medical treatment and are stable.', 'The Army said the Pakistani troops were also seen firing mortars and missiles from civilian houses, using villagers as human shield.', 'Earlier, the Jammu-based Army spokesman, in a statement issued, said ceasefire violations by Pakistan were repoted along the LoC in Akhnoor, \xa0Nowshera, Krishna Ghati Sector.', 'The Pakistan Army resorted to heavy mortar shelling on 55 forward areas in Jammu, Rajouri and Poonch districts on Tuesday, Army sources said.', 'They targeted civilian hamlets and forward posts from 1730 hours, firing from small, automatic and heavy weaponry in Krishna Gati, Balakote, Khari Karmara, Mankote, Tarkundi (Poonch district), Kalal, Baba Khori, Kalsian, Laam and Jhangar areas (Rajouri) and Pallanwala and Laleali (Jammu). There was no injury or loss of life in the ceasefire violations, an officer said. Indian troops gave a “befitting reply,” he said.', 'Officials said more than a dozen ceasefire violations took place on Tuesday — the fourth consecutive day of Pakistan shelling and firing on Indian posts.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', "IAF strikes on JeM's Balakot terror camp: who is Yusuf Azhar?", 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Assam spurious liquor death toll mounts to 158
['The death toll in the Assam hooch tragedy rose to 158 on Tuesday while more than 300 people are still receiving treatment at hospitals in Jorhat and Golaghat districts, a health department official said.', 'A man undergoing treatment died on Tuesday at the Golaghat Civil Hospital, taking the toll in the district to 56. More than 50 people are still under care in the hospital, the official said.', 'In Jorhat district, 78 people were recorded to have died at Jorhat Medical College Hospital and another 20 were brought dead, while 260 are undergoing treatment, the official said. In Titabor sub-divisional hospital of Jorhat district, four persons had died so far, he added.', 'As many as 22 people have been arrested in connection with the hooch tragedy in Golaghat and Jorhat districts, police said.', 'Following Excise Minister Parimal Suklabaidya’s directions, the Excise department has launched a crackdown on sale and production of illicit liquor in both the districts as well as across the State to prevent recurrence of such tragedies in the future.', 'The State government has also banned the sale of ‘lali gur’ or red molasses used in production of country liquor.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


BJP-RSS subverting diverse cultures: Rahul Gandhi
['The Conress chief promises to restore ‘special status’ to Assam.', 'Congress president Rahul Gandhi on Tuesday came down heavily on the Bharatiya Janata Party and its ideological mentor Rashtriya Swayamsevak Sangh for “subverting cultures, languages and lifestyles” of the people of the Northeast.', 'Launching his party’s Lok Sabha poll campaign at a rally in Guwahati, Mr. Gandhi also urged the people of Assam “not to forget the Congress” for stopping the BJP from pushing the “anti-Northeast” Citizenship (Amendment) Bill through in the Rajya Sabha.', 'The Congress president began by lauding the Indian Air Force for bombing a Jaish-e-Mohammed camp across the Line of Control, paying homage to the CRPF men killed by a suicide bomber in Pulwama on February 14 and remembering the tea estate workers who died in eastern Assam after consuming spurious liquor.', 'The Congress president said his party would protect “your language and cultures” and promised the people to return whatever the “Modi government has snatched from you” – from the special status of Assam and North East Industrial Policy to jobs and self-respect. He also said Assam would be made the hub of technical education if the Congress is voted back to power.', 'Mr. Gandhi further said his party would ensure that no genuine Indian citizens are left out of the National Register of Citizens being updated in Assam.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.', 'A 5-judge constitution bench headed by CJI says that even if one per cent chance of mediation exists in the politically sensitive land dispute matter, it should be done.']


Government’s power became visible today, says PM Modi
['Prime Minister Narendra Modi on Tuesday said the country was in “safe hands” and he would not let the nation bow down. “Today is a day to pay tributes to our bravehearts... Nothing is above our country,” he said.', 'Mr. Modi’s remarks came during his address at an election rally in Churu, 200 km from here, shortly after the IAF conducted air strikes in Pakistan.', 'Mr. Modi said the country was progressing with the sentiments of “Jai Jawan, Jai Kisan, Jai Vigyan” and the government was working with the “sole objective” of serving the people.', 'Though Mr. Modi avoided making a direct reference to air strikes, he gave enough hints that he was seeking voters’ support for the formation of a “strong government” at the Centre this year. “Your votes in 2014 helped form a strong dispensation in Delhi. Its power was visible today,” he said.', 'He attacked the Congress government in the State, saying that it was stopping the benefits under the Centre’s schemes from reaching the farmers and poor patients.', 'Mr. Modi said the Yamuna river waters had reached the parched land of the Shekhawati region through canals during the previous BJP regime, and the highways were being constructed and rail connectivity was being improved. While seeking support during the 2019 general elections, Mr. Modi said voters should show their prudence by not electing a “weak government” at the Centre.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.', 'A 5-judge constitution bench headed by CJI says that even if one per cent chance of mediation exists in the politically sensitive land dispute matter, it should be done.']


J&K on alert after IAF strikes, NIA raids separatists’ houses
['Security forces fire tear gas shells to disperse a group of protesters who threw stones on them during a protest against the NIA raids at the premises of separatist leaders, in Srinagar, on Tuesday.', 'The J&K government appealed for calm on Tuesday as many departments in the State were put on a general alert in the wake of the Indian Air Force’s pre-dawn cross-border strikes at a training camp of the Jaish-e-Mohammad (JeM) in Balakot in Pakistan.', 'Separately, the National Investigation Agency (NIA) conducted searches at the residences of seven separatist leaders in Srinagar.', 'The NIA’s searches, which commenced early on Tuesday morning, were simultaneously conducted at the homes of Hurriyat chairman Mirwaiz Umar Farooq, JKLF chief Yasin Malik, Tehreek-e-Hurriyat leader Ashraf Sehrai, Shabir Shah, Masarat Aalam Butt, Syed Naseem Geelani (son of Syed Ali Shah Geelani) and Zaffar Akbar Bhat.', 'The NIA said letterheads of different terrorist organisations as well as documents relating to recommendations for visas for admission in Pakistani educational institutions were also found. “A high-tech Internet communication set-up was also recovered from the residence of Mirwaiz Umar,” it added.', 'In a statement, the umbrella Joint Resistance Leadership (JRL) comprising the Mirwaiz, Mr. Malik and Mr. Geelani, termed the NIA searches as “an act of vengeance”.', 'Meanwhile, an eerie calm prevailed in the Kashmir Valley as people stocked up on essentials in the wake of the Indian strikes. Offices and markets, however, remained open and traffic plied normally.', 'The Army on Tuesday said Pakistan’s Army had violated the ceasefire agreement on the Line of Control (LoC) in the Pir Panjal valley’s Rajouri and Poonch districts and in Jammu’s Akhnoor.', 'The ceasefire violations by Pakistan had been reported along the LoC in Akhnoor, Nowshera and Krishna Ghati sectors, a Jammu-based Army spokesman said in a statement.', 'The LoC stretches for 700 km in J&K.', 'Earlier in the day, the director of Sher-e-Kashmir Institute of Medical Sciences (SKIMS) Soura, the valley’s main hospital, cancelled leave and the second half of the scheduled winter vacation holidays for all its staff.', 'With the government issuing a general alert across J&K, the State’s chief secretary B.V.R. Subrahmanyam urged people to remain calm and not to believe rumours.', 'The escalation between India and Pakistan on Tuesday did not impact the cross-LoC trade.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


12- day workout plan for New Year that's actually doable
['The catalyst for many changes can be the upcoming New Year’s Eve. We all want to look our best and flaunt our figure for the most happening party of the year. Agree?If you are nodding your head, this video is for you. If getting fit seems impossible at this time of the year with loads of temptations looking your way, you don’t need to panic. We bring to you this ultimate workout video that promises to tone your body and cut that extra fat in just 12 days. Jinni Shaikh shows us a full body workout that includes 14 exercises. These exercises, when performed every day for 30 minutes, can work wonders by making you look the best version of you.Jinni Shaikh is an Instagram influencer with around 80k followers. She is a fitness enthusiast, trainer and a nutritionist. For a healthy weight loss, having a nutritious diet and keeping oneself hydrated is of utmost importance.What are you waiting for? Get set go!', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Watching this elderly couple working out will make your day
['There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


5 - minute strength and conditioning training
['There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Home remedies for cold and flu
['There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


6 minutes full body workout with Nidhi Mohan Kamal
['Our busy schedules of 9 to 5 often leave us with excuses to miss our gym. Rather than pushing ourselves to move and workout, we end up skipping exercise altogether. But what if we tell you that even on your busiest days, when you do not have the time to go to the gym, there is a way to maintain your fitness schedule. Sounds great, doesn’t it?With our aim to keep you all fit, despite your busy schedules, we bring to you a quick 6-minute no equipment workout video we shot with Nidhi Mohan Kamal.Nidhi Mohan Kamal is a famous Instagram celebrity. She is a food scientist, nutritionist and a certified fitness trainer. With nearly 60,000 followers, she is an inspiration to many.', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Home remedies to relieve throbbing sinus headache
['Sinus is caused when excess mucus builds behind the cavities of the face. It is basically the inflammation of the mucous membrane that causes an unbearable pain in the forehead and unbearable pressure on the face. Fortunately, there is an array of home remedies that can provide immediate relief from the sinus pain or at least make it more bearable. What is the one thing, which has the ability to single-handedly ruin your day? Think of a pulsating, throbbing headache with stinging pain. In addition to a migraine, it is a sinus headache that sends us running for painkillers.Apart from the incessant throbbing, one can also feel pressure around the forehead, cheeks and eyes. Experts advise us against taking antibiotics to treat the painful pressure as it is mostly caused by viruses. Here are some of the best home remedies that will help you relieve you from the stinging sinus pain. The best part is that they are extremely easy to do!', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Why rasmalai is the healthiest dessert this shaadi season
['During the wedding season, it becomes super hard to fight the temptation and making a healthy choice is obviously difficult. Here we tell you why you should never skip the rasmalai.', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


BUSTED: 5 HIV AIDS MYTHS
['December 1 is marked as the World Aids Day. There are a lot of myths about how one can contract HIV. It is important that we know how HIV is transmitted, in order to safeguard ourselves against the deadly virus. Here we are debunking these myths one by one.', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Push up challenge
['There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!", 'Katrina does unimaginable push-ups, but there is a catch!', 'Try Hindu push-ups to tone your body!']


Weekly Books News (Nov 5-11)
["Watch this week's top books news!", 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Deepika will be the prettiest bride ever, here's proof!
['Beauty looks of Deepika Padukone that prove she will be the prettiest bride ever!', 'Beauty looks of Deepika Padukone that prove she will be the prettiest bride ever!', "Deepika, who's known for her regal style has already made our expectations high for the big day. To celebrate the beauty, we have charted her best beauty looks that prove she will be the prettiest bride ever!", 'Beauty looks of Deepika Padukone that prove she will be the prettiest bride ever!', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


This pungent oil can end your skin woes
['We have heard of the beauty benefits of coconut oil and olive oil time and again, but we are sure you have never thought of mustard oil as something that can enhance your beauty, have you? Well, mustard oil might remind you of pickle, but its beauty benefits will leave you surprised.', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Home remedies to fight dengue
['Dengue epidemic is on the rise, stroger than before.  In this video, we show you some simple and easy home remedies which can help you keep the deadly infection at bay.', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


8 essential tips for a happy and safe Diwali
['Here are some simple and easy solutions to ensure a happy and safe Diwali with your loved ones!', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Home remedies for pollution
['Here are also some easy home remedies that can beat the negative effect of the toxic air we breathe.', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


TRX Exercises for Beginners  1
["Want to lose weight quick? Here's an easy excersice that will help you burn calories faster!", 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Vows: Two Art Collectors Who Caught Each Other’s Eye
['Within six months of meeting, Yelena Ambartsumian and Miroslav Grajewski began buying paintings together. They fell in love with more than the art.', 'Yelena Ambartsumian and Miroslav Grajewski began buying artwork together within six months of meeting. It led to a romance fueled by robust curiosity and the desire to build a legacy.', 'Marriage, they say, is a negotiation, a protracted conversation built on trust, shared goals and infinite reserves of tact.', 'It’s a concept not lost on Yelena Ambartsumian and Miroslav Grajewski, who, well before they traded vows Jan. 19 at St. Illuminator’s Armenian Apostolic Cathedral in Manhattan, had already mastered the art of the deal.', 'Two years ago, Ms. Ambartsumian, 30, an associate in the law firm Milbank, and Mr. Grajewski, 28, an engineer and executive with Zuvic Carr and Associates, embarked on a courtship sparked by a mutual passion for contemporary art. That shared appetite led them to invest piece by piece in a jointly held collection.', 'The bride preparing for the ceremony Jan. 19 at St. Illuminator’s Armenian Apostolic Cathedral in Manhattan.', 'Their path in the art world was halting at first. “We definitely had a fair number of moments where we thought we were nuts,” Mr. Grajewski said just days before the wedding, going on to describe a romance fueled by robust curiosity and the desire to build a legacy. Were they driven to compete with other, perhaps more seasoned young trophy hunters?', 'To some, such sums may seem staggering. Indeed Ms. Ambartsumian’s parents — her mother a psychiatrist, her father, an electrical engineer — may well have been taken aback.', 'The Rev. Mesrob Lakissian placed gilded coronets on the heads of the bride and groom, an Armenian tradition anointing the couple as the rulers of their domestic kingdom.', 'During their treks, they would compare notes, often astonished to find that on just about every occasion they were drawn to the same several pieces, their interests encompassing canvases both abstract and figurative, vividly colorful and monochromatic, and, in addition, pieces of sculpture and photography.', 'Once the couple set their sights on a piece, they would return to it multiple times, at varying hours, and in shifting moods. When they settled on a purchase, Mr. Grajewski, the more extroverted of the pair, would begin negotiations. The couple, who drew from their savings, had agreed in advance to split the cost.', 'Some of their pieces were housed early on in Ms. Ambartsumian’s former apartment near Wall Street. They would later find their way to Milford, Conn., where the couple now resides.', 'Before Ms. Ambartsumian moved to her new home in Connecticut, her mother, Dr. Barbara Sumbatian, paid a visit.', 'A chance to write a note during the reception, which was at 11 Madison Park in New York.', 'The groom’s mother, Marici Zuvic Grajewski, had raised an eyebrow as well. But his unorthodox choice in art did nothing to dent her faith in the match. What could go wrong, after all?', 'A short time later Ms. Ambartsumian caused necks to crane as she glided toward the altar in an ivory flower-embroidered Elizabeth Fillmore dress, its back plunging toward her waist. Its otherwise regal look was enhanced when the officiant, the Rev. Mesrob Lakissian, intoned the familiar verses from Corinthians, “Love bears all things, hopes all things…,” and placed a crown on her head.', 'Her gesture was in keeping with the convention-bending spirit of the pair. “These are two people who are ahead of their times, behind the times, and in the moment all at once,” Ms. Matevosyan told guests at the reception.', 'But on this occasion, it seemed, the couple was resolutely looking forward. “Collecting was part of a journey that Yelena and I went on,” Mr. Grajewski said.', 'Pushing aside the church call for modesty, the bride shed her cape before she sailed down the aisle, revealing a gown that plunged in the back.', 'Toward the end of the ceremony, the Rev. Mesrob Lakissian placed gilded coronets on the heads of the bride and groom, an Armenian tradition anointing the couple as the rulers of their domestic kingdom.', 'Continue following our fashion and lifestyle coverage on Facebook (Styles and Modern Love), Twitter (Styles, Fashion, and Vows) and Instagram.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Sunday Routine: How Susanne Bartsch, Night Life Queen, Spends Her Sundays
['From her home base at the Chelsea Hotel, the high-fashion Swiss diva hits the flea markets and the gym before experimenting with new looks in the afternoons.', 'Born in Switzerland, she moved to London at 17 and promptly fell in love with a British boy who was headed to New York. “My heart runs my life. I followed him here in 1981 on Valentine’s Day,” she said.', 'The pair broke up soon after, but he left her his apartment at the Chelsea Hotel. Rather than move, Ms. Bartsch expanded. One apartment became two, then four.', 'Sunday is my one day to sleep in, so I get up late, around 11:30 a.m. I’m a night owl. I was born close to midnight, maybe that has something to do with it. My bedroom is really dark, so I put on sunglasses and start my day. I’m the sunglass queen.', 'I make instant organic coffee, it’s called Mountain something. I add lots of milk because I don’t like coffee. I like the idea of it. I’m Swiss so we don’t do big breakfasts I’ll have bread and jam, maybe boiled eggs. I never feel hungry. It’s already late so I’d rather get out.', 'Sometimes I see my son. He has his own self-contained apartment. If I want to see him I have to look for him.', 'I’m out the door by 2. I don’t shower, I just put on jeans or a casual dress and bootees and go to a flea market. I like the one in Dumbo or the Brooklyn Flea, and the one on east 39th Street in Manhattan. I also like pop-ups where underground designers sell their stuff.', 'I go to Whole Foods and pick up ingredients to make homemade chili. While I’m there I buy soup. I like their clam chowder and their potato leek. Sometimes I go to Foragers to get a mozzarella and tomato sandwich or their Brie and turkey. Their food is really fresh and homemade.', 'Back home I start to cook. I cut the onions, garlic, and tomatoes for the chili. I make it for my son and I. We’ll eat it during the week.', 'I meet David for 30 minutes. We’re still married, but we don’t live together. He lives a block away. We catch up and talk about our son.', 'Around 8 I’ll meet a friend for a drink, somewhere in the neighborhood. I like Blue Ribbon, the Standard Grill, and Souen. Sometimes I go the McKittrick to interview new talent. There’s a ring-tossing guy we might use.', 'By 11:30 I’m back home. I don’t like to have late nights on Sunday. Then I putter around for a few hours. It’s the quietest time of the day for me, so I’m able to get on the computer and return emails or answer an interviewer’s questions. Then I post on Instagram. I know you’re supposed to do it at a certain time during the day, but I can never remember when that is. Then I take a bath with Epsom salt. Before I know it, it’s 2 a.m. I try not to stress that it’s so late, because I have to get up at 9.', 'Sunday Routine readers can follow Susanne Bartsch on Instagram @bartschland or on Twitter @bartscharama.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Modern Love: How Bibliophiles Flirt
['They loved each other, but she harbored a shameful secret: She had stopped reading books.', 'I was an English major in college and went on to get a master’s in literature. But shortly after the spiral-bound thesis took its place on my shelf next to the degree, I stopped reading. It happened gradually, the way one heals or dies.', 'When I created my OkCupid profile (screen name: missbibliophile52598), I filled out the “favorite books” section, letting my taste in literature speak for me: “100 Years of Solitude,” “A Moveable Feast,” “White Teeth,” “The Namesake,” “The Known World,” “The God of Small Things,” “How to Read the Air.” But a twinge of panic surged through me when I realized it had been more than two years since I had read most of those titles, and more than five years for some.', 'Despite my track record, I tried to maintain my bookish persona. I joined book clubs on Meetup.com that I never attended. I requested the library copy of Kazuo Ishiguro’s “Never Let Me Go” because everyone else was reading it, only to return it a week late, unread, with fines.', 'I still loved the idea of reading. I treasured books and bookstores. Whenever I found one, I would linger between the shelves for hours as if catching up with old friends, picking out volumes I had read and buying new ones I hadn’t.', 'When my father’s girlfriend gave me a book by Joel Osteen for Christmas, I returned it for Toni Morrison’s “A Mercy.” I also bought a collection of short stories by Dostoyevsky. But I didn’t read either of them.', 'David was my first OkCupid date — my first online date of any kind. He was tall and nice, if awkward. I asked him question after question to keep him at ease and the conversation flowing, but also to deflect his attention (a classic introvert trick).', 'His profile said he liked to read, so I asked him about his last book. His face lit up and his fingers danced. I realized within the first several weeks that David read much more than I did, about a book or two a week. We seemed an unlikely couple: me, a 5-foot-3 black woman born to a Caribbean mother, and him, a 6-foot-4 white guy from Ohio. But as we got to know each other, our shared faith and mutual love of books bridged our gaps.', 'The first time David visited my house, we compared libraries. We only had four titles in common, two of which were C.S. Lewis collections. David preferred history and nonfiction, whereas I gravitated toward fiction writers of color and immigrant narratives.', 'Months later, when we began to discuss the possibility of getting married one day, I didn’t broach the subject of combining our libraries — not because I feared having to untangle them someday but because I liked having my own stories to share.', 'On our seventh date, David and I visited the central library downtown.', 'David paused from listing the titles he planned to read over summer and raised his eyebrows.', 'I was painfully aware of the glaring hypocrisy in my life. I defended the virtues of bookstores in the age of online retailing and bought books whenever I got the chance, but I hardly read them. They sat on every surface until my house appeared to wear books the way one wears clothes. They piled up on chairs and draped across sofa arms.', 'The Japanese language has a word for this: tsundoku. The act of acquiring books that go unread.', 'The shelves of my bookcase sag in the middle, and not just because it’s made of cheap plywood. It’s because each shelf holds two rows of books, an inner and an outer.', 'If I want to find a book from college or before, I know to reach back to the inner row. If I want to find a more recent addition, I look along the edge. Surrounding the bookshelf are stacks containing different categories of books.', 'There are: Books I Have Read. Books I Want to Read. Books I Started but Did Not Finish Because I Did Not Like Them. Books I Started and Loved but Could Not Justify Reading Given Their Graphic Sexual or Violent Content. That category contains two books by Philip Roth.', 'The last time I visited a dollar bookstore, I bought five titles for myself and two for David. His charge to “read a book” echoed in my head. One afternoon I picked up one of the dollar hardbacks I bought solely for its poetic title.', 'I pushed through the first two chapters and discovered a new narrator in the third. I loved the alternating points of view. I carried the book to work and read at lunch. I read on my walk home, occasionally lifting my eyes to make sure I avoided strangers and uneven concrete.', 'I felt smug that while most of my millennial peers also walked with their heads down, eyes hovering just above their palms, I was not merely scrolling through Instagram. I was reading. Reading a book.', 'It was not a competition, but there was a push. I felt him pushing me to be more of the person I used to be and more of who I wanted to be. Whenever he turned to discussing his current nonfiction book about the rise of Silicon Valley or environmental philosophers, I would tell him of fiction, of men who left their countries by hiding in boxes only to climb out and turn into birds. I would remind him that sometimes the only way to explain the world we live in is to make it all up.', 'I asked David once what he liked about me.', 'A little over a year after our date at the library, David suggested we visit again. As we walked along the shelves, he asked if I remembered the game we played on our first visit, when we put Post-it note reviews in our favorite books.', 'His proposal had rested between the pages of “The Rebel Princess” for over a year.', 'We embraced in the middle of the fiction aisle, surrounded by other people’s stories and about to begin our own.', 'Karla Marie-Rose Derus is a writer in Los Angeles.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Smaller mechanised boat owners on strike
['Owners and workers of mechanised boats with engines below 150 horse power staged a protest on Monday seeking withdrawal of permission for boats up to 240 HP to operate within 20 nautical miles.', 'Around 250 boats in Chennai, Tiruvallur and Kancheepuram districts have been on strike for over two weeks now.', 'Arasu of the Chennai Chengai Singaravelar Visai Padagu Meenavar Sangam said that these boats did bottom trawling beyond 5 nautical miles and that if boats with above 200 HP engines were allowed, they would push boats with smaller engines closer to the coast. “Those with higher engine capacity would pull everything they can from the bottom. Already, there is a reduction in fish catch. We are also concerned about the country craft that number around 30,000 in these areas,” he said.', 'The stand-off has been on for over a year now, with similar protests organised at Kasimedu against granting permissions for mechanised craft up to 24 metre length and engines of 240 HP. “Such boats could be permitted to go deep sea fishing and not allowed to fish near the coast,” Mr. Arasu said.', 'The Chennai Visai Padagu Meenavar Nala Sangam, the association of owners of boats with larger horse power, said that they only ventured into the deep sea for fishing. K. Kapilan, president of the sangam, said that there was an agreement between the two associations that the bigger boats will not fish near the coast.', 'However, the smaller mechanised boat association office-bearers said that the agreement had been flouted many times.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


DMK requests Congress to give up a seat for DMDK
['Pushing for pact: A DMK leader said there was progress in talks after M.K.Stalin called on Vijayakant last week.', 'The DMK has requested its primary ally, the Congress, to give up a Lok Sabha seat from its quota of 10 in case the DMDK, led by actor Vijayakant, agrees to join the alliance for the Lok Sabha election.', 'The ruling AIADMK has been holding talks with the DMDK for the past few days without success.', 'The TNCC leader explained that the Congress might not be in a position to give up a seat since the high command was of the opinion that the seats allotted to it were not adequate. “We have too many contestants for the nine seats in Tamil Nadu [besides the lone Puducherry seat],” he said.', 'Asked how many seats the actor-turned-politician demanded from the DMK-Congress alliance, he said the Congress leadership was totally in the dark about the dealings. Its leaders were too busy to pay attention to Tamil Nadu for now. “P. Chidambaram is busy with the election manifesto and Rahul Gandhi is visiting Gujarat, along with K.C. Venugopal. Mukul Wasnik and Ahmed Patel are making preparations for the working committee meeting in Gujarat,” he said.', 'Meanwhile, the DMK allotted one seat to the Kongunadu Makkal Desiya Katchi, headed by R Easwaran. It will contest on the DMK’s ‘Rising Sun’ symbol.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Plea for continuation of no-detention policy
['The State Platform for Common School System Tamil Nadu (SPCSS-TN) has submitted a memorandum to the Principal Secretary of the School Education Department requesting continuation of the no-detention policy.', 'In their memorandum, they asked the government to direct education officials to withdraw circulars they had issued to schools on the conduct of public exams for Classes 5 and 8.', 'The SPCSS-TN requested the Secretary to direct self-finance schools not to collect any money for the conduct of these examinations. “A clarification should be issued that there will be no public exams for Classes 5 and 8 and that no child will be detained till the completion of the elementary education this year or in the future as per current provisions,” the memorandum stated.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


‘Posting of PG doctors must be as per norms’
['The Doctors Association for Social Equality (DASE) has urged the State government to stop posting post-graduate doctors for duties not prescribed by the Medical Council of India (MCI).', 'The post-graduates of the Institute of Anaesthesiology and Critical Care of Madras Medical College have written to the institute’s director, expressing their unwillingness to take up VIP duty outside the campus.', 'G.R. Ravindranath, general secretary of DASE, in a statement on Tuesday, said MCI had laid down norms for training house surgeons and postgraduates. But these postgraduates were posted on duty to take care of a mother of an IAS official attached to Raj Bhavan.', 'Calling this as being against MCI norms, he claimed there were complaints that post-graduates were being ill-treated during the duty.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


HC stays proceedings in 2009 police-lawyer clash case
['The Madras High Court on Tuesday stayed all further proceedings in a case pending against 32 advocates and 5 policemen before an Additional Chief Metropolitan Magistrate (ACMM) at Egmore in connection with a clash between lawyers and policemen inside the High Court campus on February 19, 2009. Justice A.D. Jagadish Chandira passed the order on a petition filed by one of the advocates S. Mahendran, 36, accusing the Central Bureau of Investigation (CBI) of having conducted a “substandard” investigation and deliberately probing the case in a biased manner in order to harm the legal fraternity with false accusations.', 'Pointing out that the ACMM had issued summons to the advocates insisting upon their appearance on Thursday, the petitioner urged the court to set aside the interim final report filed against the 32 advocates and consequently direct the police to reinvestigate the case in a fair manner. Till then, he urged the court to stay all further proceedings.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


How to Choose the Right Perfume or Cologne for You
['Choosing a perfume is tough, but the experts are here to help you find a fragrance that you’ll love for years.', 'Whether you’re a fragrance fanatic or you’re new to scents, finding a fragrance you love can be a daunting experience. When you approach a fragrance counter, the only information you can garner about any of the scents in front of you is how the bottle looks, which, of course, tells you nothing. You’re often left to sniff a few selections from hundreds of available bottles with the help of an overbearing salesperson, who is usually no help at all.', 'A scent you love can truly become a part of you, an extension of yourself. But how do you find one?', 'Whether you have a few minutes to research before you hit the stores, or you’re trying to pick the perfect scent on the fly, here are a couple of easy tips from fragrance experts to help you land a scent that you’ll love for years and feels (and smells) like you dreamed it into existence.', 'Sometimes, the best place to start is, for lack of a better term, right under your nose. Think about your daily life. What scents do you already love?', 'The most crucial part of finding your new favorite fragrance is, of course, trying it on. Spray it on a pulse point where your skin is naturally warm, like your wrist or elbow, so the fragrance will really heat up and reveal itself over time.', 'As to why scents sometimes smell completely different on two different people, Ms. Yang said that fragrances are sensitive to light and heat, and even your own personal body chemistry, diet and hormonal levels. Even time of day plays into how a perfume “wears,” or how it smells on you, how powerful it is and how long it lasts.', 'If multiple trips to the mall to sample new fragrances sounds exhausting, keep in mind that department stores have small sample vials behind the counters ready for you to bring home — all you have to do is ask. If you prefer a cosmetics store like Sephora, their staff is able to make a sample vial of fragrances on their shelves so you can wear them over a few days to know how they function in different environments, giving you time to live with the scent.', 'Ms. Yang also pointed out that natural vs. synthetic elements in your scent affect not only the length of the wear, but the smell of the scent itself and how it interacts with your body. “Natural is not always more sustainable … or better for you. I’m a trained aromatherapist and I love natural fragrances as much as synthetic/natural combos. That said, four tons of roses, composed of approximately 1,600,000 rose blossoms, yields only 1 kilogram of rose oil. Real, all-natural perfumes are very expensive. No two rose yields will smell exactly the same (like wine) due to climate conditions.', 'Finding a scent you love can be challenging, but if you know what you’re looking for, and how to look for it, the experience can be enjoyable, especially when you’re armed with the knowledge of scents to change your daily life. A few online resources to learn which notes you prefer, how to apply and test, and determining your next scent is easier than you think.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Social Q’s: Honey, That’s Not Why Your Dad Left
['What to do when you learn that the story your husband has told himself for years is untrue? Tell him, our advice columnist says.', 'My husband, who is in his 30s, always told me that his mother threw his father out of the house — on my husband’s 12th birthday, no less — because she found marijuana in his bag. (They agreed to give it up after having kids.) But her current husband, a wonderful man who overshares, told me the breakup was actually due to the first husband’s repeated infidelity. My mother-in-law confirmed this when I asked her. She also said she believes my husband knows. Should I tell him? His father died of cancer several years ago. I hate to speak ill of the dead, but should I, in this case?', 'Of course, your obligation is to your husband, who deserves gentle truth and support. If you hadn’t verified the story your stepfather-in-law told you, you might have written it off as idle gossip and let it go. But you did verify it. So now you must tell your husband. Withholding this information would put you in weird league with your in-laws. They’ve done nothing wrong, but for you to keep the secret would make you disloyal to your husband.', 'Say, “Honey, can we talk about your dad?” and take it calmly from there. He may be upset by the news or regard it as the missing piece of a family puzzle. It’s too bad he can’t discuss it with his father. And I get your reluctance to share unsavory stories of the dead. But fortunately, your husband has you to lean on if he needs help.', 'Guess Who’s Not Coming to Dinner?', 'We love to make dinner for friends. People say our apartment is minimalist, spacious and nicely lit. But the last three times we invited one couple to dinner, they suggested we come to their place instead. Who does that? Not only were we deprived of the activity we proposed, we’ll be the ones who have to travel to another part of town on a cold night. Would it be O.K. to insist: “No, we’d like to have you over”?', 'A.O.', 'Here’s the thing: Some people have trouble accepting hospitality. Others have numerous food allergies. And still others don’t like going out at night. Why not be gracious and let this go? Three invitations later, it doesn’t sound as if this couple is coming to dinner anytime soon.', 'My husband and I live with our young children on a small cul-de-sac. It’s a neighborhood of mostly older people. We’re one of the few young families. Many neighbors drive fast, but one older woman drives at dangerous speeds. She whips around the corner so fast that she startles my toddler! My husband thinks I should talk with her directly. But I would prefer slipping a polite note under her door. Thoughts?', 'In any event, it’s easier to accommodate a neighbor, smiling at your doorstep with a reasonable request, than to go along with written appeals, slid under the door like (super-polite) complaints. When possible, attach a face to requests for favors. And since it was your husband’s brilliant idea, why not let him cross the street and ask the woman to slow down?', 'I went to the symphony and sat next to a woman wearing perfume. I have asthma, so I was uncomfortable, but I didn’t say anything until intermission. I asked her nicely if she was wearing perfume. When she said she was, I told it her it probably wasn’t a good idea in a crowded concert hall and left it at that. Then I left. What would you have done?', 'No offense, but I don’t think your educational campaign accomplished much. You didn’t explain why it’s not a good idea to wear scent in tight spaces. The perfume wearer will be no wiser the next time out.', 'I might have said, “You may not have considered this, but I have asthma, and your perfume is making me uncomfortable.” Then I would have approached an usher or the box office, explained my predicament, and asked for a less fragrant seat. Why miss the second half?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Wait —: Wait — What Is a Hole?
['Wait — What Is a Hole?', 'Wait — What Is a Hole?', 'Allow me to ruin your life real quick.', 'A few days into the new year, someone asked me, as a kind of puzzle: “What is a hole?” Right now, your brain is protecting you; human brains are poor multitaskers and since yours is occupied with reading, you haven’t yet had time to sit back and consider the question that has blown across the fecund wasteland of my thoughts nearly every day of 2019. The problem is that your brain cannot protect you forever. If you want to get off this ride, you need to do it now.', 'What is a hole?', 'And yet, there are other characteristics of holes that escape our special attention. We have no common word for a hole that is bigger than a pinprick but smaller than a pothole. German identifies a metaphorical hole in the month of January when the bustle, spirits and commerce of the holiday season suddenly abate (“Januarloch”). In some dialects of Spanish, a “butrón” is a hole made in a building to carry out a break-in.', 'Great question.', 'Speaking of holes...', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Weekly Books News (Oct 29-Nov 4)
["Watch this week's top books news!", 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Weekly Books News (Oct 22-28)
['There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


How to make rose aloe vera gel at home
['Aloe Vera is known as a wonder plant and is used for many health and medicinal uses. This plant can do wonders for your skin and is truly a beauty saviour. Loaded with antifungal and antibacterial properties, this gel can prove to be a magic potion for many beauty woes.', 'There is an apartment inside Eiffel Tower! Take a look...', "If given a chance, what would you like to rename Valentine's Day as?", "Confused about Valentine's week days? Here's your calendar!"]


Made on the Inside, Worn on the Outside
['Brands are using prison labor to provide inmates with jobs and training. But is it possible — and ethical — to build a profitable fashion business behind bars?', 'Peruvian inmates at work.', 'In a lush valley surrounded by the Peruvian Andes — past two sets of security gates, high fences, barbed wire and a rigorous pat-down — 13 women stood hard at work. They were weaving and knitting luxurious alpaca wool sweaters, deep-pile roll-necks and silky-soft track pants, destined to be sold to wealthy shoppers with lives far away, and a far cry, from their own.', 'More than two years into their program, both Carcel’s founders and the Peruvian prison authorities say the project has been a measurable success. It’s popular with prisoners and consumers alike and proof that the profitable and responsible production of luxury fashion can have a place behind bars.', 'Peru is becoming something of a case study on the issue of aid versus exploitation. A little more than 5,000 women are currently incarcerated there, and over 50 percent are actively employed in producing leather goods, clothing and textiles, according to INPE, the national penitentiary institute.', 'Carcel, a Danish brand, was founded in 2016 to provide incarcerated women with jobs, training and, possibly, a crime-free future.', 'Pietà was founded in Lima in 2012 by Thomas Jacob, a Frenchman who had once worked for Chanel, and currently employs around 50 male and female inmates from some of the largest jails in Peru. Prisoners manufacture anti-establishment logo T-shirts, sweatshirts, hand-knit sweaters, varsity jackets and high-top sneakers using locally sourced materials. Prices range from $8 for tote bags to $120 for jewelry.', 'Inmates don’t just make the clothes, he said — on occasion they also contribute to his designs, giving them both a creative outlet and training. Often, they act as models for advertising campaigns and are paid a portion of the sale price for each unit of clothing they produce, providing income they can send home to their families. Upon release, former inmates can continue working with Pietà, or seek jobs at other companies with Pietà’s recommendation and support.', 'Louise van Hauen and Veronica D’Souza, the founders of Carcel (which means “prison” in Spanish), met while living and working in Kenya. The former was a creative manager at a leather bag company and the latter was the head of a social start-up that made and distributed menstrual cups.', 'Veronica D’Souza, left, and Louise van Hauen are the founders of the Carcel label.', 'Ms. van Hauen said she wanted to start somewhere with proximity to high-quality natural materials, where some of the skills required were already part of local culture.', 'Virginia Matamoros, the director of Cusco Female Penitentiary, said that the prison offered basic training in sewing, weaving, baking and gardening to all new inmates with the hope that they can then move on to working with companies that can prepare them for release.', 'In Cusco, the Carcel inmates are trained by more experienced weavers until they have developed the vocational skills to work a five-hour shift, five days a week. They earn cash salaries of 650 to 1,100 Peruvian soles ($180 to $329) per month, depending on their level of experience. Earnings in both Peru and Thailand are benchmarked against the national minimum wage. In Peru, this is 930 soles a month.', 'The prison takes a 10 percent cut of inmates’ wages. The workers keep a portion for living expenses like food and soap, and Carcel pays the rest into their families’ bank accounts. Beyond the base salary, women can also receive bonuses for the quality of their work, good behavior and overtime.', 'Benigna Salinas operates a knitting machine.', 'There is no question the work is selling. According to Elizabeth von der Goltz, the global buying director of Net-a-Porter, fashion brands with social purpose are increasingly popular with shoppers.', 'To meet demand, Carcel is now looking to double its staff base in the Peruvian prison. At the company’s second production base in Thailand — the country with the most female inmates in the world — e-banking accounts are being developed for some prisoners and their relatives to minimize siphoning from wardens or companies. Carcel said it hoped to operate in a further three to five countries within the next five years.', 'Considerable challenges remain. This week, Carcel halted sales in America when it became aware of a federal law that bans the import of goods made by convicts. The company is now seeking a waiver; it pointed out that the United States is one of the few countries that did not ratify a 2014 International Labor Organization convention on forced labor, despite domestic prison labor being legal. Net-a-Porter confirmed Wednesday that it would suspend Carcel sales until the issue was resolved.', 'Elizabeth Paton reported from London, and Andrea Zarate from Cusco, Peru.', 'Elizabeth Paton is a reporter for the Styles section, covering the fashion and luxury sectors in Europe. Before joining The Times in 2015, she was a reporter at the Financial Times both in London and New York.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Oscars 2019: Your Guide to All the Best Picture Controversies
['How to navigate a fractious, scandal-plagued year at the movies.', 'Lucy Boynton and Rami Malek in “Bohemian Rhapsody,” which has been caught up in the controversy over the director Bryan Singer.', 'How hot is this beef?', 'The film is based on the true story of a black pianist (Don Shirley, played by Mahershala Ali) who hired a white driver and bodyguard (Tony Vallelonga, played by Viggo Mortensen) to chauffeur him on a tour across the Deep South in 1962.', 'But there are larger criticisms of the movie.', 'How hot is this beef?', 'How hot is this beef?', 'How hot is this beef?', 'How hot is this beef?', 'How hot is this beef?', 'Are you happy in this modern world?', 'Or do you need more?', 'How hot is this beef?', 'How hot is this beef?', 'Why Do the Oscars Keep Falling for Racial Reconciliation Fantasies?', 'Reggie Ugwu\xa0is a pop culture reporter covering a range of subjects, including film, television, music and internet culture. Before joining The Times in 2017, he was a reporter for BuzzFeed News and Billboard magazine.', 'How Would You  Like That Beef?', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Fashion Review: At Fendi, Raising the Bar in Farewell
['Karl Lagerfeld’s final collection for the house, and the question of vision at Gucci and Alberta Ferretti.', 'MILAN — Normally before a fashion show the decibel level is close to that of a small zoo, as people pass the time in gossip and air kisses and yelling into their phones. But Thursday at noon, as the crowd filed in for Fendi, the noise was just a whisper.', 'There were double FFs in fur and celadon green cotton and canvas on audience members everywhere you looked. A small card with an F (the lower leg replaced by a heart) and Mr. Lagerfeld’s signature scrawl had been placed atop every seat; the date of his death was on the back. At the end of the runway was a handwritten sign reading “Love Karl.” According to Serge Brunschwig, Fendi’s chief executive, Mr. Lagerfeld had been working on the collection until the end.', 'It showed.', 'Atop a base of sheer hosiery and bodysuits speckled with the rococo italics of a 1980s logo that Mr. Lagerfeld had created and called “karligraphy” was layered men’s tailoring in irony-tinged 1970s shades of brown and camel, purple and green; the backs of jackets and high-collared shirts (a reference to the style Mr. Lagerfeld favored for himself) sashed with a lavish taffeta bow. Leather coats laser-cut to mimic technical athletic mesh were paired with sheer pleated wrap skirts; governess dresses shifted just so over the body to suggest the branded underthings beneath.', 'It was easy and entirely contemporary; built on heritage, dipping in and out of trend (sports, suits, the soup of decades past) but indebted to neither. It was smart, in every sense of the word.', 'After the last model had filed past, Silvia Fendi, the designer for men’s and accessories and Mr. Lagerfeld’s partner on the creative side of the business, took her bow alone. A short video was shown of Mr. Lagerfeld sketching his first look for the brand, and explaining the power of a healthy dose of disrespect.', 'His work gave proof to his words but it didn’t matter: Respect was what he was due, not just because of what he had achieved but because of what he had just made. And backstage, everyone — models, modélistes, hair and beauty teams, executives — was in tears. As his last gesture he had raised the bar for everyone.', 'Milan Fashion Week began in the shadow of Mr. Lagerfeld’s death, and it cast a strange, uneasy light on the opening shows.', 'He wasn’t speaking of the general mood, though it would have made sense, or Mr. Lagerfeld’s legacy, though that would have made sense, too (and, in fact, Mr. Michele had started his career working at Fendi). Rather, he was talking about the wall of strobe-like L.E.D.s that flashed in formation throughout the show, shining directly in the eyes of audience members, forcing them into temporary sightlessness. What was going to happen next? The timeliness of the effect was a coincidence but a resonant one.', 'Which may be why, once you blinked away the spots on your retinas, what was visible on the runway was a play on all kinds of masks — blank-faced and S&M leatherette and filigree metal, some full-face, some playing peekaboo with eyes and mouth — and Mr. Michele’s now-signature exaggerated vintage grabfest of gender-bending costume for both sexes.', 'It was a little Venetian and a little Freddy Krueger; frump punk, cut with a dash of Hannah Arendt, the German philosopher who wrestled with questions of totalitarianism and freedom and was liberally referenced in the show notes.', 'Anyway, back to Mr. Michele and Gucci.', 'The show had bouquets of references and free-association fantasy. It probably had commercial hits buried underneath. What it did not have were any revelations or surprises.', 'Maybe we’d had enough for this week, anyway. Continuity! Sometimes it looks awfully good.', 'So if there was familiarity in the checkerboards and pomegranate prints in midcentury modern shapes and shades at Arthur Arbesser and the masculine/feminine play at Jil Sander, where Luke and Lucie Meier layered sweeping shirtdresses sliced to the hip and dish towel tunics over trousers wide and slim, that’s O.K. Brunello Cucinelli has built an entire theory of fashion on the virtues of merely nudging along his hand-knit cashmeres (now mixed with a base of chiffon) and earthy tailoring.', 'In any case, the result was more appealing than the unexpected swerve that’s been going on at Alberta Ferretti, where this season the designer veered even further backward into 1980s power-woman-meets-Vegas-sound-and-light-show territory. Guess she’s really not interested in being associated with those delicate pintucks and frothy Oscar frocks any more. Fair enough.', 'The problem is what was offered instead: shoulders — big ones, sometimes complete with fringe-bedecked epaulets. Jackets with shiny brass buttons. Jodhpurs and pleated stonewashed gray denim jeans. Cowboy boots and flat-brimmed hats. A whole lot of gold and silver and magenta lamé, in the form of jumpsuits, one-shouldered Komodo dragon ruffled minis, and high-waisted suspender trousers. Yes: suspenders.', 'They left you rubbing your eyes.', "Vanessa Friedman is The Times's fashion director and chief fashion critic. She was previously the fashion editor of the Financial Times.", 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


HC unhappy with poor condition of roads in city
['The Madras High Court on Tuesday expressed displeasure over the poor condition of tar roads in Chennai city and called for details from Greater Chennai Corporation Commissioner on the money spent on laying roads and the procedures such as milling followed before relaying existing roads.', 'The PIL petition had been filed by R. Murali of New Perungalathur in Kancheepuram district complaining about the local town panchayat relaying the roads in the locality without milling the existing tar. He feared that houses would get flooded during rains if the height of the road gets increased.', 'Petitioner’s counsel S. Varsha told the court that the civil contractors do not bother to scrap out the existing tar because it would cost them more and also because there were no standard guidelines to be followed on the issue when it came to relaying of interior roads under the control of local bodies.', 'She said, the Indian Road Congress guidelines and other stipulations applied only to highways and they were seldom followed when it came to relaying interior roads in corporations, municipalities and town panchayats. After hearing her, the judges expressed concern over the condition of roads in Chennai.', 'They directed the Corporation Commissioner as well as the Highways Secretary to file detailed status reports by March 11 listing out all relevant details connected to laying and relaying of roads.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Facelift for footpaths on OMR
['In a bid to make the Rajiv Gandhi Salai (OMR) more pedestrian-friendly, the Tamil Nadu Road Development Company (TNRDC) is raising the height of footpaths along the road. Footpaths from Sholinganallur to Karapakkam and a portion at Okkiampettai are being raised by a few cm to prevent vehicles from encroaching them.', 'So far, footpaths and the service lanes along the IT corridor have been at almost the same height. Only the design of the paver blocks differed.', 'The surface of the road is being renewed too from Madhya Kailash to Apollo Hospitals junction. The work is being carried out at a cost of ₹10 crore. Though the riding surface of the IT corridor is better than most other roads in the city, some stretches are bumpy and are being relaid. “The soil tests conducted recently for Metro Rail too has left the surface in an uneven manner, those points too would be covered,” the official explained.', 'The road is being cold milled (surface scrapped away) and re-laid to prevent increase in height and the works are being carried out at nights so that traffic flow is not disturbed.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


CM urges Modi to secure release of 46 fishermen
['Chief Minister Edappadi K. Palaniswami in a letter to Prime Minister Narendra Modi sought his intervention to prevail upon Sri Lanka to release 46 Tamil Nadu fishermen apprehended by the Sri Lankan Navy.', 'In a letter to External Affairs Minister Sushma Swaraj, he sought the release of three Indian fishermen from Kanniyakumari district detained by the Iranian Coast Guard.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Latvian envoy, delegation meet trade chamber
['A delegation from Latvia, a tiny nation between Lithuania and Estonia, was here on Tuesday along with their new Ambassador Artis Bertulis to meet members of The Madras Chamber of Commerce and Industry (MCCI). The Ambassador had a one-hour discussion with chamber members on education, trade and business opportunities between India and Latvia. Prospects for economic co-operation between the two countries were also discussed.', 'The Ambassador said that there were 1,233 Indian students studying in Latvia this semester across various branches including engineering and arts and science. “It is cost-effective for Indians to go and study in Latvia,” he said. He also said that India should set up an embassy office in Latvia.', 'He said Latvia was providing support for Indian entrepreneurs. “Indian entrepreneurs are finding our location good for their distribution centres and warehousing, and we are supporting them,” he said.', 'Ramkumar Ramamoorthy, president, MCCI and executive director, Cognizant India, said that because of its good industry and technology expertise, Latvia had emerged as a major regional hub for IT companies to support clients in Nordic countries.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


31 blackbuck group sightings recorded
['A total of 31 blackbuck and 87 spotted deer group sightings were noted during the Annual Wildlife Estimation that was carried out at the Guindy National Park and Raj Bhavan, which are part of Reserve Forest, by the Wildlife Division, Chennai, on February 23 and 24.', 'A total of six transect lines were laid at the Guindy National Park and three at Raj Bhavan for the purpose of estimation. A total 15 student volunteers and N. Bhaskaran, assistant professor, AVC College, Mayiladuthurai, took part in the estimation, along with C.H. Padma, Wildlife Warden, Chennai, staff members and biologists.', 'The transects were covered during early morning and evening. “Around 52, plus or minus 22, blackbucks and 133, plus or minus 29, spotted deer are estimated to be there in the park,” said Mr. N. Baskaran.', 'He said that numbers were similar compared to last year. “Last year, the sampling was done only for a day and we felt it was insufficient. This time we did for one more day and included larger groups,” he added.', 'Ms. Padma said that it was mandatory to have scientific estimation in any wildlife area as per Ministry of Environment and Forest guidelines. “Estimation will always help us in future planning and management strategies, which is very important to maintain viable population in a wildlife area,” she said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


You Asked: What to Do When a Doctor’s Visit Is the Cause of Pain?
['What to Do When a Doctor’s Visit Is the Cause of Pain?', 'What to Do When a Doctor’s Visit Is the Cause of Pain?', 'Tips for dealing with pelvic pain during an OB-GYN exam.', 'Jen Gunter, M.D.', 'I have vaginismus, and though I’ve undergone physical therapy for it, pap smears are still unbearably painful — it basically feels like I’m being stabbed. Is there any way to tell my doctor that an Ativan and a Tylenol won’t cut it? Or am I doomed to never get a pelvic exam ever again?', 'Pap smears should not be painful, and they are most definitely not something to endure. In fact, each painful pelvic exam or Pap smear can further increase your pain, which worsens your underlying condition, never mind causing stress and trauma. There are definitely options to reduce your pain.', 'Have a question about women’s health? Ask Dr. Gunter yourself.', 'Pap smears and pelvic exams should not be painful, and I am sorry for your experience. As an OB/GYN and pain medicine physician I cannot say this enough: A painful pelvic exam should be stopped.', 'Find someone with expertise in doing pelvic exams for women who have pelvic pain.', 'As a pelvic pain specialist, I see women every day who tell me that my exam was their first pain-free Pap smear. I am so happy to help them, but it also makes me want to cry because it shouldn’t be that way. An experienced provider should allow enough time (feeling rushed helps no one relax) and may be able to coach you in other ways to help you relax your pelvic floor muscles. Some other options that can help reduce pain are applying topical numbing medication to the vaginal opening and using a narrow vaginal speculum that is about the size of a finger. Sometimes, I even have my patient insert the speculum herself.', 'A vaginal sample for H.P.V. (human papilloma virus) testing instead of a Pap smear.', 'Intravenous anesthesia.', 'For women for whom the first two options are not going to work (for example there is too much fear or pain, or memories of past trauma to take a vaginal swab, or there is a need to collect a Pap smear and look at the cervix because the H.P.V. test is positive), there is the option of an anesthetic. It is not any sign of failure to need anesthesia for a pelvic exam — we have modern anesthesia for a reason! This type of anesthesia is typically called monitored anesthesia care and an anesthesia provider (a doctor or nurse anesthetist) administers intravenous anesthesia in an operating room or a surgical center to control pain and anxiety.', 'It is more expensive and typically requires several hours out of the day, although with modern anesthesia techniques and a short procedure the recovery is typically very fast.', 'In some cases, this measure is worth it to be able to screen for potentially serious diseases like cervical cancer.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


The New Speakeasy: Cocktails in a Stranger’s Kitchen
['He is a tour guide by day and mixologist by night. She is a photographer with a knack for snacks. Together, they are offering a new way to drink with strangers.', 'On a chilly Saturday night in late January, a handful of strangers huddled outside a townhouse on a quiet street in Bushwick. A small neon sign in its window, “Cocktails Here,” was the only indicator that they had come to the right place.', 'At 9 p.m., the front door of the townhouse opened and Matt Levy ushered his guests inside.', 'Mr. Levy, 38, mixes cocktails for strangers in his home, which he shares with his wife, Jennifer MacFarlane, 41, and their two young daughters. Guests sit around the couple’s kitchen table as Mr. Levy mixes cocktails from a rotating menu. A prix fixe of $80 will get you four drinks and some assorted snacks prepared by Ms. MacFarlane. Guests are also encouraged to bring their own booze if they want something specific; once, a guest from North Carolina brought her own bottle of house-infused lavender gin.', 'A couple in their mid-30s, Chris Donohoe and Wesley Loden, actually live down the street from Mr. Levy and Ms. MacFarlane. “We’ve always been so curious to come here,” Mr. Donohoe said. “We always see that sign and get jealous.” Mr. Loden was actually in the middle of doing “Dry January,” but when a reservation at the club opened up, he decided to shift his priorities.', 'Mr. Levy designs all the cocktails, and sometimes take inspiration from current events.', 'Once everyone was settled around the kitchen island, Mr. Levy handed his guests an aperitif — this evening, it was a rum pineapple Pimms punch — and introduced himself as the bartender and host. He looked the part in a gray short-sleeved button-up shirt, maroon chinos with a tropical palm tree print and a dark brown belt with an oversize Statue of Liberty buckle. His mustache even curled a little at the ends.', 'He became a “cocktail fanboy” and began experimenting at home. He spent years learning bartending techniques, memorizing recipes, figuring out how to hand-cut ice (he owns two ice saws from Japan) as well as how to set drinks on fire.', 'Mr. Levy designs all the cocktails, and sometimes take inspiration from local current events. In December, he created the “Astoria Borealis” after the power plant explosion in Queens turned the skies an eerie blue. The rum-based cocktail has blue Curaçao (for color) and banana liqueur (because, as Mr. Levy put it, the whole thing was “bananas”). Shaken and strained over crushed ice, the final flourish is a splash of Rum Fire, which Mr. Levy briefly sets on fire.', 'Instagram and word-of-mouth from a community of “boozehounds,” as Mr. Levy calls them, keep the club hopping. Mr. Levy said that even professional bartenders have come calling. One bartender visiting from Ottawa had such a great time that he sent Mr. Levy a bottle of his homemade jerk-spiced bitters and a handwritten recipe book.', 'The couple decided to let the alcohol do most of the work.', 'U.S.', 'U.S.']


Council seeks funds to boost research
['The State Council for Science and Technology has sought to increase funding to improve research opportunities for students. The council has a series of programmes, aimed at both school and college students, for which it receives around ₹2.75 crore annually.', 'The scheme has been well-received in schools and colleges and more students have sought funds to develop projects. In 2016-17, the council released over 300 projects, which jumped to 500 the next year. Last year, the number of student projects stood at 700.', 'For a three-year period from 2017-18, the Department of Science and Technology has sanctioned around ₹90 lakh and last year the funds were distributed to 1,600 students who came up with 700 projects.', 'Under the scheme, final-year undergraduate and postgraduate engineering, agricultural, medicine, biological and veterinary science students are given a maximum of financial assistance of ₹10,000 to develop socially relevant projects.', 'The council also provides financial assistance to research scholars. In 2018-19, 10 students received support. This year, the Council has sought an additional ₹2 crore from the State government.', 'The Council has already placed its achievements and request to the State government.', 'Among its promotional programmes are providing partial financial assistance for seminars, travel grants to young scientists and encourage science and technology capacity building for industrial areas.', 'In the run-up to National Science Day on Thursday, the Council is organising events to promote mathematics and science in Dharmapuri district on Wednesday.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Most victims are children
['A 50-metre walk from the main road turned into a nightmare for a 10-year-old girl recently as a pack of dogs tried to attack her on her way back home in Ashtalakshmi Nagar.', 'In at least 60% of cases, persons bitten by dogs are children below the age of 16 years, say doctors. Hence, there is a need to educate children not to ignore dog bites or hide them from parents out of fear of being reprimanded or fear of injections, they say.', 'Children make up the largest percentage of people bitten by dogs, with the highest incidence in mid-to-late childhood, the World Health Organisation has pointed out. Communities, especially children, should be informed about the risks of dog bites and prevention techniques.', 'Recently, doctors at the Institute of Child Health and Hospital for Children came across a child who was bitten by a dog but did not inform his parents out of fear of being reprimanded. “Treatment was delayed by 24 hours. Fortunately, a senior doctor picked up the clinical manifestation and asked the child if he was bitten by a dog. Instead of trying to scold them, parents should listen to them,” A.T. Arasar Seeralar, director of ICH, said.', 'The hospital received 576 children with dog bites in 2018.', 'He said parents should ensure that children do not play with stray dogs. Unlike adults, children sustain injuries on the face due to their height.', 'S. Ragunanthanan, professor of medicine, Rajiv Gandhi Government General Hospital, said that in 50% to 60% cases, it was children who were bitten by dogs, and there were chances that they would hide the fact from parents.', 'Any transdermal bite, that is when the skin has peeled or there is bleeding, is classified as grade-III.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Corporation to intensify sterilisation drive against stray dogs
['Residents in various parts of the city have complained about the menace of community dogs on streets, while Chennai Corporation officials claim they are unable to go beyond control measures of sterilisation and vaccination. With the availability of food in overflowing dustbins and their natural instinct to be territorial, community dogs bark at residents, chase people on vehicles and, in some instances, even bite or scratch residents.', 'Thanigaiarasu Govindaraju, a resident of Ashtalakshmi Nagar in Valasaravakkam, says that his area had a number of aggressive community dogs, causing hardship to motorists and small children. He says his daughter was injured after being chased by dogs.', 'Over 7 km away from Valasaravakkam, T. Gunaseelan, of Varadarajapuram in Ambattur, says that because of his late hours at work, he finds the ride back home traumatic. Once, while riding back from his office on Anna Salai after work, he fell off his two-wheeler after being chased by a pack of community dogs near his house.', 'S. Raghunathan, a resident of Krishna Nagar in Perumbakkam (near Medavakkam), lives at the other end of the city, but complains of the same problem.', 'He says he had a narrow escape from a pack of dogs while travelling with his friend on a two-wheeler, as the community dogs came running along with the vehicle, snapping at their heels. He says the 4th Main Road of Krishna Nagar became crowded with these dogs during night time, and many motorcyclists were forced to take other routes because they were scared of the chasing they will be subjected to.', 'However, health officials of the Corporation claim that they are within the law as per the Animal Birth Control (Dogs) Rules 2001.', 'A senior official of the civic body says the ABC Rules clearly state that the community dogs need to be sterilised and after giving them the anti-rabies vaccine, they should be returned to the same locality.', 'While the residents in the city fear the stray dogs population have been growing in numbers or have remained static, an official of the civic body says the numbers have come down when compared to the census taken in 1996.', 'The official says that in the latest survey done through an app in the 200 divisions in the city, the population of stray dogs is at 58,000, with the Ambattur zone topping at 7,383, Madhavaram zone having a population of 6,450 and Tondiarpet close to 5,000. In the 1996 manual survey conducted by the civic body to identify the stray dog population, it was found to be around 85,000.', 'The Chennai Corporation has plans to intensify the vaccination and ABC procedures in the coming months, as part of which a pilot project, ‘Mass Sterilisation and Vaccination project,’ is to be undertaken.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Chennai’s Senate House opens its doors to the public
['It stands at the site of what was once the Nawab of Arcot’s artillery park. From its shady boulevard guns were fired to greet visitors. Today, Senate House stands a silent sentinel gazing at the Marina as students mill about its grounds, pigeons roost in its eaves and visitors throng the Chennai Photo Biennale’s exhibition held in its ornate halls.', 'Senate House was completed in 1879. The library and teaching departments were built in similar style to lend it continuity. The fragile beauty of Senate House was the result of the genius of Robert Fellowes Chisholm who as a young engineer at 21 won a contest and was chosen to design Presidency College and a building to house the offices of the University. Chisholm is also credited with designing the Lakshmi Vilas Palace and the Museum in Baroda, Lawrence school in Ooty and the Rangoon Cathedral. In a way, he changed the skyline of Madras and by the end of his tenure in India in 1902 was considered the master of Indo-Saracenic architecture.', 'The main door of Senate House faces the Centenary buildings and opens to the Great Hall (150 feet long, 60 feet wide and 50 feet high from boarded floor to ornate, canvas ceiling). It was here that convocations were once held, here that students in robes and academic caps celebrated in jubilation before the University expanded and convocations were held at the Centenary auditorium across the road. When the first Assembly was constituted in 1937, it was here that it met.', 'Light from the evening sun filters through the arcaded verandahs supported by stone capitals with Indian figurines. The red hand-pressed brick is firm to the touch and cool despite the searing heat. Broomhall’s tiles cover the roofs from where pigeons fly out to wheel over the Bay and back. Windows — shuttered, vertical and circular — covered in stained glass and woodwork lend it the solemn air of a cathedral. Mooresque colours dominate the walls and lecture halls on the floor above are accessed through grand stairways. The minarets and porches lend it a fabled feel. From the star-embossed stone porches one can see the almost-forgotten statue of Queen Victoria seated shrouded under a canopy of wild bushes. Gazing at the sea and the cars parked in front of it with its back to Senate House is the statue of S Subramania Aiyar, first Indian Vice Chancellor.', 'On the day I visit, work is in progress for the Biennale. The clickety-clack of a typewriter from the Publications office on the ground floor echoes through the hall. Workers erect installations and artists are at work. Dust dances in the sunbeams that light up the floor and lends Senate Hall a touch of fast-fading old world grace. Go before its doors close and its beauty blushes unseen.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Orlandi retires due to heart ailment
['Andrea Orlandi... big setback.', 'Spanish midfielder and former Chennaiyin FC player Andrea Orlandi has been forced to retire from football after discovering he has heart disease.', 'The 34-year-old discovered his condition while undergoing a medical with his new side Virtus Entella, an Italian Serie C side.', 'Orlandi started his career with Spanish side Alaves in the lower divisions before he donned the jersey of FC Barcelona during a loan spell in 2006.', 'He signed for Indian Super League champion Chennaiyin in 2018 and featured in nine matches.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


ISL: Coaches stress on grassroots development
['Carles Cuadrat.', 'A tangible impact on football can happen only with focused grassroots development sustained over time, feel the coaches managing two of the biggest sides of the Hero-Indian Super League.', 'Cesar Ferrando and Carles Cuadrat, the men who helm Jamshedpur FC and Bengaluru FC, insisted on the necessity of youth development as the league stage of the fifth season entered its decisive stage.', 'The assessment of the development scenario came ahead of their fixture here on Wednesday, which has become inconsequential with Bengaluru FC confirming the top spot in the standings, while Jamshedpur’s play-off hopes have evaporated.', 'Ferrando, who once managed Atletico Madrid, said, “Foreign coaches may introduce different playing formations according to the talent available, but Indian players can deliver only when they develop technical abilities at the right age,” he said.', 'Cuadrat, who helped Bengaluru ensure its second successive play-off qualification, insisted on a pyramid structure in the development process.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


I-League: Real Kashmir-East Bengal match moved to Delhi from Srinagar
['With the situation in the Kashmir valley continuing to be tense, the AIFF League Committee has decided to shift Thursday’s Real Kashmir-East Bengal I-League fixture to Delhi from Srinagar.', 'The call was made after Real Kashmir informed the Committee in writing that it wanted the match played at a neutral venue in view of the prevailing security situation.', 'The effect was felt on the I-League second division too, with Wednesday’s encounter between Lonestar Kashmir and Bengaluru FC-B now postponed.', 'This comes after Sunday’s match involving Lonestar and ARA was called off as security agencies refused clearance. I-League CEO Sunando Dhar, however, expressed confidence that Lonestar’s next home game on March 3 would take place as scheduled.', 'It was also decided to refer the matter pertaining to Minerva Punjab FC’s no-show in Srinagar on February 18 to the AIFF Executive Committee. Real Kashmir, on its part, maintained that the present uncertainty was not prevalent in Srinagar during the February 16 to 19 period.', 'Further, March 15 and 16 were announced as dates for the Hero Super Cup qualifiers in Bhubaneswar. The final round of the tournament will be held from March 29 to April 13 with the exact schedule set to be finalised once the AFC Cup itinerary is out.', 'The final round of the Hero Indian Women’s League will be held in May.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


I-League: Aizawl spoils East Bengal’s chances
['Aizawl FC, reduced to 10 men, played an inspired game to hold East Bengal to a 1-1 draw in their Hero I-League match at the Salt Lake Stadium on Monday.', 'The result wasn’t an ideal one for the Kolkata giant which needed a win to keep itself in the hunt for its maiden title. East Bengal is in the second spot with 33 points from 17 matches while Chennai City FC has 40 from 18.', 'Failing to get its strategy right, the host conceded an early goal when Alfred Jaryan sent a perfect cross to Leonce Dodoz.', 'The Ivorian chipped the ball over a charging East Bengal goalkeeper Rakshit Dagar.', 'The visitor could well have doubled the lead in the final minute of the opening half, but the referee disallowed Ansumana Kromah’s goal.', 'The Liberian forward came up with a smart move, screening Dagar who was trying to reach his colleagues upfront after intercepting a floater coming from the Aizawl midfield. Even as Dagar released the ball, Kroma intercepted it and slotted home only to see the referee Umesh Bora hauling him up for infringement and booking him for the offence.', 'East Bengal doubled the initiative after the break but continued to remain off-target despite creating a number of scoring opportunities. Coach Alejandro Menendez introduced the fifth foreigner in Spaniard Toni Dovale in the 57th minute, looking to spruce up the attack.', 'This gave the home attack better direction as the combination between Dovale and Samad Ali Mallick on the right provided an opportunity in the 66th minute. Dovale set it up for an overlapping Samad whose cross into the box saw Enrique Esqueda find the target.', 'Aizawl was reduced to 10 in the 70th minute when it lost defender Kareem Omolaja Nurain who was sent off for dissent after the referee had booked him for an infringement. East Bengal tried to make the most of the number advantage but failed.', 'East Bengal 1 (Enrique Esqueda 66) drew with Aizawl FC 1 (Leonce Dodoz 23).', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Letters to the Editor - Feb. 27, 2019
['The Modi government deserves credit for opening a war memorial (“Modi opens war memorial, hits out at Congress on Rafale”, Feb. 26). This is a wonderful tribute to all the soldiers who have sacrificed their lives for the nation. However, it is disappointing that the Prime Minister used such a sombre occasion to attack his political rivals. The defence forces are above politics and they should not be dragged into political slugfests.', 'The Indian Air Force strikes are timely and welcome (“IAF strikes on JeM camp in Balakot; Country is in safe hands, says PM Modi”, Feb. 26, online). India is no sitting duck. This attack, reminiscent of the surgical strikes of 2016, shows the Modi government’s zero tolerance for terrorism. The message is loud and clear: violence and diplomacy cannot go hand in hand. This also comes as a timely reminder to the Pakistani establishment to shun state-sponsored terrorism. It is heartening that the entire Opposition has supported the strikes.', 'It is great that the operation was a success and there were no casualties on the Indian side. The intelligence wing deserves praise for furnishing the necessary inputs to ensure a successful strike of this nature. Now, India has to take all the precautionary steps to face a counter-attack from Pakistan.', 'With the general election round the corner, we need greater security, not only along the border but throughout the country. For this to happen, political parties need to exercise restraint. They should not make statements that give the impression that we are a divided nation.', 'The surgical strikes of 2016 did not result in any let-up in militancy in Kashmir, and the situation in the State only continued to deteriorate. After Tuesday’s strikes one can only hope that the situation won’t go out of control if Pakistan strikes back. The NDA’s so-called muscular policy towards tackling militancy in Kashmir has resulted in an increase in deaths of security forces and in cross-border intrusions. It is high time the Modi government changes its Kashmir policy. India must do what it can to win the hearts and minds of Kashmiris.', 'West Bengal Chief Minister Mamata Banerjee’s remark is derogatory and unbecoming for someone of her stature (“PM knew about attack, says Mamata”, Feb. 26). Politics seems to be at its ugliest in West Bengal.', 'The government should show this documentary in regional languages in rural and urban schools throughout the country and create awareness on menstruation and hygiene. At this time, we should laud the Telangana government which provides health and hygiene kits to girls to deter them from dropping out of school. The rest of the States can take a leaf out of Telangana’s book. What we must also talk about now is the importance of proper toilets for schoolgirls, which are absent in many places.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Special trains to clear summer rush
['To clear the extra rush of passengers during the summer, the Southern Railway will operate special trains between Ernakulam, Kochuveli and Hyderabad.', 'According to a release, Train No.07118 Ernakulam– Hyderabad Special fare special train will leave Ernakulam Jn at 9.30 p.m on Thursadys between May 2 and June 27 and the train will reach Hyderabad at 10.55 p.m the next day.', 'The train would stop at Aluva, Thrissur, Ottapalam, Palghat, Coimbatore, Tirupur, Erode, Salem, Jolarpettai, Katpadi, Chittore, Tirupaty, Renigunta, Gudur, Nellore, Ongole, Tenali, Guntur, Piduguralla, Nalgonda and Secunderabad.', 'Train No.07116 Kochuveli– Hyderabad Special fare special train will leave Kochuveli at 07.45 a.m on Mondays between May 6 and July 1 and reach Hyderabad at 2 p.m the next day.', 'The train will stop at Kollam, Kayankulam, Chengannur, Tiruvalla, Kottayam, Ernakulam Town, Aluva, Thrissur, Ottapalam, Palghat, Coimbatore, Tirupur, Erode, Salem, Jolarpettai, Vaniyambadi, Katpadi, Chittore, Tirupaty, Renigunta, Gudur, Nellore, Ongole, Tenali, Guntur, Piduguralla, Nalgonda and Secunderabad. Advance reservations for the trains have begun.', 'The Railway board has approved additional stop for Train no. 16733/16734 Rameshwaram-Okha express at Rasipuram for a period of six months between February 28 and August 31 on an experimental basis.', 'The Southern Railway will be regulating trains in the Jolarpettai-Salem section between February 26 and March 25 due to engineering maintenance works in Kagankarai- Samalpatti station, said a release.', 'According to a statement from Salem railway division, on Sundays, Train No. 07115 Hyderabad- Kochuveli Express will be regulated for 30 minutes at Jolarpettai. On Mondays, Train No. 16339 Mumbai Central to Nagercoil Express will be regulated for 10 minutes at Tirupattur. On Tuesdays, Train No. 22815 Bilaspur to Ernakulam express will be regulated for 60 minutes at Jolarpettai.', 'On Wednesdays, Train No. 22619 Bilaspur to Tirunelveli express will be regulated for 90 minutes at Jolarpettai, Train No. 12970 Jaipur- Coimbatore express will be regulated for 50 minutes at Jolarpettai, Train No. 16360 Patna- Ernakulam express will be regulated for 35 minutes at Jolarpettai, Train No. 16339 Mumbai Central to Nagercoil express will be regulated for 20 minutes at Tirupattur.', 'On Fridays, Train No. 16339 Mumbai Central to Nagercoil express will be regulated for 10 minutes at Tirupattur.', 'The Southern Railway cancelled the services of Vridhachalam to Salem passenger train on Tuesday due to technical reasons.', 'A release from the Railway said that services of train no. 76847 Vridhachallam to Salem DEMU passenger was partially cancelled between Mukahasaparur to Salem and train no. 76850 Salem to Vridhachallam DEMU passenger was fully cancelled due to mechanical failure in the engine.', 'The railway has also rescheduled Train No. 66607 Coimbatore- Palakkad Town MEMU passenger due to engineering work between Somanur- Sulur road station.', 'According to a release, the train has been scheduled to start 25 minutes later, at 6. 10 p.m between Februrary 28 and April 15 due to engineering works.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


TN Govt. urged to file review petition against SC order on evicting tribals
['The Centre should immediately pass an ordinance to counter the Supreme Court order that would see the eviction of over one million tribals from their traditional forests. The Tamil Nadu Government should file a review petition against the Supreme Court order, said P. Shanmugam, general secretary of Tamil Nadu Vivasayigal Sangam here on Tuesday.', 'Addressing the media here, Mr. Shanmugam said the order was a violation of the constitutional rights of tribals and others non-tribal communities dependent on the forests.', 'The Supreme Court, on February 13, ordered the States to evict tribals and other forest dwellers whose claims to forest lands were rejected under the Forest Rights Act. However, this order had been widely criticised by activists, who have pointed to the faults in the processing of the claims, and the failure of the appeals systems for rejected claims.', 'According to Mr. Shanmugam, the BJP Government at the Centre has overseen vast dispossession of lands of farmers during its tenure. Farm lands in the Delta and elsewhere were being lost to State led dispossession for the hydrocarbon project, 8 lane and 4 –lane highway projects and for high tension power line project. The coming elections will witness the demands of the farmers taking the foreground, Mr.Shanmugam said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Videographers allege discrepancies in tender allocation
['Videographers staging a protest at the Salem District Collectorate on Tuesday.', 'Members of the Salem district all Videographers’ Welfare Association staged a protest on the Collectorate premises on Tuesday alleging irregularities in the tender allocation for videography for the parliamentary elections.', 'The protesters alleged that the district administration was acting in favour of a few individuals and tender was allocated to only a particular individual during every elections. They also alleged that the administration was hand in glove with those individuals.', 'The tender for videography for the elections was opened on February 19 and applications were received until February 25..', 'Secretary of Salem District All Videographers’ Welfare Asssociation Jagadeesh said that the tender allocation process was not held in transparent manner in Salem district and this had been happening for the past several elections. While all other districts have announced the winning bidder for the tender, Salem had not announced it yet and officials here just examined the technical bid details.', 'The protesters also alleged that a meeting was held with a selected few videographers at the District Collectorate. “There are three bidders here but two of the bidders weren’t informed about the meeting at the Collectorate. Officials here have conducted a meeting with videographers of just one bidder and others were kept in the dark,” alleged Mr. Jagadeesh.', 'He added that during every elections, in Salem alone, the winning bidder was announced only after three or four days after the tender is closed.', 'But, officials denied the charges. A senior official said: “We haven’t decided the winning bidder yet. It was just an informal meeting. The bidding process is done in a transparent manner. The bidder will be announced shortly.”in the upcoming days,” said the official.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Read books for stress relief: Collector
['District Collector Rohini R. Bhajibhakare receiving a set of books from a donor as part of the Read Salem programme under The Hindu Read and Rise initiative on Tuesday.', 'Read and Rise initiative.', 'District Collector Rohini R. Bhajibhakare distributed the collection to Principals of the 100 schools at a function held at Government Girls Higher Secondary School at Kottai here on Tuesday.', 'Launching the programme, Ms. Rohini requested all school principals to allocate a stipulated time in their schools to read extra-curricular books. “We have set up a library within the District Collectorate and I have advised staff from over 80 departments in the Collectorate to spend some time reading extra-curricular at the library. This would help them to relieve their work stress and feel relaxed,” she said.', 'Chief Educational Officer T. Ganesha Moorthy, T. Sundareshan, Chief Education Officer, Senthil Public School, Dr. S Ashok, Managing Director, Saravana hospital and R. Dinesh, Director, Jairam Arts and Science College were also present.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Agriculture, ancillary activities get major share in annual credit plan
['The Annual Credit Plan for the district for 2019-20 envisaged a total outlay of ₹ 10,911 crore with agriculture and ancillary activities getting major share.', 'Collector C. Kathiravan released the Plan and the first copy was received by S. Paulraj, Deputy General Manager, Canara Bank, Erode Region.', 'The plan was prepared by the District lead Bank, Canara Bank, and has been prepared based on the Potential Linked Credit Plan 2019-2020 prepared by NABARD.', 'M. Chandrasekaran, Lead District Manager, Erode District, said that agriculture and ancillary activities were allotted ₹ 5,519 crore, Micro Small and Medium Enterprises get ₹ 3,031 crore and other priority sector given ₹2,361 crore.', 'He said that the Plan has been prepared by taking into account the following aspects, Potential Linked Credit Plan prepared by NABARD, new priority sector guidelines duly incorporating, social infrastructure, renewable energy, agro processing, backward and forward linkages and other infrastructure facilities available in the district, and performance of banks under District Credit Plan 2018-19.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Fireworks units resume work
['Majority of 1,070 fireworks units in Virudhunagar district reopened on Tuesday after over 100 days of closure.', 'However, the court did not hear the case today,” said Tamil Nadu Fireworks and Amorces Manufacturers Association president A. Asaithambi.', 'Manufacturers affiliated to various associations, including TANFAMA and the Indian Fireworks Manufacturers Association (TIFMA), opted for an indefinite closure of the units on November 12 as the Supreme Court ordered making of green crackers only.', 'They said that joined crackers and other fireworks products that were made using Barium Nitrate formed a majority of the production. With no clarity on what is green crackers, they cannot carry out production.', 'Besides, both the Petroleum and Explosives Safety Organisation and District Revenue Officer, who are authorities to issue licences, had warned against violating court order.', 'Though the district administration asked the industry to make crackers that were not banned, the industry refused expressing apprehension of action.', 'Only 10% to 20% of workers could be engaged as the number of goods to be manufactured was reduced to a few like single cracker, bombs, red-light emitting flower pots and caps and rolls.', 'Initially, the units can only take up maintenance like cleaning the premises and clearing the wild growth before taking up the actual production.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


‘Release fishermen and boats’
['A day after the Sri Lankan Navy arrested nine country boat fishermen along with their two country boats on the charge of trespassing into their water, boat owners, accompanied by fishermen from Nambuthalai hamlet met the Collector here on Wednesday.', 'Led by the village leader Arumugam, they urged Collector K. Veera Raghava Rao to secure the release of fishermen and boats.', 'They were fishing in the ‘traditional fishing area’ well within the Indian water when the Lankan Navy arrested them.', 'The country boat fishermen, using the marine friendly ‘vazhi valai’ had been fishing in the area for several years and it was high time the State and Central governments protected their livelihood, they said.', 'The Lankan Navy, which had been stating that they arrested mechanised boat fishermen for using ‘destructive’ trawling fishing method, has started arresting harmless country boat fishermen, they said and urged the authorities to take up the matter with the Lankan authorities and put an end to the harassment.', 'In his petition, a boat owner K Ramakrishnan said five fishermen had set out for fishing from Embavayal in Pudukottai district on Monday when the Lankan Navy arrested them, the next day.', 'In its website, the Lankan Navy said that the fishermen were fishing in north-west of Delft island. They were handed over to Fisheries department officials for onward action, it said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Plea for ‘mercy killing’
['A transwoman, who is being reportedly tortured and threatened by his family members, has urged the Collector to give his consent for ‘mercy killing’.', 'In a petition submitted to the Collector Prashant M. Wadnere recently, A. Oviya Mary, 34, an undergraduate from Kovalam near Kanniyakumari, said she joined a group of transgender living in Tiruchi 13 years ago when she was doing her graduation. Though she obtained her undergraduate degree in statistics, her repeated attempts to get a job failed as none was prepared to employ her.', 'After spending a few years in New Delhi and Bengaluru, Oviya came to Tiruchi where she lived under the care of two transwomen. When one of the transwomen, Kajol, adopted Oviya, she earned the wrath of Kajol’s sisters, whose “threat” forced her leave Tiruchi to settle down at Kanniyakumari along with another group of transwomen.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Mixed reaction to new bus route in Virudhunagar
['A bus passing through Main Bazaar Road in Virudhunagar on Tuesday.', 'The district administration’s move to operate town buses of select routes through Main Bazaar Road near Mariamman Temple has drawn mixed reaction from the residents.', 'While road users have welcomed it, traders who have set up their shops along this stretch claim that the bus operation has affected their business activities.', 'Following complaints of encroachment of the road by shopkeepers, the district administration permitted buses bound for Sattur, Kariyapatti and Aruppukottai to ply from Old Bus Stand through Main Bazaar, Teppakulam West Street, Municipal Office Road to reach Karumathimadam from February 9.', 'Previously, buses were going through Pavali Road, T.T.K Road, Sivakasi Road to reach Karumathimadam. The new route is a short-cut road that cuts down the distance between Old Bus Stand and Karumathimadam by at least one km.', 'Besides, ensuring that Main Bazaar Road is free from encroachment, the move has decongested the other road through which buses were plying earlier. “By making Bazaar Main Road one-way, there is no traffic congestion on this road,” S. Haribasakaran, 42, a resident, said.', 'But traders said that they were not able to carry out their usual business. Vehicles are not being allowed to park on the road for loading or unloading of goods. Besides, the space on the road is available to park only two-wheelers affecting their business.', 'S. Masilamani, an advocate, said that this stretch between Mariamman temple and Teppakulam was part of the National Highway 7 and under large-scale encroachment. “Buses used to ply through this road three decades back. Only after we started complaining about encroachments, the district administration operated buses on one-way to avoid evicting major encroachments. If it is properly evicted, buses can be operated on both ways,” he said.', 'However, Virudhunagar Tahsildar, T. Seenivasan, said there were no permanent encroachments on this stretch as per records.', 'Former municipal councillor S. Kamatchi said the municipal council proposed to shift vegetable shops near municipal office building some 15 years but traders refused it.', 'A.G. Selvakumar, a trader on Main Bazaar Road, said the move is an attempt to shift the shops from here to elsewhere. “Let the government set up another bazaar anywhere but it should not disturb traders who are here for decades,” he said.', 'The traders have made a representation to Minister for Dairy Development K.T. Rajenthra Bhalaji.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


‘Increase age limit of child workers’
['The People’s Action for Development has urged the authorities to raise the age under the Child Labour (Prohibition and Regulation) Act, and for free and compulsory education to 18 years, from 14 years.', 'During an interaction at Vembar with girls, who have been involved in child labour, on Tuesday, its founder and executive director Rajendra Prasad said that companies were exploiting the age bar of 14 years. “Age of adolescent children involved in child labour is forged. The age should be ascertained using proper documentation like birth certificate or using services of a government dentist,” he said.', 'A number of girls, who have been involved in child and exploitative labour at textile mills, fish processing units, among others, shared their experience.', 'After being taken to textile mills, the children are made to perform hard labour up to 12 hours a day and given a pay of ₹300 a day, as opposed to an adult who usually gets ₹700 a day. “Everything happens in an informal manner and no social security benefit is given,” said Mr. Rajendra Prasad adding that the Apprentices Act was being exploited.', 'According to data from the Department of Labour and Employment in 2007, 38,461 adolescent girls are employed in 406 cotton mills while studies from NGOs and international organisations put the number anywhere between 2,00,000 and 4,00,000. Often, the girls suffer from health complications.', 'After leaving the labour, the girls have tried to be agents of change by ensuring other children do not end up in child labour through a programme launched by the NGO.', 'Mr. Rajendra Prasad said an education fund of ₹42 lakh is available for 51 villages with which girls can pursue higher education.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Prosthetics, mobility aids given to people with disabilities
['Differently-abled beneficiaries receiving aids at a function in Coonoor.', 'More than 31 people with disabilities in the Coonoor and Kotagiri areas were fitted with prosthetic limbs and other mobility aids at a specially organised event by the Kinder Trust in Coonoor recently.', 'Diana Barucha, managing trustee of Kinder Trust, said that 60 people with disabilities had wanted prosthetic limbs and mobility aids, and were measured for the same last month, of whom 31 people attended the event. “Children as young as 4-years-old up to adults and seniors to the age of 80 had approached us seeking prosthetics and mobility aids,” said Ms. Barucha.', 'Technical assistance to fit the aids was given by Freedom Trust, while the cost of the mobility aids and prosthetics were borne by the Corporate Social Responsibility initiative of Dymos Lear, a private firm here.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Tense situation in Kodaikanal
['Uneasy calm and slogan shouting continued in and around the municipal office here on Tuesday for the second day.', 'When municipal officials inspected some buildings last week, there was tension in many parts of the hill station. They submitted in the High Court Bench that a over 1,415 buildings were built either without proper approval or with deviations thus violating norms. So, the court directed them to seal such unauthorised structures and officials were carrying out the order.', 'Commissioner Murugesan, who has been heading a team of officials, told reporters that they would lock and seal 258 buildings in a week. They sealed 49 buildings last week and power supply was cut. When six persons approached the HC seeking relief, the court gave exemptions to some buildings only like schools and hospitals.', 'He clarified that they would go ahead with the drive against commercial buildings including hotels and wayside restaurants which had no permission from any agency.', 'Another official said that two town planning officers and four town planning inspectors from other district had been deployed on special duty to execute the task. Four teams were provided with adequate police personnel. “In all probabilities, the work would be completed in a week,” Mr. Murugesan said. The police had a tough time in controlling protesters when officials went to seal a hotel near bus stand. “Show us the court order and demolish,” they said and objected to the drive for a while. When the police said that they would be arrested, the crowd dispersed.', 'Officials clarified that names and addresses of 258 illegal buildings have been displayed for the public to view. Activists and NGOs from various organisations welcomed the HC directive and appealed to the public not to encourage officials to indulge in corrupt practices. “Those officials, responsible for according approval to construct illegal structures, should also be taken to task,” they said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Ryots vent ire over disbursement of relief
['Farmers under the banner of Cauvery Farmers’ Protection Association staging a demonstration in front of the office of Joint Registrar of Cooperatives in Thanjavur on Tuesday.', 'Members of Cauvery Farmers’ Protection Association on Tuesday alleged delay in disbursement of compensation under the crop insurance scheme.', 'They staged a sit-in protest near the Office of the Joint Registrar of Co-operatives and courted arrest after they were prevented from entering the office premises located on Medical College Road.', 'The farmers, led by district secretary Sundara Vimalanathan, raised slogans condemning the Central and State governments for not implementing the crop insurance scheme properly.', 'They said the insurance company released the compensation amount for samba and thaladi crops in 2016-17 and for kuruvai, samba and thaladi crops in 2017-18 to the Department of Cooperation belatedly. Adding to the woes of farmers, who had taken crop insurance through societies, the Department of Cooperation bungled in the distribution of the benefit.', 'A majority of the ryots, who had taken crop insurance and suffered crop loss, were yet to receive compensation. In some cases, a meagre amount was disbursed, the demonstrators alleged.', 'According to Govindaraj, a farmer of Manangorai, the discrepancies in disbursement of compensation or the disputable manner in which disbursement being made could be averted only if the crop loss was calculated based on the survey numbers for which the crop insurance was availed.', 'Taking crop cutting samples in 10 or 12 places in a village or area and calculating the crop loss percentage would always create problems, he pointed out.', 'All the arrested farmers were later released in the evening, police said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Avoid Palk Bay, ICG tells fishermen
['The Indian Coast Guard (ICG) Station, Karaikal, has reached out to fishermen in coastal hamlets operating trawlers and motorised boats along the stretch of 87 nautical miles from Poompuhar to Vedaranyam and encouraged them to opt for tuna fishing.', 'The ICG is educating the fishermen about the consequences of venturing into Sri Lankan waters in the backdrop of depletion of marine resources on the Indian side of maritime boundary.', 'The Fisheries department insists on installation of GPS devices in trawlers and motorised boats to make sure that the fishermen remain inside the Indian Maritime Boundary. The fishermen, in turn, expect the government to supply them with the devices.', 'Studies show that bottom trawlers have caused enormous depletion in marine resources on the Indian side and are in a compulsive situation to carry out course correction rather than venturing into Lankan waters.', 'For decades till the end of the civil war in Sri Lanka, commercial fishing vessels operated by dragging multiple nets through water, scraping the sea bed and disturbing the marine environment. The trawlers operating in Palk Bay have turned the sea surface barren, ridding it of even planktons, the very basis for the marine food chain. The trawlers continue to cause destruction of marine wealth as flouting of rules is not linked to cancellation of licences or denial of subsidised diesel, according to marine experts.', 'Citing the sustainable practices being adopted by the Sri Lankan fishermen after the end of civil war in the island nation, the studies have suggested that there must be strong deterrent mechanisms in place to prevent Indian fishermen from crossing the IMB.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Plea to expedite road overbridge construction
['Residents of Mannargudi have demanded that construction of a road over bridge (ROB) at Needamanglam be expedited to put an end to the ordeal faced by road users on the crucial stretch connecting Nagapattinam and Velankanni with Tiruchi.', 'Participating in a meeting organised by Nesakkaram, a coordinating association of all non-governmental organisations functioning in and around Mannargudi, they said the announcement that a ROB would come up at Needamangalam raised hope among locals and long distance travellers by road that they would be relieved of the problem of waiting for a considerable period of time at the level crossing gate frequently. But the inordinate delay, presumably due to non-acquisition of required land for constructing the ROB in spite of the railways allocating ₹9 crore for the project, had nullified their expectations.', 'They urged the Union and State governments to initiate steps for carrying out the project as early as possible.', 'They have also pleaded that a Semmozhi Express rake parked at Mannargudi railway station during daytime be operated as passenger service between Mannargudi and Velankanni and a police out-post be set up at the railway station.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Poll training for cops held in Thanjavur
['Collector A. Annadurai explains the functioning of EVMs to police personnel at a training camp in Thanjavur on Tuesday.', 'A one-day training programme on election-related processes was held for police personnel here on Tuesday.', 'The participants comprising senior police officials to sub-inspectors of police were told about their role in the conduct of elections by District Election Wing officials.', 'A detailed presentation on the procedure relating to implementation of model code of conduct, prevention of law and order problem during election period and precautionary steps to be taken during election campaign by political parties was made.', 'Collector A. Annadurai explained the functioning of voter verifiable paper audit trail (VVPAT) system, which is going to be used in all polling booths during the parliamentary elections.', 'Superintendent of Police S.S. Maheswaran, Additional SP S. Balachandran and other senior police and election wing officials were present.', 'Earlier, an awareness programme for college students was held at Government Medical College, Thanjavur, on Monday.', 'Addressing the students, the Collector said the percentage of votes polled during the last parliamentary elections was higher than the polls held in 2009.', 'Generally, educated persons stayed away from participating in the electoral process he said and urged the students to get their names enrolled in the voter list and exercise their franchise without fail.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


State promotes five IAS officers
['The Tamil Nadu government has promoted five IAS officers to the cadre of Chief Secretary. In a G.O. issued by the Public Department, the government said Dr. V. Irai Anbu, Vikram Kapur, Dr. Atulya Mishra, D. Sabitha and Jatindra Nath Swain will be designated as Additional Chief Secretaries.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


HC shocked over fake recruitment interviews on court campus
['The Madras High Court on Tuesday was shocked to come across a case of fake recruitment interviews conducted for the subordinate judiciary by a group of dubious individuals inside the Lok Adalat hall at District Legal Services Authority (DLSA) building, situated in the Chengalpet court complex, on December 27.', 'Justice N. Anand Venkatesh was taken aback when he came to know that the so-called interviews took place on a court campus and that it came to light only when the court staff spotted it.', 'The issue was brought to the notice of the judge when a bail application filed by two of the accused in the recruitment scam was listed for hearing.', 'Additional Public Prosecutor M. Prabavathy submitted that the petitioners were involved in a serious case of as many as 23 individuals having been interviewed by a gang for the subordinate judiciary.', 'The police had arrested the two individuals on the basis of a complaint lodged by the court staff.', 'Expressing displeasure over the way in which the investigation had been conducted so far, the judge said the police had so far not arrested the prime accused named Mani of Dindigul, who had brought people to attend the interview. They had not taken the present petitioners into police custody too to find out the whereabouts of the prime accused, he pointed out.', 'He granted conditional bail to both the petitioners since they had been incarcerated for 55 days and would be entitled to statutory bail in another five days.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Disqualified legislators must refund salary: High Court
['Mohamed Imranullah S.', 'Mohamed Imranullah S.', 'In a significant judgment, the Madras High Court on Tuesday held that Members of Parliament (MPs) as well as Members of Legislative Assembly (MLAs) are liable to refund salaries and other emoluments, along with penalty, if a court of law declares their election to be illegal, null and void either before or after the completion of their tenure.', 'Justice V. Parthiban gave the ruling while dismissing a writ petition filed by former Congress MLA P. Veldurai in 2011 against a demand raised by Tamil Nadu Legislative Assembly Secretariat to repay ₹ 21.58 lakh, since the Supreme Court had that year held that his election from Cheranmahadevi Assembly constituency in May 2006 was illegal, null and void.', 'Allowing an election petition preferred by his rival candidate P.H. Paul Manoj Pandian of AIADMK, the Supreme Court ruled that Mr. Veldurai’s election was not valid because he was a registered government civil contractor at the time of filing nominations and his registration had not been cancelled as per law. The ruling had attained finality.', 'When he was slapped with a demand for refund from the Assembly Secretariat on August 22, 2011, he rushed to the court contending that the salaries and emoluments paid to him for his services could not be taken back. He also claimed that there was a bar on imposing penalty under Section 107 of the Representation of the People Act of 1951.', 'Rejecting his contentions, the judge said when a person not qualified to contest in elections had got elected, and subsequently by operation of law lost the status of having been an elected member right from the day when he assumed office, the attendant benefits he had availed during such tenure must necessarily be withdrawn for all practical purposes.', 'Further, striking a difference between governments servants whose salaries could not be recovered on account of dismissal or termination of service and politicians who run for public offices not to make a living but to serve the people at large, the judge said it would behove well if the latter voluntarily refund the public money once their elections get nullified.', 'He also said that no one could be allowed to take advantage of the delay in disposal of election petitions which generally get decided only after the completion of the tenure of office of an MP or MLA concerned.', 'He went on to state that the loser in a legal battle could not be allowed to triumphantly hoodwink the judicial system by methodical procrastination as that would only lead to travesty of justice. In a case of this nature, the effect of adverse order should not be symbolic or notional but should be real, tangible and exemplary, the judge asserted.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Kamal open to holding talks with DMDK
['Makkal Needhi Maiam (MNM) president Kamal Haasan said his party was open to holding talks with the DMDK if an opportunity arose.', 'He said the MNM was willing to contest the bypolls to 21 vacant constituencies as and when they were held.', 'Speaking to reporters at the Chennai airport, Mr. Haasan said the MNM would contest alone in all 40 constituencies if need be. “We won’t ally with anyone with whom we have differences in ideology,” he added.', 'In a statement, Mr. Haasan said he met CPI(M) leader Prakash Karat in Delhi on Tuesday. He also met Delhi Chief Minister Arvind Kejriwal.', 'He said that since his party was going into campaign mode, he wanted to meet Mr. Kejriwal, who had been a well-wisher from the beginning. “While the AAP is not contesting in Tamil Nadu, we will be their friends in the State. We’ve invited him to come to Tamil Nadu when he is free,” Mr. Haasan said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Solace for slain CRPF jawans’ kin
['The family members of G. Subramanian, who was among the scores of CRPF jawans killed in the Pulwama terror attack, expressed their gratitude to the Indian Air Force for striking a Jaish-e-Mohammed camp in Pakistan-occupied Kashmir on Tuesday.', 'Following the airstrike, the slain jawan’s wife, Krishnaveni, his father Ganapathi and relatives garlanded his portrait at their residence in Savalaperi. "It was painful for us when the CRPF personnel were attacked. But we are glad that a proper response has been given. We would like to express our gratitude to the IAF," said Ms. Krishnaveni.', 'Mr. Ganapathi said it should be ensured that all terrorists were wiped out.', 'In a video, Subramaniam’s friend Arumugam saluted and thanked the Indian Air Force for “exacting revenge on the terrorists”.', 'The IAF strike brought some solace to Gandhimathi, 28, wife of another slain jawan, C. Sivachandran, who hailed from Kargudi in Ariyalur district.', 'News of the pre-dawn operation came when she was attending the 13th day ceremony of her husband’s death.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Negotiations still on with DMDK, says ruling party
['The AIADMK has maintained that it is still holding talks with the DMDK to rope it into the ruling party-led alliance for the upcoming Lok Sabha election.', 'On Tuesday, Fisheries Minister and the AIADMK’s organising secretary, D. Jayakumar, reiterated the point.', 'Referring to the reported remark by Vijaya Prabhakaran, son of DMDK founder Vijayakant, that it was his party, with a vote share of 2.5%, that would be the deciding factor in any coalition, Mr. Bhalaji had said it was for “reasons of courtesy” that the AIADMK’s representatives were in contact with the DMDK, and not because the latter had a “huge vote bank”.', 'It should be noted that it was the AIADMK which ensured that several parties, including the DMDK, got recognition [of the Election Commission], the Minister added.', 'Mr. Panneerselvam said the composition of the AIADMK-led coalition would be finalised within “a few days”.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Tamilisai to contest Lok Sabha election
['BJP State president Tamilisai Soundararajan has announced that she will contest from one of the five seats that have been allotted to the party by the AIADMK for the Lok Sabha polls.', 'She said there was a lot of speculation on where she would contest from. “Once we take a firm decision, we will announce it,” she added.', 'Ms. Tamilisai said the party was still in talks with the DMDK and the Puthiya Thamizhagam. She said the ground situation in Tamil Nadu would change once all the alliance parties start campaigning together.', 'Targeting the DMK, she said the party should stop using the term ‘communal politics’ against the BJP.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Parties welcome IAF strike on Pakistani terror outfit
['Political parties in Tamil Nadu have welcomed the airstrike carried out by the Indian Air Force (IAF) on a training facility of the terror group Jaish-e-Mohammed in Pakistan on Tuesday.', 'Chief Minister Edappadi K. Palaniswami said, “On behalf of the Tamil Nadu government, I congratulate the IAF for destroying terrorist camps inside Pakistan.” He praised Prime Minister Narendra Modi’s efforts to curb terrorism.', 'PMK founder S. Ramadoss said the IAF’s “daring attack” to ensure peace in India was to be congratulated. “I request the Centre to ensure high security across the country since Pakistan may attack India through proxies,” he said.', 'VCK president Thol. Thirumavalavan, while welcoming the strike, said it was important that this did not escalate into a war.', 'AISMK leader R. Sarathkumar congratulated the IAF and stressed the need to be vigilant on the next steps that Pakistan might take.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Actor Ranjith quits PMK
['Tamil actor and PMK vice-president Ranjith quit the party on Tuesday in protest against its decision to tie-up with the AIADMK for the upcoming Lok Sabha polls.', 'He is the second office-bearer of the party to resign since it entered the AIADMK-led alliance. Last week, Rajeshwari Priya, an office-bearer of the youth wing, quit the PMK.', 'Similarly, on the issue of the Salem-Chennai green corridor project, the PMK had conducted signature campaigns and opposed the AIADMK government for taking up the project. Now, by joining hands with the AIADMK, it had betrayed the people, he said.', 'Taking a dig at PMK youth wing leader Anbumani Ramadoss, Mr. Ranjith said that when Mr. Ramadoss contested the 2016 Assembly election with the ‘Maatram, Munnetram, Anbumani’ slogan, lakhs of youth rallied behind him with the hope of [creating] a better Tamil Nadu. But by aligning with the ruling party, he had dashed their hopes.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Three killed as car rams tree
['Head-on crash: The accident happened when they were returning from a trip to Yelagiri.', 'Three taxi drivers died on the spot and two others sustained injuries, on Tuesday, when a car in which they were travelling rammed a roadside tree at Kalendra on the Jolarpet-Vaniyambadi Road.', 'All of them were residents of Moulivakkam in Chennai. The accident occurred when they were returning to Chennai after visiting Yelagiri, the police said.', 'The deceased have been identified as Janakiraman, 25, Siva, 25, and Prakash, 26. Other two occupants, Umapathi, 25, and Subramani, 26, suffered injuries. Umapathi, who was driving the car, tried to avoid a collision with another car.', 'On being alerted, the Vaniyambadi police arrived and retrieved the trapped bodies with the help of local villagers.', 'The injured were admitted to the Vaniyambadi Government Hospital.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Red sanders worth ₹5 lakh seized after a hot chase
['Under guard: Forest officials with the seized red sanders logs at Gudiyatham on Tuesday.', 'Forest department officials in the Vellore district seized eight red sanders logs worth around ₹5 lakh from a car after a two-km chase on Tuesday.', 'When Gudiyatham forest range officer Mahendran and his team of officials were conducting a vehicle check at the Synagunda forest checkpost in Kondama Kovil, they spotted a car bearing an Andhra Pradesh registration number.', 'The car, which was about to enter Gudiyatham, took a U-turn.', 'The officials chased the car and stopped it in the Synagunda reserve forest. However, the two occupants in the car escaped after abandoning the vehicle.', 'The officials searched the car and found eight premium quality red sanders logs, each measuring about seven feet long.', 'Consignment from A.P.', 'The officials registered a case and launched a hunt for the two men who escaped after abandoning the car.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Foundation laid for Smart City project in Vellore district
['From left, Vellore Collector S.A. Raman, Ministers K.C. Veeramani and Nilofer Kafeel and Tiruvannamalai MP R.Vanaroja at the inaugural event on Tuesday.', 'Commercial Taxes and Registration Minister K. C. Veeramani and Labour Welfare Minister Nilofer Kafeel on Tuesday laid the foundation stone for the ₹1,000 crore Smart City Vellore project, with 50% investment from the Centre.', 'The projects will focus on some key areas, including establishment of an integrated bus stand, construction of underground drainage scheme at cost of ₹537.37 crore, improvement in water supply and solid waste management project.', 'At a function held at a private marriage hall, Mr. Veeramani said that 10 cities from the State were selected for providing world class infrastructure facilities. He was proud that the Vellore Municipal Corporation was one of them. Works to the tune of ₹576 crore had been designed to be carried out in the first phase and they would be be completed in two years, he said. Ms. Kafeel hailed the project that would bring big changes.', 'Tiruvannamalai MP, R. Vanaroja called upon the Opposition parties to stay united to get the necessary infrastructure for the city.', 'DMK MLAs criticised the way Corporation officials for ‘hiding’ the project from the people. However, they welcomed the project and hoped that the execution of works would also be ‘smart’.', 'Meanwhile, BJP workers rushed to the stage to protest the “blacking out” of the Union Government’s contribution to the project’.', 'When Mr. Veeramani made specific references to the Union Government’s contribution to the project, the agitators were pacified.', 'District Collector in his address called for the cooperation of all segments to complete this project on time.', 'He said it was the responsibility of the people to keep the city smart one in all respects. Vellore City Municipal Corporation Commissioner, S. Sivasubramanian listed the various measures taken out to keep the city garbage-free and plastic free’.', 'Executive Engineer of VCMC, M. Kannan, assistant executive engineer S. Jagadeesan, ruling party MLAs S.Ravi, G. Loganathan, DMK MLAs J.L. Esawarappan, P. Karthikeyan, and A.P. Nandakumar spoke at the event.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Forest fire in Mudumalai Tiger Reserve contained to an extent
['The forest fire raging for the past four days in Mudumalai Tiger Reserve (MTR) in Nilgiris district has been contained to an extent and prevented from spreading to nearby areas, officials said.', 'The fire had spread to over 250 acres over this period of time, they said.', 'Following the blaze, the department had banned entry of tourists into the MTR.', 'Meanwhile, a 26-year-old man was arrested on Tuesday on charges of setting afire dry leaves and grass in the forest area coming under Nilgiris North division.', 'The officials and some department workers on morning rounds noticed smoke emanating from Ebbanadu area, rushed to the spot and noticed the man lighting a fire in the area, following which he was nabbed.', 'On being questioned, the man said he had lit the fire to prevent elephants, deer and other animals straying into his farmland, where he was growing some vegetables.', 'He was later produced before a court and remanded to 15 days judicial custody.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Kevin Feige says Disney+’s Marvel shows will be connected to MCU
['Kevin Feige has revealed the Marvel series on Disney’s upcoming streaming service, Disney+ will be connected to the overall Marvel Cinematic Universe.', 'The company had recently green-lit a stand-alone series based on popular Marvel comics character Loki, played by British star Tom Hiddleston in the MCU.', 'The studio is reported to be planning similar shows on characters such as Scarlett Witch, Winter Soldier and Falcon.', 'Feige said the proposed show will be a Marvel Studios production.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Music streaming service Spotify launches in India
['The music app has redesigned some of the features for Indian market, and includes multiple language options.', 'Music streaming service Spotify was launched in India late in the evening on Tuesday. The Spotify app is now available for free download or with an upgrade to Spotify Premium for ₹119 per month, the company said in a release.', 'The music app has redesigned some of the features for Indian market, and includes multiple language options.', 'Spotify, with over 200 million users globally, will now compete with other music streaming apps such as Gaana, Amazon music.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Sensex rebounds 256 points, Nifty above 10,900-mark
['Prominent gainers that supported the recovery were Yes Bank, Sun Pharma, Bajaj Auto, M&M, Asian Paints, rising up to 2.83%.', 'Stocks staged a strong comeback in early trade on February 27, with the BSE Sensex rebounding over 256 points and the Nifty recapturing the 10,900-mark on unabated foreign capital inflows amid short covering.', 'Asian markets were also trading in the green ahead of the second summit between US President Donald Trump and North Korean leader Kim Jong Un in Vietnam.', 'The 30-share Sensex rose by 256.18 points, or 0.73%, to 36,226.89 in early trade. The gauge had lost 239.67 points on after India carried out air strikes on a terrorist camp in Pakistan.', 'All the sectoral indices, led by auto, metal, bankex, FMCG and healthcare, were trading in the green with gains of up to 1.32%.', 'The broad-based NSE Nifty went up by 70.80 points or 0.66% to 10,906.10.', 'Prominent gainers that supported the recovery were Yes Bank, Sun Pharma, Bajaj Auto, M&M, Asian Paints, Hero MotoCoprp, Bajaj Finance, Tata Steel, Tata Motors, Maruti Suzuki, Axis Bank, ICICI Bank, SBI, RIL, ONGC, IndusInd Bank, L&T, Coal India and Vedanta Ltd, rising up to 2.83%.', 'Brokers said continued pumping of investments by foreign funds and fresh spell of buying by domestic investors amid a firm trend at other Asian bourses led the markets higher.', 'Besides, covering-up of short positions by speculators ahead of February month expiry in the derivatives segment on Thursday, too supported the upside in select stocks, they added.', 'Foreign institutional investors (FIIs) bought shares worth a net ₹1,674.17 crore, while domestic institutional investors sold equities to the tune of ₹720.27 crore Tuesday, provisional data showed.', 'In the Asian region, Hong Kong’s Hang Seng was up 0.44%, Japan’s Nikkei rose 0.53% and Shanghai Composite Index was up by 0.79% in early trade. Korea’s KOSPI too gained 0.24%.', 'The US Dow Jones Industrial Average ended 0.13% higher in Tuesday’s trade.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Four-storey building collapses in Karol Bagh
['A view of the Collapsed building in Dev Nagar Area of Karol Bagh in New Delhi on February 27.', 'A four-storey commercial building collapsed in Devnagar area of Delhi’s Karol Bagh on Wednesday morning. No casualty has been reported.', 'The fire department says a call was received at 8.40 am regarding a four storey building collapse on Padam Singh road in Karol Bagh. Five fire tenders were rushed to the spot to conduct the rescue operations.', 'Police said the building was in a dilapidated state for long and only the ground floor of the building was in use for some commercial purposes. When the building collapsed no one was under it, officials said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Sushma Swaraj briefs China on Balakot air strike, says India does not want ‘escalation’
['Watch | Indian Air Force strike in Balakot: what next?', 'Earlier, in the first high level interaction with China after the Pulwama terror attack, Ms. Swaraj mounted a robust attack on Pakistan, accusing it of harbouring the JeM, which had masterminded the “worst terrorist” attack against the Indian security forces on February 14.', 'In her opening remarks during a one-on-one interaction with Chinese State Councilor and Foreign Minister Wang Yi, on the sidelines of the RIC ministerial meeting, Ms. Swaraj stressed that she was visiting China “at a time of grief and anger in India”.', 'Slamming Islamabad for the Pulwama attack, Ms. Swaraj pointed out that the “worst terrorist attack directed against our security forces” has been “claimed by the JeM, a Pakistan-based and supported terrorist organisation banned by the UN and other countries”.', 'Ms. Swaraj made it plain to Mr. Wang that “the entire UN had spoken with one voice condemning the terrorist attack”.', 'Despite India’s ongoing tensions with Pakistan, the Chinese Foreign Minister pointed to Beijing’s intent to pursue with the “Wuhan spirit”—a reference to the two-day dialogue between Prime Minister Narendra Modi and Chinese President Xi Jinping to reboot India-China ties.', 'Referring to the Wuhan informal summit, the External Affairs Minister said the decision to pursue “strategic communication” by the two leaders provided an “important foundation for the development of our bilateral relations”.', 'On Tuesday, the Chinese Foreign Ministry had responded cautiously to Indian air strikes across the Line of Control (LoC) — criticising New Delhi for taking unilateral action, but also urging both India and Pakistan to improve their ties.', 'Asked to comment on India’s assertion that it had targeted terrorist camps and not Pakistani military sites, Chinese Foreign Ministry spokesperson, Lu Kang, said New Delhi should have avoided unilateral action, and instead dealt with the situation through “international cooperation”.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.', 'A 5-judge constitution bench headed by CJI says that even if one per cent chance of mediation exists in the politically sensitive land dispute matter, it should be done.']


Smaller mechanised boat owners on strike
['Owners and workers of mechanised boats with engines below 150 horse power staged a protest on Monday seeking withdrawal of permission for boats up to 240 HP to operate within 20 nautical miles.', 'Around 250 boats in Chennai, Tiruvallur and Kancheepuram districts have been on strike for over two weeks now.', 'Arasu of the Chennai Chengai Singaravelar Visai Padagu Meenavar Sangam said that these boats did bottom trawling beyond 5 nautical miles and that if boats with above 200 HP engines were allowed, they would push boats with smaller engines closer to the coast. “Those with higher engine capacity would pull everything they can from the bottom. Already, there is a reduction in fish catch. We are also concerned about the country craft that number around 30,000 in these areas,” he said.', 'The stand-off has been on for over a year now, with similar protests organised at Kasimedu against granting permissions for mechanised craft up to 24 metre length and engines of 240 HP. “Such boats could be permitted to go deep sea fishing and not allowed to fish near the coast,” Mr. Arasu said.', 'The Chennai Visai Padagu Meenavar Nala Sangam, the association of owners of boats with larger horse power, said that they only ventured into the deep sea for fishing. K. Kapilan, president of the sangam, said that there was an agreement between the two associations that the bigger boats will not fish near the coast.', 'However, the smaller mechanised boat association office-bearers said that the agreement had been flouted many times.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Special trains to clear summer rush
['To clear the extra rush of passengers during the summer, the Southern Railway will operate special trains between Ernakulam, Kochuveli and Hyderabad.', 'According to a release, Train No.07118 Ernakulam– Hyderabad Special fare special train will leave Ernakulam Jn at 9.30 p.m on Thursadys between May 2 and June 27 and the train will reach Hyderabad at 10.55 p.m the next day.', 'The train would stop at Aluva, Thrissur, Ottapalam, Palghat, Coimbatore, Tirupur, Erode, Salem, Jolarpettai, Katpadi, Chittore, Tirupaty, Renigunta, Gudur, Nellore, Ongole, Tenali, Guntur, Piduguralla, Nalgonda and Secunderabad.', 'Train No.07116 Kochuveli– Hyderabad Special fare special train will leave Kochuveli at 07.45 a.m on Mondays between May 6 and July 1 and reach Hyderabad at 2 p.m the next day.', 'The train will stop at Kollam, Kayankulam, Chengannur, Tiruvalla, Kottayam, Ernakulam Town, Aluva, Thrissur, Ottapalam, Palghat, Coimbatore, Tirupur, Erode, Salem, Jolarpettai, Vaniyambadi, Katpadi, Chittore, Tirupaty, Renigunta, Gudur, Nellore, Ongole, Tenali, Guntur, Piduguralla, Nalgonda and Secunderabad. Advance reservations for the trains have begun.', 'The Railway board has approved additional stop for Train no. 16733/16734 Rameshwaram-Okha express at Rasipuram for a period of six months between February 28 and August 31 on an experimental basis.', 'The Southern Railway will be regulating trains in the Jolarpettai-Salem section between February 26 and March 25 due to engineering maintenance works in Kagankarai- Samalpatti station, said a release.', 'According to a statement from Salem railway division, on Sundays, Train No. 07115 Hyderabad- Kochuveli Express will be regulated for 30 minutes at Jolarpettai. On Mondays, Train No. 16339 Mumbai Central to Nagercoil Express will be regulated for 10 minutes at Tirupattur. On Tuesdays, Train No. 22815 Bilaspur to Ernakulam express will be regulated for 60 minutes at Jolarpettai.', 'On Wednesdays, Train No. 22619 Bilaspur to Tirunelveli express will be regulated for 90 minutes at Jolarpettai, Train No. 12970 Jaipur- Coimbatore express will be regulated for 50 minutes at Jolarpettai, Train No. 16360 Patna- Ernakulam express will be regulated for 35 minutes at Jolarpettai, Train No. 16339 Mumbai Central to Nagercoil express will be regulated for 20 minutes at Tirupattur.', 'On Fridays, Train No. 16339 Mumbai Central to Nagercoil express will be regulated for 10 minutes at Tirupattur.', 'The Southern Railway cancelled the services of Vridhachalam to Salem passenger train on Tuesday due to technical reasons.', 'A release from the Railway said that services of train no. 76847 Vridhachallam to Salem DEMU passenger was partially cancelled between Mukahasaparur to Salem and train no. 76850 Salem to Vridhachallam DEMU passenger was fully cancelled due to mechanical failure in the engine.', 'The railway has also rescheduled Train No. 66607 Coimbatore- Palakkad Town MEMU passenger due to engineering work between Somanur- Sulur road station.', 'According to a release, the train has been scheduled to start 25 minutes later, at 6. 10 p.m between Februrary 28 and April 15 due to engineering works.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Rupee recovers 6 paise against USD in early trade
['The rupee strengthened by 6 paise to 71.01 against the US dollar in early trade on Wednesday at the interbank forex market on some selling of the greenback by exporters and banks amid sustained foreign fund inflows.', 'A positive opening for the stock markets also boosted the domestic currency, dealers said. On Tuesday, the rupee snapped its gains of previous two sessions and closed 10 paise lower at 71.07 to the U.S. dollar amid fears of escalation in geopolitical tensions following Indian fighter jets’ air strike on a Pakistan-based terror camp.', 'Foreign institutional investors (FIIs) bought shares worth ₹1,674.17 crore on Tuesday, as per provisional data. In global trade, the US dollar fell to a three-week low after Federal Reserve chairman reinforced the US central bank’s recent shift toward a more “patient” approach on policy in the face of slowing economy.', 'Meanwhile, the benchmark BSE Sensex rose 218.81 points, or 0.61%, to 36,192.52 points in early trade.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


DMK requests Congress to give up a seat for DMDK
['Pushing for pact: A DMK leader said there was progress in talks after M.K.Stalin called on Vijayakant last week.', 'The DMK has requested its primary ally, the Congress, to give up a Lok Sabha seat from its quota of 10 in case the DMDK, led by actor Vijayakant, agrees to join the alliance for the Lok Sabha election.', 'The ruling AIADMK has been holding talks with the DMDK for the past few days without success.', 'The TNCC leader explained that the Congress might not be in a position to give up a seat since the high command was of the opinion that the seats allotted to it were not adequate. “We have too many contestants for the nine seats in Tamil Nadu [besides the lone Puducherry seat],” he said.', 'Asked how many seats the actor-turned-politician demanded from the DMK-Congress alliance, he said the Congress leadership was totally in the dark about the dealings. Its leaders were too busy to pay attention to Tamil Nadu for now. “P. Chidambaram is busy with the election manifesto and Rahul Gandhi is visiting Gujarat, along with K.C. Venugopal. Mukul Wasnik and Ahmed Patel are making preparations for the working committee meeting in Gujarat,” he said.', 'Meanwhile, the DMK allotted one seat to the Kongunadu Makkal Desiya Katchi, headed by R Easwaran. It will contest on the DMK’s ‘Rising Sun’ symbol.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Pulwama, air strikes won’t help BJP win elections: Mutharasan
['The Bharatiya Janata Party (BJP) will not be able to win the Lok Sabha elections even if it tries to take political advantage of the attack on CRPF personnel at Pulwama and the subsequent air strikes on “terror camps”, Communist Party of India State Secretary R. Mutharasan told mediapersons here on Tuesday.', 'The attack on the CRPF personnel that claimed 40 lives should be condemned. However, if there is a war, there would be huge loss on both sides and the people would not accept it, he said, adding that whoever tried to use the attacks for political gain would be committing a “crime”.', 'On alliance talks with DMK, Mr. Mutharasan said the first round of talks went off well. “We have given a list of constituencies of our choice”.', 'The CPI would support all the Congress candidates in the State. For the last two years, nine parties in the State, including the CPI and MDMK, had stood together in fighting for issues of the people. So it was not an opportunistic alliance. There was transparency in the alliance talks too. But, the AIADMK aligning with the BJP and PMK was shrouded in mystery, he claimed.', 'Mr. Mutharasan charged that the BJP had forced the AIADMK into an alliance. Though there was an elected government at the State, the Centre was operating directly through the Governor, he alleged.', 'He sought action to trace social activist Mugilan, who had gone missing.', 'A conference to be organised by the CPI here on Wednesday would see the participation of Opposition leaders in the State. A politically significant resolution will also be passed on this occasion, the CPI leader added.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


TN Govt. urged to file review petition against SC order on evicting tribals
['The Centre should immediately pass an ordinance to counter the Supreme Court order that would see the eviction of over one million tribals from their traditional forests. The Tamil Nadu Government should file a review petition against the Supreme Court order, said P. Shanmugam, general secretary of Tamil Nadu Vivasayigal Sangam here on Tuesday.', 'Addressing the media here, Mr. Shanmugam said the order was a violation of the constitutional rights of tribals and others non-tribal communities dependent on the forests.', 'The Supreme Court, on February 13, ordered the States to evict tribals and other forest dwellers whose claims to forest lands were rejected under the Forest Rights Act. However, this order had been widely criticised by activists, who have pointed to the faults in the processing of the claims, and the failure of the appeals systems for rejected claims.', 'According to Mr. Shanmugam, the BJP Government at the Centre has overseen vast dispossession of lands of farmers during its tenure. Farm lands in the Delta and elsewhere were being lost to State led dispossession for the hydrocarbon project, 8 lane and 4 –lane highway projects and for high tension power line project. The coming elections will witness the demands of the farmers taking the foreground, Mr.Shanmugam said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Videographers allege discrepancies in tender allocation
['Videographers staging a protest at the Salem District Collectorate on Tuesday.', 'Members of the Salem district all Videographers’ Welfare Association staged a protest on the Collectorate premises on Tuesday alleging irregularities in the tender allocation for videography for the parliamentary elections.', 'The protesters alleged that the district administration was acting in favour of a few individuals and tender was allocated to only a particular individual during every elections. They also alleged that the administration was hand in glove with those individuals.', 'The tender for videography for the elections was opened on February 19 and applications were received until February 25..', 'Secretary of Salem District All Videographers’ Welfare Asssociation Jagadeesh said that the tender allocation process was not held in transparent manner in Salem district and this had been happening for the past several elections. While all other districts have announced the winning bidder for the tender, Salem had not announced it yet and officials here just examined the technical bid details.', 'The protesters also alleged that a meeting was held with a selected few videographers at the District Collectorate. “There are three bidders here but two of the bidders weren’t informed about the meeting at the Collectorate. Officials here have conducted a meeting with videographers of just one bidder and others were kept in the dark,” alleged Mr. Jagadeesh.', 'He added that during every elections, in Salem alone, the winning bidder was announced only after three or four days after the tender is closed.', 'But, officials denied the charges. A senior official said: “We haven’t decided the winning bidder yet. It was just an informal meeting. The bidding process is done in a transparent manner. The bidder will be announced shortly.”in the upcoming days,” said the official.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Read books for stress relief: Collector
['District Collector Rohini R. Bhajibhakare receiving a set of books from a donor as part of the Read Salem programme under The Hindu Read and Rise initiative on Tuesday.', 'Read and Rise initiative.', 'District Collector Rohini R. Bhajibhakare distributed the collection to Principals of the 100 schools at a function held at Government Girls Higher Secondary School at Kottai here on Tuesday.', 'Launching the programme, Ms. Rohini requested all school principals to allocate a stipulated time in their schools to read extra-curricular books. “We have set up a library within the District Collectorate and I have advised staff from over 80 departments in the Collectorate to spend some time reading extra-curricular at the library. This would help them to relieve their work stress and feel relaxed,” she said.', 'Chief Educational Officer T. Ganesha Moorthy, T. Sundareshan, Chief Education Officer, Senthil Public School, Dr. S Ashok, Managing Director, Saravana hospital and R. Dinesh, Director, Jairam Arts and Science College were also present.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Agriculture, ancillary activities get major share in annual credit plan
['The Annual Credit Plan for the district for 2019-20 envisaged a total outlay of ₹ 10,911 crore with agriculture and ancillary activities getting major share.', 'Collector C. Kathiravan released the Plan and the first copy was received by S. Paulraj, Deputy General Manager, Canara Bank, Erode Region.', 'The plan was prepared by the District lead Bank, Canara Bank, and has been prepared based on the Potential Linked Credit Plan 2019-2020 prepared by NABARD.', 'M. Chandrasekaran, Lead District Manager, Erode District, said that agriculture and ancillary activities were allotted ₹ 5,519 crore, Micro Small and Medium Enterprises get ₹ 3,031 crore and other priority sector given ₹2,361 crore.', 'He said that the Plan has been prepared by taking into account the following aspects, Potential Linked Credit Plan prepared by NABARD, new priority sector guidelines duly incorporating, social infrastructure, renewable energy, agro processing, backward and forward linkages and other infrastructure facilities available in the district, and performance of banks under District Credit Plan 2018-19.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Fireworks units resume work
['Majority of 1,070 fireworks units in Virudhunagar district reopened on Tuesday after over 100 days of closure.', 'However, the court did not hear the case today,” said Tamil Nadu Fireworks and Amorces Manufacturers Association president A. Asaithambi.', 'Manufacturers affiliated to various associations, including TANFAMA and the Indian Fireworks Manufacturers Association (TIFMA), opted for an indefinite closure of the units on November 12 as the Supreme Court ordered making of green crackers only.', 'They said that joined crackers and other fireworks products that were made using Barium Nitrate formed a majority of the production. With no clarity on what is green crackers, they cannot carry out production.', 'Besides, both the Petroleum and Explosives Safety Organisation and District Revenue Officer, who are authorities to issue licences, had warned against violating court order.', 'Though the district administration asked the industry to make crackers that were not banned, the industry refused expressing apprehension of action.', 'Only 10% to 20% of workers could be engaged as the number of goods to be manufactured was reduced to a few like single cracker, bombs, red-light emitting flower pots and caps and rolls.', 'Initially, the units can only take up maintenance like cleaning the premises and clearing the wild growth before taking up the actual production.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


‘Release fishermen and boats’
['A day after the Sri Lankan Navy arrested nine country boat fishermen along with their two country boats on the charge of trespassing into their water, boat owners, accompanied by fishermen from Nambuthalai hamlet met the Collector here on Wednesday.', 'Led by the village leader Arumugam, they urged Collector K. Veera Raghava Rao to secure the release of fishermen and boats.', 'They were fishing in the ‘traditional fishing area’ well within the Indian water when the Lankan Navy arrested them.', 'The country boat fishermen, using the marine friendly ‘vazhi valai’ had been fishing in the area for several years and it was high time the State and Central governments protected their livelihood, they said.', 'The Lankan Navy, which had been stating that they arrested mechanised boat fishermen for using ‘destructive’ trawling fishing method, has started arresting harmless country boat fishermen, they said and urged the authorities to take up the matter with the Lankan authorities and put an end to the harassment.', 'In his petition, a boat owner K Ramakrishnan said five fishermen had set out for fishing from Embavayal in Pudukottai district on Monday when the Lankan Navy arrested them, the next day.', 'In its website, the Lankan Navy said that the fishermen were fishing in north-west of Delft island. They were handed over to Fisheries department officials for onward action, it said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Vote for the right candidate, students told
['Krishna Collector Md. Imtiaz taking part in the SVEEP programme, in Vijayawada on Tuesday.', 'Collector Md. Imtiyaz has appealed to the youth to vote for the right candidate in the coming general elections to ensure development of their areas, State and the country.', 'Participating in the SVEEP, a programme aimed at enlightening public on the voting system at Tummalapalli Kalakshetram on Tuesday, Mr. Imtiyaz said vote is a weapon to protect democracy, prevent corruption and called upon the students to to use their voting rights.', 'Hailing the good work done by former Election Commissioner T.N. Seshan, the Collector asked the voters not to yield to any kind of pressures and lure of money and choose ‘right representatives’ to the Assembly and Parliament.', 'Joint Collector Kritika Shukla, Sub-Collector Misha Singh, S.R.R and C.V.R. Degree College principal Velaga Joshi, students of Krishna University, Machilipatnam, and other institutions participated in the programme.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Vigil stepped up to check deer hunting
['Proactive approach: Informers to track the movement of groups that target deer.', 'The Forest department has stepped up vigil in the 9000-hectare Kondapalli Reserve Forest (KRF) to prevent poaching of Spotted deer and Sambar deer (Philippine Deer) during the summer.', 'A five-member wildlife task force team led by a Range Officer has been constituted, apart from roping in local communities as ‘informers’ to keep an eye on those believed to be actively involved in poaching the wildlife.', 'Kondapalli, G.Konduru, A.Konduru and Adavinakkala blocks in the reserve forest have been identified as ‘vulnerable’ and poaching of the deer has been recorded in these blocks since 2015. In summer, the deer tend to come out from the forest in search of water, falling prey to poachers.', 'Poachers earlier continued the hunting under the guise of ‘dog attack’, diverting the attention of the forest officials from active poaching.', 'The likely areas to be visited by the deer in the summer have already been brought under the Forest department’s watch.', 'The Forest department has identified natural water bodies in the forest to fill them for the widllife.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Plea for ‘mercy killing’
['A transwoman, who is being reportedly tortured and threatened by his family members, has urged the Collector to give his consent for ‘mercy killing’.', 'In a petition submitted to the Collector Prashant M. Wadnere recently, A. Oviya Mary, 34, an undergraduate from Kovalam near Kanniyakumari, said she joined a group of transgender living in Tiruchi 13 years ago when she was doing her graduation. Though she obtained her undergraduate degree in statistics, her repeated attempts to get a job failed as none was prepared to employ her.', 'After spending a few years in New Delhi and Bengaluru, Oviya came to Tiruchi where she lived under the care of two transwomen. When one of the transwomen, Kajol, adopted Oviya, she earned the wrath of Kajol’s sisters, whose “threat” forced her leave Tiruchi to settle down at Kanniyakumari along with another group of transwomen.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Mixed reaction to new bus route in Virudhunagar
['A bus passing through Main Bazaar Road in Virudhunagar on Tuesday.', 'The district administration’s move to operate town buses of select routes through Main Bazaar Road near Mariamman Temple has drawn mixed reaction from the residents.', 'While road users have welcomed it, traders who have set up their shops along this stretch claim that the bus operation has affected their business activities.', 'Following complaints of encroachment of the road by shopkeepers, the district administration permitted buses bound for Sattur, Kariyapatti and Aruppukottai to ply from Old Bus Stand through Main Bazaar, Teppakulam West Street, Municipal Office Road to reach Karumathimadam from February 9.', 'Previously, buses were going through Pavali Road, T.T.K Road, Sivakasi Road to reach Karumathimadam. The new route is a short-cut road that cuts down the distance between Old Bus Stand and Karumathimadam by at least one km.', 'Besides, ensuring that Main Bazaar Road is free from encroachment, the move has decongested the other road through which buses were plying earlier. “By making Bazaar Main Road one-way, there is no traffic congestion on this road,” S. Haribasakaran, 42, a resident, said.', 'But traders said that they were not able to carry out their usual business. Vehicles are not being allowed to park on the road for loading or unloading of goods. Besides, the space on the road is available to park only two-wheelers affecting their business.', 'S. Masilamani, an advocate, said that this stretch between Mariamman temple and Teppakulam was part of the National Highway 7 and under large-scale encroachment. “Buses used to ply through this road three decades back. Only after we started complaining about encroachments, the district administration operated buses on one-way to avoid evicting major encroachments. If it is properly evicted, buses can be operated on both ways,” he said.', 'However, Virudhunagar Tahsildar, T. Seenivasan, said there were no permanent encroachments on this stretch as per records.', 'Former municipal councillor S. Kamatchi said the municipal council proposed to shift vegetable shops near municipal office building some 15 years but traders refused it.', 'A.G. Selvakumar, a trader on Main Bazaar Road, said the move is an attempt to shift the shops from here to elsewhere. “Let the government set up another bazaar anywhere but it should not disturb traders who are here for decades,” he said.', 'The traders have made a representation to Minister for Dairy Development K.T. Rajenthra Bhalaji.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


‘Increase age limit of child workers’
['The People’s Action for Development has urged the authorities to raise the age under the Child Labour (Prohibition and Regulation) Act, and for free and compulsory education to 18 years, from 14 years.', 'During an interaction at Vembar with girls, who have been involved in child labour, on Tuesday, its founder and executive director Rajendra Prasad said that companies were exploiting the age bar of 14 years. “Age of adolescent children involved in child labour is forged. The age should be ascertained using proper documentation like birth certificate or using services of a government dentist,” he said.', 'A number of girls, who have been involved in child and exploitative labour at textile mills, fish processing units, among others, shared their experience.', 'After being taken to textile mills, the children are made to perform hard labour up to 12 hours a day and given a pay of ₹300 a day, as opposed to an adult who usually gets ₹700 a day. “Everything happens in an informal manner and no social security benefit is given,” said Mr. Rajendra Prasad adding that the Apprentices Act was being exploited.', 'According to data from the Department of Labour and Employment in 2007, 38,461 adolescent girls are employed in 406 cotton mills while studies from NGOs and international organisations put the number anywhere between 2,00,000 and 4,00,000. Often, the girls suffer from health complications.', 'After leaving the labour, the girls have tried to be agents of change by ensuring other children do not end up in child labour through a programme launched by the NGO.', 'Mr. Rajendra Prasad said an education fund of ₹42 lakh is available for 51 villages with which girls can pursue higher education.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Plea for continuation of no-detention policy
['The State Platform for Common School System Tamil Nadu (SPCSS-TN) has submitted a memorandum to the Principal Secretary of the School Education Department requesting continuation of the no-detention policy.', 'In their memorandum, they asked the government to direct education officials to withdraw circulars they had issued to schools on the conduct of public exams for Classes 5 and 8.', 'The SPCSS-TN requested the Secretary to direct self-finance schools not to collect any money for the conduct of these examinations. “A clarification should be issued that there will be no public exams for Classes 5 and 8 and that no child will be detained till the completion of the elementary education this year or in the future as per current provisions,” the memorandum stated.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Quiz champions are avid readers of The Hindu
['Excise Commissioner Rishiraj Singh with The Hindu Young World Quiz winners Anirudh P. and Devika P. (juniors) of Saraswathi Vidyalaya, Thiruvananthapuram, and Hrishikesh M.K. and Neeraj S. (seniors) of Lake Ford School, Kollam.', 'Hrishikesh M.K. and Neeraj S., students of Lake Ford School, Kollam, who emerged winners in the senior category, called it ‘a truly inspiring event’.', 'In the junior category, twins Anirudh P. and Devika P. of Saraswathi Vidyalaya, Thiruvananthapuram, who walked away with the first prize, are avid quizzers.', 'The Class VI students say both of them are competitive, though Devika feels she likes quizzing more than her brother.', 'The twins are voracious readers, but have different tastes.', 'The duo, who took part in The Hindu Young World Quiz last year but could not make it past the written preliminary round, came back with a bang this time around to grab the first position.', 'The event, powered by Eveready Industries India Ltd, saw 191 teams registering in the junior category and 167 turning up for the senior category at Hotel Apollo Dimora, the venue of the competition.', 'Math IIT was the regional sponsor, UNIBIC the snack partner and Arrow Publications Pvt. Ltd. the knowledge partner of the event.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


‘Posting of PG doctors must be as per norms’
['The Doctors Association for Social Equality (DASE) has urged the State government to stop posting post-graduate doctors for duties not prescribed by the Medical Council of India (MCI).', 'The post-graduates of the Institute of Anaesthesiology and Critical Care of Madras Medical College have written to the institute’s director, expressing their unwillingness to take up VIP duty outside the campus.', 'G.R. Ravindranath, general secretary of DASE, in a statement on Tuesday, said MCI had laid down norms for training house surgeons and postgraduates. But these postgraduates were posted on duty to take care of a mother of an IAS official attached to Raj Bhavan.', 'Calling this as being against MCI norms, he claimed there were complaints that post-graduates were being ill-treated during the duty.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Youth arrested on extortion charge
['The Saravanampatty police have arrested Karan alias J. Karan Kumar (21) of Ganapathy on the charge of attempting to extort money from Saravanampatty resident P. Arthiraja near Sivanandapuram Bus Stop on Monday. The police said that around 9 a.m. when Arthiraja, a taxi operator, was chatting with his friends, Karan went there and demanded money. When they refused to give, he threatened them by wielding a knife. After taking the money, he fled the place, the police said and added that based on a complaint, they registered a case and arrested Karan.', 'S. Kunal (18), a first year engineering student, died on Monday afternoon to injuries he had sustained while attempting suicide at his hostel room in Athipalayam on Wednesday last. The Kovilpalayam police said he resorted to extreme step after the college administration asked him to furnish leave letter for the additional two days he had absented himself from the class. He had availed of leave only for two days. After he sustained injuries, Kunal was rushed to the Coimbatore Medical College Hospital, where he died. Those with suicidal tendencies may dial helpline (Sneha) on 044-24640050 for help.', 'The Pollachi East Police have arrested three persons on the charge of assaulting the brother of a girl, who lodged a complaint against a group of persons for sexually assaulting her and threatening her with video clippings of the assault. The police arrested Senthil (22) of Chinnampalayam, Babu (26) of Pollachi, and Vasanthkumar (20) of Achipatti.', 'The victim lodged a complaint with the police, who had arrested Sabari Rajan (25) and his friends Sathish (28) of Suleeswaranpatti and Vasanthkumar 924) and are on the lookout for Thirunavukkarasu.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Prosthetics, mobility aids given to people with disabilities
['Differently-abled beneficiaries receiving aids at a function in Coonoor.', 'More than 31 people with disabilities in the Coonoor and Kotagiri areas were fitted with prosthetic limbs and other mobility aids at a specially organised event by the Kinder Trust in Coonoor recently.', 'Diana Barucha, managing trustee of Kinder Trust, said that 60 people with disabilities had wanted prosthetic limbs and mobility aids, and were measured for the same last month, of whom 31 people attended the event. “Children as young as 4-years-old up to adults and seniors to the age of 80 had approached us seeking prosthetics and mobility aids,” said Ms. Barucha.', 'Technical assistance to fit the aids was given by Freedom Trust, while the cost of the mobility aids and prosthetics were borne by the Corporate Social Responsibility initiative of Dymos Lear, a private firm here.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Asian shares higher as region eyes Trump-Kim summit
["A man looks at an electronic stock board showing Japan's Nikkei 225 index at a securities firm in Tokyo. File photo.", 'Asian shares were higher in muted trading on Wednesday as investors watched the second summit between President Donald Trump and North Korean leader Kim Jong Un in Vietnam.', 'Japan’s benchmark Nikkei 225 added 0.5% in early trading to 21,550.02. Australia’s S&P/ASX 200 gained 0.3% to 6,148.70. South Korea’s Kospi edged up nearly 0.2% to 2,230.37.', 'Hong Kong’s Hang Seng added 0.5% to 28,909.38, while the Shanghai Composite index gained 0.9% to 2,966.84.', 'Mr. Kim and Mr. Trump both arrived in Hanoi on Tuesday and their Hanoi meetings get underway later in the day on Wednesday.', 'The two leaders first met last June in Singapore, a summit that was long on historic pageantry but short in any enforceable agreements for North Korea to give up its nuclear arsenal.', 'Mr. Trump and Mr. Kim are to have a private dinner on Wednesday evening and discussions on Thursday, in hopes of building on an aspirational agreement they made in Singapore.', 'U.S. stock indexes capped a day of wobbly trading with slight losses on Tuesday, erasing some of their modest gains from a day earlier.', 'The market changed course several times during the day as investors balanced conflicting US economic data and testimony from Federal Reserve Chairman Jerome Powell.', 'The Fed chief told Congress that the US economy should keep expanding at a solid, though somewhat slower pace this year, and reassured markets that the central bank would be “patient” in raising interest rates.', 'Those comments, which indicate steady policy ahead, cheered sentiments among Asian markets.', 'The S&P 500 dropped 2.21 points, or 0.1%, to 2,793.90. The benchmark index, which has finished higher the past four weeks in a row, broke a two-day winning streak.', 'The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 33.97 points, or 0.1%, to 26,057.98.', 'The Nasdaq composite slid 5.16 points, or 0.1%, to 7,549.30.', 'The Russell 2000 index of smaller companies gave up 11.32 points, or 0.7%, to 1,577.48. Major European indexes finished mostly higher.', 'U.S. benchmark crude added 52 cents to $56.02 a barrel.', 'It was essentially flat at U$55.50 a barrel in New York overnight.', 'Brent crude, used to price international oils, 34 cents to $65.70 a barrel in London.', 'The dollar declined to 110.57 yen from 110.86 yen Tuesday. The euro strengthened to $1.1384 from $1.1363.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


‘Concerted approach necessary for doubling farmers’ income’
['To double farmers’ income by 2022-23, a concerted effort by carefully choosing crop varieties, blending traditional wisdom with scientific advancements and going in for strategic production with market orientation is necessary, said Kirti Singh, Fellow, National Academy of Agricultural Sciences, at the 39th convocation of Tamil Nadu Agricultural University here on Tuesday.', 'Though technologies developed by the Indian Council for Agricultural Research and State agriculture universities had helped the country achieve self sufficiency in food production, the rate of adoption of technology by farmers had to be improved to keep the momentum going.', 'Advances in biotechnology, precision farming, better water resource management and improved post-harvest management were needed to take the country to the next level in agriculture and meet the target of doubling farmers’ income.', 'Horticulture crop production had surpassed food grain production and would touch 314 million tonnes in the current year.', 'But the availability and distribution were limited due to improper handling during post-harvest management, he said and pointed out that the wastage was around 22%.', 'Calling for greater attention to food processing, Mr. Singh also said that only 2% of vegetable produced and 4% of fruits produced were processed.', 'In his welcome address, TNAU Vice-Chancellor N. Kumar said the University was a forerunner in using innovative technologies. It had 14 college campuses and 39 research stations spread over seven agro-climatic zones.', 'The University offered 21 certificate, four masters degree programme and five diploma courses through the directorate of distance eduction.', 'Tamil Nadu Governor Banwarilal Purohit conferred Doctor of Philosophy certificates on 70 candidates, and presented prizes and medals to 33 candidates for their meritorious academic performance.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Action sought against bike taxi operators
['Members of the Coimbatore District Call Taxi Owners and Drivers Association on Tuesday urged the officials at the Regional Transport Office to take action against bike taxi operators for using own board vehicles for transport purposes.', 'The members used the app to hire bike taxis and brought 40 two-wheelers to the RTO.', 'Association secretary Jamsheer said marketing, food delivery executives and students used their two-wheelers as taxis to earn money. These vehicles are given registration certificates for low road tax and insurance premium, contrary to the hefty premiums and tax paid by call taxis.', 'Without any major investment, these part time two-wheeler taxi operators were not only making revenue evading tax, but were also killing the call taxi industry.', 'Mr. Jamsheer said that many of the two-wheeler owners or part-time riders employed by the owners were not aware that the use of two-wheelers for such purpose was illegal.', 'These bike taxi riders neither wore helmet nor offered one for the pillion rider. Many of them did not have even a valid licence, he said.', 'When contacted, Joint Transport Commissioner K.R. Krishnamoorthy said the call taxi association members brought 40 such two-wheeler riders. He said that action could be initiated against the taxi riders or two-wheeler owners, if there was a written complaint.', 'The 40 two-wheelers had been seized and a charge sheet would be filed before the court.', 'Upon the court levying a fine and the owners paying it, steps would be taken to release the two-wheelers. Mr. Krishnamoorthy pointed out that the customers for such services should realise that using bike taxis was not safe. In the event of an accident, even if the two-wheeler had a valid insurance cover, the pillion rider (customer) would not be eligible for any claim, since the usage was illegal as per motor vehicle rules, he added.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Funds disbursed to innovators
['PSG Science and Technology Entrepreneurial Park (PSG STEP) has disbursed ₹33.64 lakh to four innovators under the NIDHI PRAYAS scheme.', 'This is the third round of funding by PSG STEP under the scheme.', 'Each selected innovator got a maximum of ₹10 lakh in three phases over a period of 18 months and they used the infrastructure at STEP to develop their ideas.', 'In the first round (till July 2017), 10 innovators received ₹71 lakh.', 'Of these, except three, the remaining have progressed with their work and have developed commercially viable products.', 'In the second round of funding given in February last year, three innovators received ₹25.76 lakh. This year, four were selected and given ₹33.64 lakh.', 'The next round of funding would be in the next three months and more innovators would be selected for it, he said.', 'The STEP was looking at products and ideas in different areas and sectors, especially bio technology, bio medical, and nano technology.', 'The gestation period for developing products in these areas was high, he pointed out. This year, the selected ideas were in agriculture, leather, bio medicine, and nano technology domains.', 'The National Initiative for Developing and Harnessing Innovations (NIDHI) was a scheme of the Department of Science and Technology to nurture knowledge-based and technology driven ideas and innovation.', 'It had Promoting and Accelerating Young and Aspiring Innovators and Startups (PRAYAS) and Entrepreneurs-in-Residence (EIR) programmes.', 'Under EIR programme, select candidates got ₹30,000 a month for one year as fellowship. So far, six people had received the amount and this year five more were selected for the fellowship, he added.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Startup in Coimbatore to receive funding from local investors
['More than 800 households in Coimbatore city receive fresh milk at their door step every morning from the villages near Annur. The milk has no chemicals or preservatives added and is tested for quality before it is packed. Sold under VilFresh brand, it is the flagship product of Laymen Agro Ventures, a startup based out of Coimbatore.', 'Procuring milk from 30 farmers, the company also provides employment to youngsters in the villages. The youth are given two wheelers and they bring the milk to the city and take agro inputs for farmers on their return trip daily.', 'With plans to reach out to nearly 8,000 households in Coimbatore, strengthen its product portfolio, set up a unit to make value added products, and commence operations in cities such as Tirupur, Madurai, Tiruchi, and Salem, Laymen Agro requires funds to scale up. And the funding will come from a group of investors in the State and a couple of investment firms.', 'Nativelead Coimbatore will bring in ₹65 lakh from angel investors in Tamil Nadu and the rest will come from Upaya Social Ventures and Sangam Ventures, says Sivarajah Ramanathan, Founder and President of Nativelead Foundation.', 'The organisation chose Laymen Agro as it is buying fresh milk from farmers paying a relatively higher price and the model of business can be replicated in other cities.', 'A function will be held here on Wednesday when a new team of office bearers will take charge at Nativelead Coimbatore and the equity investment will be made by the organisation in the startup. Jayaram Govindarajan, who will be chairman of Nativelead Coimbatore for 2019-20, said the team is looking forward to promoting an alternative investment option for native entrepreneurs.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


3 killed, 20 injured in accident
['The bus that crashed onto a tree near Edavanna on Tuesday, killing three people and injuring 20 others.', 'Three persons were killed and 20 others were injured when a bus crashed into a tree after hitting a motorcycle near Edavanna on Tuesday.', 'The victims were identified as Farshad, 18, from Edavanna; Fatima, 67, from Gudalur; and her daughter Subaida, 42. The injured were admitted to different hospitals, including Government Medical College Hospitals in Kozhikode and Manjeri.', 'The driver of the private bus, which was heading towards Vazhikkadavu from Manjeri, lost control while overtaking a lorry and collided with the motorcycle, killing its rider Farshad on the spot. The bus came to a halt after ramming a tree. A school student, Farshad was returning home after taking his examination. The other victims were bus passengers.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


U.S urges Pakistan to take ‘meaningful action’ against terrorist groups operating on its soil
['He said he also spoke to the Minister of External Affairs Sushma Swaraj. “Following Indian counter-terrorism actions on February 26, I spoke with the Indian Minister of External Affairs Sushma Swaraj to emphasise our close security partnership and shared goal of maintaining peace and security in the region,” said Mr. Pompeo.', 'Watch | Indian Air Force strike in Balakot: what next?', 'In his statement, he also urged them to avoid “further military activity”.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.', 'Pilgrims walk and walk in this ancient Ethiopian town ahead of Christmas.']


UGD, a necessity for Anuppanadi
['In Anuppanadi (ward 57), winding lanes, unpaved streets and sewage on roads are a common phenomena.', 'Having lived in Nehru Nagar, for 20 years, S. Perumal and P. Mariamma say that there has been little development since the time the ward was annexed with Madurai Corporation.', 'A stream of untreated sewage flowing all the way from the Tamil Nadu Housing Board unit in Chinthamani through the backs of houses and small lanes, lands up near Mariamma’s house. The sewage stream connects to Panaiyur channel but usually never sees any flow. “This stream is stagnant and stinks. It causes mosquito breeding and spread of diseases,” she says.', 'Back in the late 90s, Ms. Mariamma says that there were only a few houses in the area. With rapid urbanisation, Anuppanadi became extremely crowded. “Since this is an added ward, the Corporation has not provided underground sewage connections. Whenever it rains, sewage from the stream flows right into our houses. It is difficult to live like this,” she says. Mr. Perumal adds that the stench, on some days, is unbearable and causes breathing difficulty.', 'As per Madurai Corporation data, a total of 38 streets have UGD connections for a total of 6.14 km. Many areas are, however, still uncovered.', 'K. Ramalakshmi, another resident, says that the nearby panchayat also supplies water to Nehru Nagar but it is not fit for drinking. For them, the nearest water tap provided by Madurai Corporation is half-a-kilometre away. Garbage collectors come only once in three days to clear the waste. Until then, the piles wait, gathering dust, causing diseases, she says.', 'The sight of these garbage piles is not uncommon in Anuppanadi. Areas near Chinthamani Main Road, Susai Michael Street and Mela Theru all have layers of uncleared waste.', 'In Mela Theru, cleaners usually do not clear the garbage at the beginning of the street, says D. Jyothi. A large dustbin is located in front of a locked toilet here. People throw garbage on the streets if the dustbin is full and also use this space as an open toilet.', 'Ms. Jyothi adds that the road in Ganga Nagar, the area where she resides, remains unfinished. “The Corporation is yet to coat bitumen on the road, where preliminary work is complete. People have been skidding and falling for at least two months since the work began. If they complete it quickly, we can avoid accidents,” she says. The ward has a total of 6 Integrated Child Development Scheme centres and one Corporation school. A senior engineer in Madurai Corporation said the local body had readied proposals to provide underground drainage facility to all added wards. He claimed that water supply was available in all households.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Tense situation in Kodaikanal
['Uneasy calm and slogan shouting continued in and around the municipal office here on Tuesday for the second day.', 'When municipal officials inspected some buildings last week, there was tension in many parts of the hill station. They submitted in the High Court Bench that a over 1,415 buildings were built either without proper approval or with deviations thus violating norms. So, the court directed them to seal such unauthorised structures and officials were carrying out the order.', 'Commissioner Murugesan, who has been heading a team of officials, told reporters that they would lock and seal 258 buildings in a week. They sealed 49 buildings last week and power supply was cut. When six persons approached the HC seeking relief, the court gave exemptions to some buildings only like schools and hospitals.', 'He clarified that they would go ahead with the drive against commercial buildings including hotels and wayside restaurants which had no permission from any agency.', 'Another official said that two town planning officers and four town planning inspectors from other district had been deployed on special duty to execute the task. Four teams were provided with adequate police personnel. “In all probabilities, the work would be completed in a week,” Mr. Murugesan said. The police had a tough time in controlling protesters when officials went to seal a hotel near bus stand. “Show us the court order and demolish,” they said and objected to the drive for a while. When the police said that they would be arrested, the crowd dispersed.', 'Officials clarified that names and addresses of 258 illegal buildings have been displayed for the public to view. Activists and NGOs from various organisations welcomed the HC directive and appealed to the public not to encourage officials to indulge in corrupt practices. “Those officials, responsible for according approval to construct illegal structures, should also be taken to task,” they said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Ryots vent ire over disbursement of relief
['Farmers under the banner of Cauvery Farmers’ Protection Association staging a demonstration in front of the office of Joint Registrar of Cooperatives in Thanjavur on Tuesday.', 'Members of Cauvery Farmers’ Protection Association on Tuesday alleged delay in disbursement of compensation under the crop insurance scheme.', 'They staged a sit-in protest near the Office of the Joint Registrar of Co-operatives and courted arrest after they were prevented from entering the office premises located on Medical College Road.', 'The farmers, led by district secretary Sundara Vimalanathan, raised slogans condemning the Central and State governments for not implementing the crop insurance scheme properly.', 'They said the insurance company released the compensation amount for samba and thaladi crops in 2016-17 and for kuruvai, samba and thaladi crops in 2017-18 to the Department of Cooperation belatedly. Adding to the woes of farmers, who had taken crop insurance through societies, the Department of Cooperation bungled in the distribution of the benefit.', 'A majority of the ryots, who had taken crop insurance and suffered crop loss, were yet to receive compensation. In some cases, a meagre amount was disbursed, the demonstrators alleged.', 'According to Govindaraj, a farmer of Manangorai, the discrepancies in disbursement of compensation or the disputable manner in which disbursement being made could be averted only if the crop loss was calculated based on the survey numbers for which the crop insurance was availed.', 'Taking crop cutting samples in 10 or 12 places in a village or area and calculating the crop loss percentage would always create problems, he pointed out.', 'All the arrested farmers were later released in the evening, police said.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Bengal teen''s family 'concerned about safety'': Bihar team
[]


HC advocates help AAP membership swell, 15,000 join in Kolkata so far
[]


BJP launches portal for Modi rally registration
[]


Trade unions demand wage hike for workers in tea gardens
[]


Buddha corners Didi over crime against women, development
[]


Narendra Modi a monster, Trinamool has pact with him: Buddha
[]


TMC welcomes Ganguly  resignation, Somnath 'hurt'
[]


Mamata visits Amlashol, first by a CM in 10 years
[]


Parents at Pranab door, Oppn hits the road in city
[]


Gangrape victim inaugurates Nandigram Shaeed Minar
[]


Left Front cries 'war' to end TMC's 'honeymoon period'
[]


Pay Rs 100 to attend Modi's Kolkata rally
[]


Ganguly quits, says grounds for his removal 'untenable'
[]


Commuters bear the brunt of bus strike, govt unmoved on fare hike
[]


Trinamool to recruit 2 IIM interns ahead of LS polls
[]


Centre announces new hospitals, infra upgrade for several others
[]


Only responded to people''s 'sentiments'',  did not interfere in gangrape probe: Nitish
[]


Gangrape victim''s father moves HC for CBI probe
[]


Suchitra Sen partially responds to treatment, meets Mamata
[]


Ganguly mulls quitting as WBHRC chief
[]


TMC slams Oppn for 'demeaning'' Bengal
[]


State Cong passes resolution for Rahul as PM candidate
[]


Vigil stepped up on Indo-Bangla border
[]


Kejriwal sent invite for  IIT-Kharagpur alumni meet
[]


Rape victim''s family to meet President, demand CBI probe
[]


Women''s bodies doubt 'whether family will get justice at all''
[]


Sushil Modi seeks speedy trial 'with due sensitivity''
[]


Inquiry likely against cops
[]


Satyamev Jayate member interviews victim''s family
[]


After Rs 1-lakh ex-gratia, Nitish offers to rehabilitate victim''s family
[]


Chief Secy, cops draw AIDWA flak
[]


Govt says cooperated with victim''s kin, decries politics over dead body
[]


'Juvenile'' among 6 held for rape, 2 others face murder charge
[]


6 Kolkata tourists die in Nepal road mishap
[]


Bengal teen gangraped twice, hounded, and finally set on fire
[]


Cabinet to decide on presidential reference today
[]


It''s CITU vs TMC as Kolkata protests against death of gangrape victim
[]


Woman PDS shop owner killed in Orissa
[]


Union home secy reviews security on Indo-Bangla border
[]


Pvt bus operators demand fare hike, to go on strike on Jan 6
[]


Cops had inputs KLO platoon was in Jalpaiguri, failed to act
[]


Minor who was gangraped twice dies a week after suicide bid
[]


Jalpaiguri blast: KPP top leader arrested
[]


Mitra refuses bus fare hike, warns autorickshaw drivers
[]


Suchitra Sen stable, says hospital
[]


Netaji family urges Mamata to respond to RTI query
[]


AMRI hospital''s Dhakuria unit  reopens two years after fire
[]


Mamata''s 13  parliamentary secys a drain  on exchequer
[]


No data to prove cycling ban will improve traffic: Police
[]


Suchitra Sen is critical
[]


AAP 'units'' mushroom in Kolkata
[]


Conman dupes hotels, runs up bills in lakhs
[]


Govt to send President reference this week for probe
[]


Jalpaiguri blast: Ex-KLO member held, Sec 144 imposed in district
[]


Jalpaiguri blast toll rises to six
[]


All-weather 1-km roads for gram panchayats
[]


NUJS official held for sexually harassing staff
[]


'Police trying to frame KLO''
[]


CM lays foundation stone of St Xavier''s university campus
[]


NIA collects samples, probe focuses on KLO
[]


After 2,200-yr old lion capital damaged  at National Museum, staff try cover-up
[]


For Modi''s Kolkata rally, online booking of seats, entry fee
[]


Six of family found dead at Birbhum guesthouse; cops say suicide pact
[]


Gurung back as GTA chief
[]


5 killed, 9 injured  in Jalpaiguri blast
[]


Mamata strips Partha of industry portfolio
[]


Mamata ministry reshuffle likely today
[]


Ahead of Gurung swearing-in today, bail to Tamang, other GJM men
[]


Mamata''s dept yet to prepare land bank
[]


Do politicians quit on allegations, asks former Bengal Lokayukta
[]


Monk arrested for sexually abusing minor boys
[]


'Gangrape'' victim sets self on fire, critical
[]


Left approaches commissioner against Sunday attack
[]


Youth in state will remain jobless under Mamata regime: Buddha
[]


Mamata likely to shed some depts in Dec 26 reshuffle
[]


Park Street re-run: Minor girl raped by two inside taxi
[]


CPM protests TMC attack on Left rally
[]


Why Partha got Didi stick: No investment in last 18 months
[]


Ganguly took pvt case, NGO paid for Pak trip: Mamata to Pranab
[]


Royal fallout
[]


'Taslima serial blocked on Mamata command''
[]


Ausgram PS in-charge resigns, leaves sans information
[]


12-yr-old raped, rod pushed through her neck
[]


Bengal hasn''t appointed Lokayukta since 2009
[]


Dealing with domestic violence
[]


Mamata''s FB popularity 2nd  to Modi, Keriwal, Raje
[]


First head rolls  after CM review
[]


Cong attacks TMC on women safety
[]


No CAG report for 2 yrs, govt gets Oppn stick
[]


Failed depts face CM flak, 32% growth gets praise
[]


Oppn lashes out at govt for scrapping Taslima serial
[]


Gurung set to return as GTA chief
[]


Taslima''s TV serial postponed after Muslim bodies protest
[]


Rights body awaits action on threat letter
[]


Minority meet held without CM, minister recount achievements
[]


Asking SC for fresh probe would be travesty of justice: Somnath
[]


Presidential Reference: Ball in AG court to work out legalities
[]


Won''t contest elections: Kabir Suman
[]


HC seeks state reply on seizure of Saradha Group properties
[]


Locks on American Consulate General
[]


High Court lawyers march in Justice Ganguly''s support
[]


10 days later, no arrest in Naren Dey assault case
[]


Didi can make do with 'even 1-yr moratorium'' on loan repayment
[]


300 killed in Bangladesh, political scenario polarised: Dhaka University professor
[]


Panchayat Minister asked to be WB brand ambassador
[]


Cabinet okays homes for sex workers,  their daughters
[]


More Cong, GJM leaders defect  to Trinamool
[]


Taslima moves SC, seeks protection from arrest
[]


Kolkata street food vendors face govt heat
[]


Still in denial mode, the ex-judge digs heels in
[]


Special tram rides mark Tagore''s Nobel prize
[]


Dejected Didi
[]


Presidency jail warden show-caused
[]


TMC to contest all LS, Assembly seats in Haryana
[]


After Delhi, it''s Kolkata''s turn now, says AAP
[]


Post Varun offer, Cong and Left try to hook Ganguly for LS polls
[]


Kolkata: 103-year-old Park Mansions wins heritage award for restoration
[]


Saurav Ganguly offered BJP ticket for 2014, yet to decide: Reports
[]


Varavara: Will move against 'fake encounter'' of Kishenji
[]


Short Street case: Sub-Inspector in police custody till Dec 19
[]


Team led by Muslim cleric to tour country to pitch Didi as PM face
[]


Kunal Ghosh gets bail in first case
[]


Cong leader files plea to cancel Kumar bail
[]


Father loses 13-yr-old daughter in  gambling, to marry her off to winner
[]


I'll do what I''ve decided to do: WBHRC chief
[]


Legal migration from Bangladesh on a high
[]


Delhi: 51-year-old Danish national alleges gangrape, 15 detained for questioning
[]


CBI sought part RTI exemption, Govt gave it full
[]


I wonder if I will be able to ever reunite with my husband, my kids. I miss them: Devyani
[]


Arvind Kejriwal leaves his first Janata Darbar midway due to 'stampede-like' situation
[]


State-of-the-art swanky T2 opens at Mumbai airport
[]


Rewind: Five stings that shook India and stung their targets
[]


JandK Legislative Council summons former Army chief Gen V K Singh
[]


In race for PM, Narendra Modi should have quit as Gujarat CM: Raj Thackeray
[]


Coal block allocations could have been done better: Centre admits in SC
[]


Yeddyurappa formally rejoins BJP
[]


City Side: Kejriwal's sting man and Modi bricks removed
[]


Renowned Urdu critic Waris Alvi passes away after prolonged illness
[]


Divyani arrest: After US court's denial, Khobragade's lawyer 'considers' other options
[]


Express 5: Differences crop up over Devyani's plea bargain offer and BJP readies RSS for LS polls
[]


Khobragade arrest: US Judge denies Devyani's request to extend Jan 13 hearing
[]


THE DECENT GUIDE: Five things Aam Aadmi must keep in mind while conducting sting operation
[]


Narendra Modi a monster, Trinamool has pact with him: Buddha
[]


Stung, Congress says Rahul Gandhi does not need 500 crore image makeover
[]


Tiger kills woman in Maharashtra
[]


AAP's graft helpline number to advise callers on conducting sting, catch corrupt
[]


Ramesh slams 'VIP security', says not needed even for PM, Pres
[]


Top Maoist leader, his wife surrender before Andhra Pradesh police
[]


SFI members clash with police in Thiruvananthapuram
[]


In anticipation of shut down, US Embassy had disabled ACSA website days ago
[]


AAP office vandalised over Bhushan''s Kashmir remark
[]


Khobragade's arrest: India asks US embassy to stop commercial activities from Jan 16
[]


Express 5: Gangrape victim's family fights for justice and BJP workers appease Modi in Chandigarh style
[]


Five instances when Arvind Kejriwal found it tough to keep his word
[]


Smoke after brake jam triggers panic on board Shatabdi
[]


Dehradun Express fire: Nine charred to death; Railways orders inquiry
[]


Indian men smoking less but no change in women: Global study
[]


Mukhtar to contest from Ghosi, wife from Varanasi
[]


EC seeks report on Virbhadra Singh, wife's affidavits
[]


To audit or not to: The power discom dispute in court
[]


Need to probe all acquittals, Supreme Court orders states
[]


Will pursue all remedies on Chopper deal issue: AgustaWestland
[]


Congress plans to tell many of its talking heads to go fight elections
[]


Justice Ganguly confirms: My resignation has been accepted
[]


Lack of clarity on 'early marriage' cause for India not sponsoring UN child marriage resolution: MEA
[]


BJP demands withdrawal of all Muzaffarnagar riot cases
[]


Fundamentalist forces a threat to society: Digvijaya Singh
[]


Justice A K Ganguly quits, but says grounds for his removal 'untenable''
[]


Delhi Police claims that those approached by LeT were not UP riot victims
[]


Ganguly keeps away from his office, suspense over resignation continues
[]


City Side: Anandiben husband backs out from joining AAP and Maharashtra plans mega R-Day show
[]


India test-fires nuclear-capable Prithvi-II missile
[]


Visa fraud case: Devyani seeks extension of deadline for indictment
[]


Thane: Shiv Sena member molests party leader's wife, arrested
[]


AAP cracks the whip: Kejriwal govt transfers 800 Delhi Jal Board officials
[]


Express 5: Lashkar approached UP riot victims while IM planned module in Nepal
[]


IM planned to set up module in Nepal, got support of 'like-minded' to aid terror: Yasin
[]


SC orders government to set up green regulator
[]


One more Hindalco coal block under CBI scrutiny
[]


Odisha runner sprints to Jamaica to be trained by Usain Bolt's coach
[]


SC orders govt to set up green regulator, hand over powers
[]


Drug racket kingpin names Punjab minister of involvement in network
[]


No one hurt in AP chemical factory fire
[]


AAP to contest LS polls in 20 states, may field Kumar Vishwas against Rahul Gandhi
[]


Adarsh Scam: HC bench recuses from hearing Society's plea against MoEF order
[]


Dec 16 gangrape: Centre says juvenile can't be tried twice
[]


Forest issues: SC directs Centre to appoint national regulator
[]


Snooping controversy: Gujarat Police refuse to file FIR against Modi, Shah
[]


Court decline maid's plea for right over employer's assets
[]


Bhushan on Kashmir has AAP scrambling for cover - and a clarification
[]


Goa building crash: Rescue ops halted by weak buildings adjacent to fallen structure
[]


THE DUTCH QUESTION
[]


Dawn in the Afternoon
[]


The Reluctant Designer
[]


SARI VS. STARRY (SAME OLD, SAME OLD)
[]


WHAT'S MARY KOM DOING ON A FASHION RAMP?
[]


DIOR BOOK CLUB
[]


Fashion Portal Peddles a Namrata Joshipura Reproduction
[]


Craftsy and Cool, Couture's First Day Out
[]


NO WHITE SPACE PLEASE
[]


Day One at Lakme Fashion Week - Winter-Festive 2012
[]


Ek Bungala Bane Nyaara
[]


DRESS APPROPRIATELY? TELL US HOW
[]


So what's a Guru Kurta?
[]


PARIS-BOMBAY IN VEGAS
[]


GAULTIER IN ALL GLORY
[]


Impossible Conversations and a Piece of the Sari
[]


Bollywood's Worst Dressed
[]


Dhoti Times
[]


SONIA GANDHI'S NEW COLOUR CARD
[]


Talking through fabric
[]


Red Soles, In The Red?
[]


THE COVER STORY
[]


Puneri Voice
[]


Portfolio 2012
[]


INDIAN FASHION: FORMIDABLE SOFT POWER
[]


Express Adda on Indian fashion's silver year
[]


NO TO NUDITY FOR CRICKET
[]


PANTS DOWN, THUMBS DOWN
[]


Scintillating Sonam
[]


Men Who Pause
[]


AISHWARYA L'OREAL BACHCHAN
[]


Zohal, Who?
[]


WHAT'S RITE WITH BATA
[]


KASHMIR CONSCIOUSNESS
[]


STARS IN HER EYES
[]


In cotton company
[]


Chanel's Black Magic
[]


FISH FRY, NEW RECIPE
[]


The Aishwarya Complex
[]


ASHIMA-LEENA'S AWADH
[]


Three Cheers
[]


Lecoanet Hemant's Fashmob--Spring Summer 2012
[]


Is Fashion Worth It?
[]


Notes from Fashion Week
[]


Three Questions, thirty answers
[]


For Starters...
[]


Crystal gazing
[]


Fashion's New Extras
[]


The Kingdom of Valaya through a fashion blogger's eyes
[]


Wake Up Designers
[]


The Age Issue
[]


The Devil Wrote
[]


Undressing the Oscars
[]


Future Tense
[]


Who is Afraid of Indian Fashion?
[]


Pod of small things
[]


Warp and Weft
[]


Tanvi Times
[]


Full time writers, part time fashion hacks
[]


Eyes on and off the runway
[]


Gold prices fall on sluggish demand, weak global cues
[]


Gold price declines on sluggish demand, silver up on fresh buying
[]


Gold climbs to near three-week high as stock markets dip
[]


Gold snaps three-day rally, price falls by Rs 130 to Rs 30,360
[]


US gold price futures rally 2 per cent; bargain hunters shop around
[]


Gold futures rise by Rs 246 to Rs 28,664 on global cues
[]


Gold notches biggest annual loss in 32 years
[]


Gold, silver prices remain weak on sustained selling, global cues
[]


Gold price futures down 0.19 pc to Rs 28,509 on global cues
[]


Gold price rises for second day, up Rs 120 to Rs 30,120
[]


Gold price up Rs 100 to Rs 30,000 on fresh stockists buying, global cues
[]


Onion export floor price more than halved to $150 a tonne
[]


Gold price falls Rs 275, dips below Rs 30k level after 4 months
[]


Gold prices rises 0.18 per cent in futures trade
[]


Gold price steady but set for biggest annual loss in 3 decades
[]


Gold, silver prices drop further on sustained selling, global cues
[]


Gold prices fall on stockists selling
[]


Yearender: Gold comes off all-time high, silver declines during 2013
[]


Gold recovers, prices up by Rs 240 to Rs 30,400
[]


Gold heads for biggest annual loss in 32 years
[]


Gold price falls further by Rs 205 to Rs 30,160 in Delhi
[]


Gold, silver prices fall in Mumbai, US Federal Reserve effect seen
[]


Gold price snaps 2-day falling trend in Delhi, up Rs 30 to Rs 30,430
[]


RBI for removal of restrictions on gold import
[]


Gold price falls in Delhi on sell-off by stockists; silver surges Rs 1,000
[]


Nashik farmers halt biz as onion prices drop to Rs 9.5
[]


Gold price rebounds by Rs 230 to to Rs 30,930 in Delhi
[]


Gold price zooms by Rs 425 to Rs 31,150 on frantic buying
[]


Gold price slips Rs 30, silver price jumps Rs 830 on fresh buying, global cues
[]


Gold price steady after 2-day gains, but taper worries linger
[]


Gold price gains Rs 255 on low level buying in Delhi
[]


Gold futures prices down on weak global cues
[]


Gold price bounces back by Rs 450 to Rs 31,250
[]


Smugglers moving gold like narcotics
[]


Indian gold premium hits Rs 29,096, nears record high on strong demand, limited supply
[]


Gold prices steadies near 5-month low, US data eyed
[]


Gold prices hit 5-month low on taper worries
[]


Onion prices drop sharply as late kharif arrivals pick pace
[]


Gold price slips as investors look to US data for stimulus clues
[]


Gold prices extends gains on sustained buying, firm global cues
[]


Gold, silver prices in Delhi fall on stockists selling, global cues
[]


Gold price snaps 2-day hiatus, surges on marriage season demand, global cues
[]


Gold holds near 1-week high, physical demand drops off
[]


Gold price extends losses by Rs 50 to Rs 31,050 on sustained selling
[]


Gold drops 1 per cent as equities gain after Iran deal
[]


Gold jewellery exports fall 6.9 pct in October
[]


Trump, Kim to hold second nuclear summit, and other news in pictures
["People walk by a huge screen showing North Korea's leader Kim Jong Un in a news program in Tokyo, Wednesday, Feb. 27, 2019.", 'With Trump and Kim descending on Hanoi for their second summit , there has been a persistent suggestion that Kim will look around at the relative prosperity of his Vietnamese hosts who are certainly no strangers to U.S. hostility and think that he, too, should open up his country to more foreign investment and trade.', 'Trump himself has been the primary cheerleader.', 'Special force policemen are driven in a truck to be deployed, in Hanoi, Vietnam on Wednesday. Vietnam is preparing to facilitate the second summit between U.S President Donald Trump and North Korean leader Kim Jong Un in Hanoi.', 'The carnival-like atmosphere in the Vietnamese capital, with vendors hawking T-shirts emblazoned with the leaders’ faces, stood in contrast to the serious items on their agendas- North Korea’s pursuit of nuclear weapons and peace on the Korean Peninsula.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Avoid Palk Bay, ICG tells fishermen
['The Indian Coast Guard (ICG) Station, Karaikal, has reached out to fishermen in coastal hamlets operating trawlers and motorised boats along the stretch of 87 nautical miles from Poompuhar to Vedaranyam and encouraged them to opt for tuna fishing.', 'The ICG is educating the fishermen about the consequences of venturing into Sri Lankan waters in the backdrop of depletion of marine resources on the Indian side of maritime boundary.', 'The Fisheries department insists on installation of GPS devices in trawlers and motorised boats to make sure that the fishermen remain inside the Indian Maritime Boundary. The fishermen, in turn, expect the government to supply them with the devices.', 'Studies show that bottom trawlers have caused enormous depletion in marine resources on the Indian side and are in a compulsive situation to carry out course correction rather than venturing into Lankan waters.', 'For decades till the end of the civil war in Sri Lanka, commercial fishing vessels operated by dragging multiple nets through water, scraping the sea bed and disturbing the marine environment. The trawlers operating in Palk Bay have turned the sea surface barren, ridding it of even planktons, the very basis for the marine food chain. The trawlers continue to cause destruction of marine wealth as flouting of rules is not linked to cancellation of licences or denial of subsidised diesel, according to marine experts.', 'Citing the sustainable practices being adopted by the Sri Lankan fishermen after the end of civil war in the island nation, the studies have suggested that there must be strong deterrent mechanisms in place to prevent Indian fishermen from crossing the IMB.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Weavers in danger of extinction
['A family of handloom weavers in Woraiyur is keeping the tradition alive.', 'Woraiyur in Tiruchi was once famous for its handloom saris. Those were the days when Woraiyur saris, along with Sungadi in Madurai and Chinnalapatti in Dindigul, held sway over the Indian diaspora in Singapore, Malaysia and Sri Lanka.', 'Today, the weaving tradition is on the threshold of extinction due to sharp decline in patronage for handloom products.', 'Handlooms units flourished in Woraiyur until a few years ago. Every house had four to five looms, with most of the family members involved in weaving. For instance, almost all members of Devanga Chettiar community in the area were involved in the craft.', 'According to a weaver, there were 500 to 600 handlooms in Tiruchi — most of them in Woraiyur — in the early part of 1990s. The number started dwindling gradually after the introduction of powerlooms in various parts of the country including Coimbatore, Tirupur and Erode. It was 150 handlooms until five years ago in Woraiyur. Now, it is just 30.', 'An official at the office of Assistant Director of Handlooms says that only around 100 weavers are active now. Of them, 90 are receiving getting old age pension. The new generation is not ready to inherit the family occupation. “We had a network of 15 agents in Woraiyur, Kulithalai and Thottiam, giving work orders to more than 500 handlooms about 20 years ago. We have moved out of our occupation long ago. None of my family members are into handloom weaving,” says l. Ramalingam, a member of Devanga Chettiar community.', 'The Woraiyur Devangar Cooperative Weaving Society and Tiruchirappalli Cooperative Weaving Society were active in engaging their members in weaving and marketing their products under the brand of ‘Woraiyur sari’.', 'The latter has become dormant.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


Plea to expedite road overbridge construction
['Residents of Mannargudi have demanded that construction of a road over bridge (ROB) at Needamanglam be expedited to put an end to the ordeal faced by road users on the crucial stretch connecting Nagapattinam and Velankanni with Tiruchi.', 'Participating in a meeting organised by Nesakkaram, a coordinating association of all non-governmental organisations functioning in and around Mannargudi, they said the announcement that a ROB would come up at Needamangalam raised hope among locals and long distance travellers by road that they would be relieved of the problem of waiting for a considerable period of time at the level crossing gate frequently. But the inordinate delay, presumably due to non-acquisition of required land for constructing the ROB in spite of the railways allocating ₹9 crore for the project, had nullified their expectations.', 'They urged the Union and State governments to initiate steps for carrying out the project as early as possible.', 'They have also pleaded that a Semmozhi Express rake parked at Mannargudi railway station during daytime be operated as passenger service between Mannargudi and Velankanni and a police out-post be set up at the railway station.', 'Please enter a valid email address.', 'Comments will be moderated by The Hindu editorial team.', 'Comments that are abusive, personal, incendiary or irrelevant cannot be published.', "Please write complete sentences. Do not type comments in all capital letters, or in all lower case letters, or using abbreviated text. (example: u cannot substitute for you, d is not 'the', n is not 'and').", 'We may remove hyperlinks within comments.', 'Please use a genuine email ID and provide your name, to avoid rejection.']


